 While some illiberal democracies have engaged in war against each other, no liberal democracies have done so. Therefore, if we include only liberal democracies in the Democratic Peace theory, it holds.
  Rudolph Rummel  describes democracy as "a way of solving without violence disagreement over fundamental questions." [3] 
  Immanuel Kant. "Perpetual Peace.". 1795  - "But there is another important theoretical thrust regarding the impact of regime type that relies less on the idea that democracy evokes normative commitments to the peaceful resolution of conflicts, and more on the idea that "leaders in democracies might avoid wars against other democratic states...because they feel that fighting such wars might be harmful to their chances of staying in power" (Ray 1995, p. 40). Bueno de Mesquita et al (1992), Bueno de Mesquita & Siverson (1995) find that interstate wars do have important impacts on the fate of political regimes, and that the probability that a political leader will fall from power in the wake of a lost war is particularly high in democratic states." 
  Sebastian Rosato. "The Flawed Logic of Democratic Peace Theory". The American Political Science Review. Vol. 97, No. 4 (Nov., 2003)  - "Democratic peace theory is probably the most powerful liberal contribution to the debate on the causes of war and peace. In this paper I examine the causal logics that underpin the theory to determine whether they offer compelling explanations for the finding of mutual democratic pacifism. I find that they do not. Democracies do not reliably externalize their domestic norms of conflict resolution."
 Elected leaders are not particularly accountable to peace loving publics or pacifist interest groups
 For instance, it says that men should have no more than four wives, and also asserts that Muhammad lived blamelessly. But Muhammad had 13 wives. Q.E.D.
 Just one example of where this impersonal and uncaring entity overlooks blatant sin is where the Qur'an allows men to beat their wives.
  "Coca yes, Cocaine no?" Drugs and Conflict Debate Papers. 2006 : "Peasant farmers in Cochabamba indicated that coca chewing had economic benefits because it helped increase production in agriculture, fisheries and mining." 
  "Bolivia's Knot: No to Cocaine, but Yes to Coca." The New York Times. February 12th, 2006 : "The eradication of so lucrative a crop, however, had serious social and political repercussions for a desperately poor country where coca and cocaine had become a leading industry. With their losses rising into the hundreds of millions of dollars, Chapare's coca farmers, often led by Mr. Morales, protested, blocked roads and battled security forces, sometimes with fatal consequences. The unrest so weakened the central state that two presidents were forced to resign in the 20 months ending in June 2005." 
  Evo Morales "Let Me Chew My Coca Leaves." New York Times Editorial. March 13th, 2009 : "The custom of chewing coca leaves has existed in the Andean region of South America since at least 3000 B.C. It helps mitigate the sensation of hunger, offers energy during long days of labor and helps counter altitude sickness." 
  "Coca yes, Cocaine no?" Drugs and Conflict Debate Papers. 2006 : "Sacred: to communicate with the supernatural world and obtain its protection, especially with offerings to the Pachamama, the personification and spiritual form of the earth."
 Bolivian President Evo Morales, an Aymara Indian, said in January of 2011: "How can it be possible that the coca leaf, which represents our identity, which is ancestral, be penalized." [6] 
 Morales called coca chewing a "factor in social cohesion," enshrining this principle into a newly adopted constitution as of January of 2009. : "Coca yes, Cocaine no?" Drugs and Conflict Debate Papers. 2006 : "Social: to maintain social cohesion and cooperation among members of the community, it is used in community ceremonies, as a “payment” for labor exchange and a social relations instrument.
 Coca chewing far pre-dates cocaine use. It has existed for thousands of years. Cocaine has only a hundred year history. It is wrong, therefore, to ban coca use due to the modern difficulties with cocaine - it's unfair to the legacy of coca.
 Coca is an essential stimulant in daily life in the Andes, just as coffee is in the West. It is consumed by millions of indigenous people. Trying to ban it is just futile.
 Latvia opposed Bolivia's 2011 proposed amendment to the UN's narcotics treaty with the following language: that because the purpose of Bolivia’s amendment is “to maintain a habit and socio-cultural practice, not a medical or scientific purpose,” coca leaf chewing still needs to be abolished. [7] 
 Continuing a tradition is always a weak argument in defense of a policy. Traditions need to stand on their own merits, beyond the simple fact that people have done it in the past. 
  "Coca yes, Cocaine no?" Drugs and Conflict Debate Papers. 2006 : "While it is true that coca and cocaine are not the same, without cocaine coca would never have occupied such an important place in Andean culture."
  Evo Morales "Let Me Chew My Coca Leaves." New York Times Editorial. March 13th, 2009 : "What is absurd about the 1961 convention is that it considers the coca leaf in its natural, unaltered state to be a narcotic. The paste or the concentrate that is extracted from the coca leaf, commonly known as cocaine, is indeed a narcotic, but the plant itself is not." [1] 
 Coca is distinct from cocaine. Coca is a natural leaf with very mild effects when chewed. Cocaine is a highly processed and concentrated drug using derivatives from coca. 
  Evo Morales "Let Me Chew My Coca Leaves." New York Times Editorial. March 13th, 2009 : "Unlike nicotine or caffeine, it causes no harm to human health nor addiction or altered state, and it is effective in the struggle against obesity, a major problem in many modern societies."
  "Coca yes, Cocaine no?" Drugs and Conflict Debate Papers. 2006 : "Because of its effects, coca would fit better into a category similar to that of caffeinebased plant stimulants — coffee, tea, guaraná and yerba mate. Because of the way it is assimilated, including the use of an alkaline reagent, its use would be more similar to the oriental custom of chewing the areca nut (areca catechu) wrapped in betel leaves (piper betle) and mixed with lime." 
 The raw component parts of other drugs like meth are not banned. These components are a variety of household cleaning compounds. Similarly, it is wrong to ban coca because it can be turned into cocaine.    
 The World Health Organization found in 1995 that the “use of coca leaves appears to have no negative health effects and has positive therapeutic, sacred and social functions for indigenous Andean populations.” [2] 
 Coca provides an energy boost for working or for combating fatigue and cold. [3] 
 Chewed or consumed as tea, coca counters altitude sickness, aids digestion and quells hunger and fatigue. 
 Because coca helps suppress one's appetite, it is also a means of combating overeating and obesity. Evo Morales made this argument in a NYTimes Op-Ed in 2009.  
 There is no evidence that one becomes chemically addicted to cocaine. Rather, cocaine chewing is a habit among Andeans. 
 WHO. In 1992 the World Health Organization’s Expert Committee on Drug Dependence (ECDD) undertook a ‘prereview’ of coca leaf at its 28th meeting. The 28th ECDD report concluded that, “the coca leaf is appropriately scheduled [as a narcotic] under the Single Convention on Narcotic Drugs, 1961, since cocaine is readily extractable from the leaf." [4]  This ease of extraction makes coca and cocaine inextricably linked. Therefore, because cocaine is defined as a narcotic, coca must also be defined in this way. 
 The active ingredient in coca leaf is the same as in cocaine. It's just more concentrated in cocaine. Because the raw material of coca and its more potent relative cocaine are so closely aligned, it is impossible to disassociate the two. If one hopes to consider cocaine a narcotic and stop its spread, they must also forbid coca.
 Wherever coca is legally produced, cocaine production thrives with greater success. The correlation is very clear. In Bolivia, coca eradication efforts in the 1980s and 90s helped reduce cocaine production. As Evo Morales took power and legalized coca production and consumption, however, cocaine production has shot up. This is despite his efforts to fight cocaine production. The bottom line is that legalizing coca makes it easier for cocaine producers to operate. This correlation cannot be ignored. 
 The decision to ban coca chewing fifty years ago was based on a 1950 report elaborated by the UN Commission of Inquiry on the Coca Leaf with a mandate from ECOSOC: "We believe that the daily, inveterate use of coca leaves by chewing ... is thoroughly noxious and therefore detrimental." [5] 
 Again, coca is unique from other substances like caffeine or nicotine in its capacity to be diverted to highly potent, dangerous, and damaging use in cocaine. 
 Evo Morales said in 2009 to a UN meeting of the Commission for Narcotic Drugs: "We're for the coca leaf but against cocaine. The coca leaf should no longer be vilified and criminalized!" [8] 
  If legalized, farmers will shift their production of coca from cocaine-purposed coca to open market coca production. Legal production is much more secure from government action. 
 Pasquale Quispe, 53, owner of a 7.4-acre Bolivian coca farm, explained to the New York Times in 2006: "Coca is our daily bread, what gives us work, what gives us our livelihood. In other countries, they say coca is drugs, but we don't use drugs. It's the gringos who use drugs." [9] 
 All South American countries have signed several declarations by the Union of South American Nations (UNASUR) that acknowledged that the chewing of coca leaves is an ancestral cultural expression that should be respected by the international community. [10] 	+	
 In Bolivia, coca production is legal, but within strict limits. Only a certain amount of the stuff can be grown, and amounts exceeding these numbers are subject to eradication. Bolivia excepted $250,000 from the US in April of 2011, for example, for satellite monitoring of its coca fields. This helps ensure that coca is not excessively grown for use in cocaine; much more coca is required to produce cocaine than is required for natural consumption such as chewing. This is just one way in which coca production can be regulated to ensure against abuse in cocaine production. 
  Evo Morales "Let Me Chew My Coca Leaves." New York Times Editorial. March 13th, 2009 : "Today, millions of people chew coca in Bolivia, Colombia, Peru and northern Argentina and Chile. The coca leaf continues to have ritual, religious and cultural significance that transcends indigenous cultures and encompasses the mestizo population." 
 Pacífico Olivares, 49, a regional leader of coca farmers: "What blame do we have when we don't make cocaine? They should chase down the people who make cocaine." [11] 
  "Coca yes, Cocaine no?" Drugs and Conflict Debate Papers. 2006 : "The most famous non-pharmaceutical industrial uses are in Vin Mariani and Coca-Cola. Both opened up large markets as natural stimulants used in different strata of society. Coca-Cola changed its formula in 1906, using the coca leaf as a flavouring agent without alkaloids; this was later made legitimate under Article 27 of the Single Convention of 1961. The separation of the cocaine alkaloid from the leaf, producing a substance that is used to flavour the drink without the alkaloid, is one of the best-kept industrial secrets in the history of the world. There are many other products in both Bolivia and Peru that have a modest domestic market. The supply ranges from products that seek to take advantage of the leaf’s nutritional value — although many of its valuable components, such as calcium and certain vitamins, can be obtained as well or better from other plants — and products that emphasise its energising value (syrups and teas) or anaesthetic properties (salves), etc. There are also cosmetic products (toothpaste and shampoo). There are various products whose scientific basis is not clearly proven, and there are no clear indications that coca is better than other ingredients for the preparation of the final product — although this could also be due to the stigma attached to coca, as well as the limited availability of technological means."
  "Coca yes, Cocaine no?" Drugs and Conflict Debate Papers. 2006 : "One of the main properties of the coca leaf, which has been and continues to be used industrially, is its medical potential as an anaesthetic and analgesic. This characteristic of cocaine, which was part of ancestral practices and knowledge in the Andean-Amazon region, came to light in the 1880s and led to a revolution in medical science, particularly in surgery. As a local anaesthetic, it offered an alternative for operations that had previously been painful and hazardous. These properties were used to ease childbirth pains and dental treatments, among other things, taking the coca leaf and cocaine rapidly to the pinnacle of pharmacology and medicine."
  "Coca Production Makes a Comeback in Peru." New York Times. June 13th, 2010 : "The increase [in Coca production] in Peru offers a window into one of the most vexing aspects of the American-financed war against drugs in Latin America, which began in earnest four decades ago. When antinarcotics forces succeed in one place — as they recently have in Colombia, which has received more than $5 billion in American aid this decade — cultivation shifts to other corners of the Andes. This happened in the 1990s, when coca cultivation shifted to Colombia after successful eradication projects in Peru and Bolivia. More recently, coca growers moved to dozens of new areas within Colombia after aerial spraying in other areas. Scholars of the Andean drug war call this the balloon effect, bringing to mind a balloon that swells in one spot when another is squeezed."
 The balloon effect often occurs simply due to inconsistent eradication policies in South America; while one country like Columbia is strong on eradication, other countries like Peru and Bolivia grow soft and even legalize or decriminalize the growth and chewing of coca. This has allowed production of cocaine to "balloon" in Peru and Bolivia. This all suggests that the solution is simply to ensure that all countries adopt strong eradication policies. If this happens, there would be no place for production to "balloon", eradication would work, and cocaine supply would be successfully curbed internationally.  
 Admissions is all about judging the overall merit of a candidate. This is, more and more, a judgment of the life and character of a candidate, which is often outlined in stunning detail on social networking profiles (interests, activism, social-interactions...). Therefore, Facebook, Myspace, and other social networking profiles of candidates are highly relevant to an admissions officer, and justifies their approaching this information to make their judgement on the candidate. 
 Giving the sensitivity to the admissions process in regard to fairness, this is very important.
 It inherently facilities interactions between students and college admissions officers, and with the express approval of both. It demonstrates that there is a value in social networking for applicant-college interactions, instead of it being something that should be feared as the proposition seems to suggest. 
 Imagining that colleges do search on social networking sites to find candidates, it should be understood that only the applicants which have become a member of such sites would be seen and gain advantage. But, what about those who don't become a member in any of the social networking sites available on the web? The problem is that there are poor students out there who are really smart and deserve university admission, but, pity for them, they do not have enough resources to get a computer and establish a personal profile on a social networking site. Therefore, a system in which colleges search for applicants will only promote an unfair admission of students.  
 It is unethical to snoop around on a personal profile of a candidate for information pertaining to an individual and their merit for entry into a University. This information is not necessarily relevant to the process at hand. Only relevant information should be viewed by admission's officers
 Consent is a significant element of the admissions process. A contract of sorts is entered between the candidate and college in which relevant information is supplied by the candidate. Relevant information can be checked through official third-party sources such as the SATs and high schools. This remains consensual because the applicant entered into a disclosure agreement with their high school and the preparers of the SATs, which gives authority to admissions officers to view relevant information about the applicant. But no such contract is established if an admissions officer "snoops" onto a profile. It thus breaks the mold of consent and acceptability in the admissions process.  
 It is important that employers have good information on candidates so that they can judge most accurately whether a candidate is qualified. It is also important, given the problem of false resumes, for employers to have access to alternative sources of information for cross-referencing. But, equally important and relevant information regards the character of an individual, which social networking sites can help reveal. All of this information helps employers make better decisions and hire more effectively or "accurately".  
  Facebook profiles should be seen as a tool for job-seekers looking to expose their social-side and character to employers. Candidates can create good representations of their character on their profiles, and benefit from employer exposure to this information. 
 YouTube: "How Facebook Can Help In Your Career Search". Posted November 26, 2007.
 Youth spend a significant amount of time online these days. Barring the possibility that children will shift away from social networking sties, it is important that parents attempt to make a connection with their children on these sites. It is not necessary to think that parents will be snooping on their children on social networking site. There is legitimate room for bonding to take place, and it should be encouraged.
  The Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA)  allows parents to review their child’s online profiles and blog pages for this purpose.
 Cyber bullies are individuals that bully and harass other individuals online. In a shocking case in 2007, a 13 year-old girl committed suicide after being bullied by neighbors on MySpace. If suicide is a possible result of cyber-bullying, parents should be actively engaged in monitoring profiles to protect their children against these activities. [2] 
 This applies to teachers and parents. The only way to instruct proper cyber behavior, though, is to see what people and children are actually posting, in this context, on their personal profiles and with other users.  
 As famous early 20th century psychiatrist  Carl Jung  said, "what you resist persists". The more parents try to constrain and direct children on social networking sites, the more they will seek to rebel and act outlandishly. By trying to bring attention to what is bad on social networking sties and in personal profiles, parents will actually bring greater attention to these things, and make children more conscious of the opportunity to take "nefarious" steps. This might have the reverse effect from what is intended by parents.
 Marissa Warms. "Parents shouldn't invade privacy". DailySkiff.com. January 26, 2007
 Facbook was initially a university-based system that required that profiles be based on valid university email addresses. These email addresses are, in part, owned by the university. Because universities have some authority over these emails they also have some juridiction on the social-networking profiles that use these email addresses. 
 Kathryn Goldman, director of judicial affairs at the University of Delaware, said that the university administration has the right to punish students based on incriminating evidence obtained from Facebook profiles, according to the University Newspaper in March of 2006.[3]
 There are many privacy settings on Facebook, for example. You can make it impossible for anyone to view your profile via legitimate avenues on Facebook without being inside you network of friends. Unless employers are hacking into profiles, this is sufficient to prevent employers from accessing profiles. As such, the user has the power to close their account from employer view. It is up to the user. This is important, since many prospective employees will want employers to view their profiles. 
 Confucius noted that he was lucky to be such a public figure, as it put his behavior in check. The same applies to other individuals, so the greater the access from parents, educators, and employers the better. It is good that individuals are less inclined now to post, for example, vulgar or extremist comments.
 Danah Boyd, social networking scholar and blogger, said in 2006 - "privacy is an experience that people have, not a state of data....When people feel exposed or invaded, there's a privacy issue." [1]  Part of the reaction from this exposure, as is noted in the pro case, is a moderation of behavior. But, this could also be called a "dulling" effect where all of the brightness of character differentiating individuals becomes less and less distinct in favor of a common understanding of what is generally acceptable among the general public. This process of public exposure leading to the dulling and averaging of individuals is precisely what Aldous Huxley in  A Brave New World  and George Orwell in  1984  feared. Privacy helps protect individuality by ensuring that individuals can express themselves freely, how they want, and among a private or limited audience. This is the general logic behind freedom of privacy laws. Therefore, it is important to set limits on parent, employer, and educator access and invasiveness on social networking sites.
, such as in Belize where tourist divers collect information for scientists (with a similar project regarding Australian whale sharks). Governments not otherwise inclined to protect such species will have a financial incentive as well as a moral imperative to do so if tourists encourage it.
 ‘Ecotourism’ can entail anything from a sincere attempt to maintain the ecosystem to a packaged imitation of ‘real wildlife/culture’. [6]  Ironically, the attractions of unspoilt countryside are ruined by ever more visitors: tourism is a good example of classic market failure, where the social costs are paid by those receiving few, if any, of the benefits.
 These multi-national corporations (MNCs) are usually welcome, despite the fact that the profit they make in a majority of cases  does not stay within the borders of the host country . Local labour is exploited because it is cheap, environment is destroyed without punishment because there usually are no treaties or contracts to force the MNCs to pollute less (this applies mostly for the developing countries).
 – so it is better to try to provide facilities for them than to allow unlimited access.
 Infrastructure, and in particular airspace, is already unable to cope with the amount of journeys demanded – so ways must be found by which to reduce tourists artificially.
, not only via direct spending but also through taxation and the purchase of luxury goods which creates a larger market than would be possible with purely local spending. 
 International tourism in particular may increase short-term returns, but at the cost of a dependence on the vagaries of fashions. A single climatic disaster, such as a hurricane, or a crime wave (as in South Africa), or terrorist attack (such as that at Luxor in 1997, where 58 tourists were attacked) will mean the market quickly collapses. [4]  Even without this, changing trends will mean tourist tastes shift every few years.
 It is hard to get banks to lend money to set up smaller hotels as the investments are seen as too risky, and so artificially high interest rates deter investment or competition.
 It is possible to re-brand an area, such as Las Vegas, away from a negative image of gambling to a positive family orientated marketing strategy.
 Local hostility is already turning to litigation over the issues of access to private beaches, diving areas, water and grazing land.
 In York, maintaining geographical separation between old and new buildings and refusing planning permission for certain heights of offices prevents architectural vandalism. [7]  Similar care has been taken on parts of the Sinai coast. [8]  In fact, artificial imitations in Las Vegas or Disneyworld serve to ease the pressure on original areas. [9] 
 Millions of feet have eroded paths in the Peak District and the Great Wall of China. [10]  Cheaply constructed concrete hotels are unsympathetic to the architectural vernacular. Furthermore, noise pollution derives from clubs and bars provided for tourists.
 This argument is sometimes based on conservative philosophies that call for a small role for government in general.  
 - America's health care system is one of the worst in the world. It is costly and has left over 40 million uninsured. Most Americans deem this to be a serious problem, and consider increased funding to be an important part of the solution. 
 There is a lot of frivolous spending in the United States that can be cut out of the budget. It should be a priority to cut such frivolous spending. 
 - Dr. Paul Samuelson in 2005, Nobel Prize winner in Economics - "USA's balance of payments deficit is so strong and irreversible, that we must accept that at some future date there will be a run against the dollar. Probably, the kind of disorderly run that precipitates a global financial crisis." [1] 
 "The Inevitable Collapse of the Dollar" YouTube Video
 In the absence of debt monetization, when the Government borrows money from the savings of others, it consumes the amount of savings there are to lend. If the government were to borrow less, that money would be freed to work in the private sector and would lower interest rates overall. Lastly, raising interest rates is one of the traditional ways that the U.S. Federal Reserve uses to combat inflation (which can be brought on by government debt), but a large national debt figure makes it difficult to do so because it raises the interest paid in servicing that debt.
. USA Today - "Big payments on the debt start coming due in 2008, when the first of 78 million baby boomers — the generation born from 1946 to 1964 — qualify at age 62 for early retirement benefits from Social Security. The costs start mushrooming in 2011, when the first boomers turn 65 and qualify for taxpayer-funded Medicare." 
 -  Noam Chomsky, The Social Security Non-Crisis (2005)  - "What happened to the Baby Boomers when they were zero to 20? Weren’t working people taking care of them? And it was a much poorer society then. In the 1960s the demographics caused a problem but hardly a crisis. The bulge was met by a big increase in expenditures in schools and other facilities for children." 
 -  "The relevant number is what’s called the dependency ratio of working people to population.  That ratio reached its lowest point in 1965. It won’t reach that point again until 2080, according to Social Security Administration figures."
 -  Chomsky (2005) . 
 While some have defended budget deficits on the basis that "we owe the debt to ourselves", this is increasingly not true, as the US debt is increasingly in the hands of foreign governments. In 2007, external debt (to foreigners) amounted to roughly 25% of the total [6] , virtually double the 1988 figure of 13%. [7]  Indeed, we don't owe this debt to ourselves. This creates a number of difficulties...
 Foreign policy vulnerabilities to China: - In recent years, the debt has soared and inflation has stayed low in part because China has been willing to accumulate reserves denominated in U.S. Dollars. Currently, China holds over $1 trillion in dollar denominated assets (of which $330 billion are U.S. Treasury notes). In comparison, $1.4 trillion represents M1 or the "tight money supply" of U.S. Dollars which suggests that the value of the U.S. Dollar could change dramatically should China ever choose to divest itself of a large portion of those reserves.
 Pubs and clubs should adapt, for example by trying to earn more money from selling food. After a ban was introduced in New South Wales (Australia), only 9% of restaurants reported a drop in trade.
 Smokers will not go to non-smoking places. The claim that more non-smokers will visit bars and restaurants has been proved to be untrue. These businesses would also earn less money from selling tobacco. In many places, pubs and Working Men’s Clubs are important social places for communities. The smoking ban in the UK has had a devastating effect on the pub trade.
 Opponents of a ban often argue that employees at smoking institutions can simply get another job at a non-smoking institution, and thus such workers are voluntarily subjecting themselves to being "passive smokers". Yet, are they really freely making this choice? Many supporters of a smoking ban posit that a job is not something that is easily replaceable. There are many factors that may limit a workers ability to freely shift jobs like 1)Job-markets are tight. 2)A worker's family depends on a worker's income from a job. 3)The time (and therefore money) required of an employee to find another job is limited. 4)Other job opportunities are less lucrative (frequently the case in service industries such as bars, clubs, and restaurants), and so the ability or reasoned-impetus to "choose" a different job is heavily constrained. 
 It can be argued that, if a worker objects to inhaling second hand smoke involuntarily at their work place, that they can choose to work somewhere else. There are many careers that people choose to partake in that involve substantial risk or inherent bodily or mental harm or strain. These include:
 Various forms of physical, mental, tangible, and less tangible forms of harm are frequently involved in the jobs that workers choose to perform. Yet, these harms are often accepted as meaningful sacrifices that workers are free to take-up when they deem these harms to be outweighed by the benefits of such employment. As long as their ability is maitained to calculate such benefits and costs and make a free "choice" to stick with such a job, then the arrangement could be argued as just. If workers in smoke-filled environments are free to make such calculations of costs and benefits, then it can be argued that their arrangement is fair, and that cigarette bans in such public environments should not be required on this basis. 
 In many places, there are no non-smoking bars or restaurants. Unless people refuse to go out with friends who smoke, they cannot avoid passive smoking. People who work in smoky workplaces like bars often do not freely choose this and sometimes there are no other jobs are available for them. In most countries, safety standards do not allow workers to be exposed to unnecessary danger, even if they agree. Workers should not be exposed to other people’s smoke, since they may not have made a free choice to do so.
 Society accepts that adults can decide to harm themselves to some extent, so long as they do not harm others. This is why the proposition is not arguing that people should be banned from smoking in private. Passive smokers do choose to breathe in other people’s smoke. If they do not want to smoke passively, they do not need to go to places where smoking is allowed. There is therefore no reason to ban smoking in public.  [1] 
 Non-smoking bars are rare in the United States. This suggests that culture is accepting of people who smoke in bars. It is the norm for Americans to drink beer and smoke. Most people who go to bars must not mind smoke that much. If they did, they would not go. While for some non-smokers, the presence of smoke may be bothersome, but it is usually not a dealbreaker.  [2] 
 Workers should be allowed to choose to work in dangerous conditions. This is accepted for jobs like mining, fishing and the armed forces. Individuals decide that they are better doing this work than not having a job at all. 
 Smokers need to maintain a certain level of nicotine in their blood to remain content. A ban on smoking in public would force them to smoke less while at work. Over time, this would lower the level of nicotine they need to feel content. This would reduce how often they need to smoke. They would therefore smoke less at home, as well as less at work. Research suggests that in work places where smoking is banned, the proportion of daily smokers drops by 22% and their average consumption declines by 5 cigarettes per day. 
 Heavy smokers are unlikely to give up since they are addicted to nicotine. Banning smoking in public will, therefore, only encourage people to smoke more at home. This will harm other people in their houses, particularly children. This is important, since children are not old enough to choose freely to smoke passively. Also, people smoking at home may drink more alcohol than they would if they went to a bar. This is because they can buy it more cheaply at a supermarket or off-license. Drinking more alcohol may lead to other health problems.
 The annoyance extends to a level of intrusion when considering the fact that cigarette smoke has the tendency to linger in ones clothing and hair, making it more personally disruptive to non-smokers than say, loud laughter or the bad body oder of another patron. Because, in this way, the offense is particularly intrusive into the lives of non-smokers, it may even be possible to consider such intrusions to be violations of certain liberties of non-smokers.
 A non-smoker who finds the smell of smoke unappealing should not be outraged by it. The smell of a particular scent is matter of opinion which should not be controlled by the administration.  [3] 
 Scientists have agreed that smoking is dangerous as tobacco smoke causes cancer, strokes and heart disease. Smoking does not just harm the smoker. It also harms people nearby, who breathe in the smoke. This kind of smoking is called passive smoking. Smokers choose to smoke, but people nearby do not choose to smoke passively. Most argue that people should only be exposed to harm if they understand the risks and choose to accept them. A complete ban on smoking in public is needed to protect people from passive smoking. Research suggests that partners of smokers have an increased chance of developing lung cancer, even if they do not use tobacco products. It is estimated that passive smoking kills approximately 80 000 people in the EU alone every year. (Brussels estimates that 15% of all deaths in the EU could be attributed to smoking.) 
 One's freedom to swing one's fist ends where someone else's nose begins. Similarly, the right to smoke ends exactly where it comes into conflict with the lungs, nasal passages, and health of others. Public places are such a place and - for example - non-smokers account for 70% of EU population. Therefore, in order to maintain the rights of non-smokers, smoking in public places should be banned.
 Many smokers excuse their public smoking on the grounds that they don't have anywhere to smoke. However, there's their private property and homes. Why not smoke there? 
Approximately 85% is breathed in by people who do not want to have it in their system.
 There are plenty of places ware there is no smoking allowed, especially lately. You can't smoke at work, you cant smoke in bars and so it is getting harder and harder to find places to smoke in public. So I don't see why people are putting up a big fuss about the whole thing.
 A ban would encourage smokers to smoke less or give up. If smoking was banned in public places, it would no longer be a social activity. Instead, smokers would have to leave their friends inside and go outside to smoke. This would be particularly unpleasant when it is cold or wet. One third of smokers in Scotland said the ban was helping them to cut down. If smoking was a less social activity, fewer people would start smoking. In many countries, governments pay all or some of the cost of treating smoking-related diseases. This means that governments should have a right to discourage smoking.
 In workplaces where smoking is banned, 18% of workers smoke daily and their averge consumption drops to 15.4 cigarettes per day. By contrast, when there are no bans, 40% of workers smoke daily and their average consumption is about 20.1 cigarette per day.  "Smokers smoke less in workplaces that ban smoking", October 2004 
 Many groups argue that a government should not try and shape the social choices of its citizens toward desired social ends; people should be as free as possible to do what they want, as long as their actions don't violate the liberties of others. In this framework, governments should not intervene in the personal choice of a citizen to smoke - through a public places smoking ban - for any expressed purpose of affecting a "positive" change in that citizen's personal choices. 
 While 70% of Europeans are non-smokers, 86% are in favour of a ban on smoking at work, 84% in other public places, 61% in bars and pubs and 77% in restaurants.  [4] 
 There have been few problems with bans where they have been introduced. Heavy fines put off companies from allowing people to smoke. A survey for the Scottish Executive found that 99.4% of premises were observing the ban three months after it was introduced.
 Small workplaces will often ignore the ban and are unlikely to be caught. Staff who do not smoke are unlikely to report smokers, in case their colleagues work out who told the authorities.
 How the smokers can be efficient at work when they are  addicted  to nicotine, when a couple of cigarettes per day helps them to fulfill their tasks quickly and well?
 Once, we condemned homosexuality as "unnatural" and "immoral". Now we know that that was wrong and that many suffered as a consequence of that prejudice. Should incest suffer the same fate? No. We should realize that our opinions will become more tolerant over time to incest, and we should move to increase such tolerance sooner than later.
  "Polygamy, Polyamory, Same Sex Incest Are As Legitimate As Gay Marriage". Current. January 2, 2009  - "If two brothers decide to enter into a lifelong commitment, the arguments in favor of gay marriage make it clear that they should have the right to do so. What would be your reasons for excluding them from the benefits of marriage?"
 Homosexuality does not have a direct impact on how family members interact with one-another. Incest, conversely, allows for disruptive sexual interaction between parents and their offspring as well as between siblings. This fundamentally damages the traditional nurturing function of family. For this reason, legal homosexuality and even gay marriage do not set a precedent for legalizing adult incest or incestuous marriage.
 Homosexuality is typically a relationship between equal parties. Incest, contrarily, is much more prone to abusive relations between older and younger siblings, father and daughter, or son and mother, before these individuals could be considered "consenting adults". It is this inherent prospect of abuse that makes incest different than homosexuality and compels the state to intervene.
  Joachim Renzikowski, a criminal law professor at Germany's Halle University, quoted in a 2007 BBC article - "I doubt equally that getting rid of our incest law will result in any measurable increase in cases. Our moral guardians don't need to get too worked up about this." [11] 
 Legalizing incest does more than acknowledge it – it legitimises it with a mark of state approval. The costs of legitimizing incest in this way are quite large for the state and society. First, by making the practice appear acceptable, the state actually may encourage incestuous relationships within families between brothers and sisters, fathers and daughters, mothers and son, and between cousins. It makes it possible for individuals to move from considering incest as entirely unacceptable to considering it a socially-acceptable possibility. This significant shift will doubtlessly open incestuous doors that were once closed, encourage experimentation in incest, increase cases of abusive incestuous relations, and a general increase the number of incestuous relationships. Such a result is undesirable, so the state has a direct interest in preventing it by maintaining a ban.  
 Incestuous couples often do not have any children. It is wrong, therefore, to ban incest on the basis that it is bad for children of incest. Reproduction between incestuous couples could possibly be banned (a separate debate), but not all forms of incest on the basis of preventing "risky" reproduction.
 Humans very rarely have sex for the purpose of procreation. Most often, they have sex for mutual pleasure. This is perfectly moral. Incestuous couples that choose merely to have sex for pleasure, therefore, are doing nothing wrong by not having sex for the purpose of reproduction. 
 Sexual intercourse is done to produce children and not simply to get your rocks off. Legally allowing incestuous sex (but not reproduction) sends the wrong message regarding what sex should be for - reproduction only.
 You can’t help with whom you fall in love. As a matter of fact, many adult siblings and fathers and daughters strongly profess their love for one another. Why should this kind of love be taboo? Why should these people not be able to deepen their relationship? Patrick Stubing, who is engaged in an incestuous relationship with his sister in Germany (where incest is illegal), said: "We've done nothing wrong. We are like normal lovers. We want to have a family." [10] 
 Incestuous couples often report, "I feel that I am in love with my sister, but I know that I am doing something wrong". While they may have convinced themselves that they are in love, something nags at them that diminishes their love below "true love".
  Larry Arnhart. "So What's Wrong with Incest?". Darwinian Conservatism. October 7, 2006  - "the natural aversion to incest among most human beings is so strong that we formulate moral and legal norms against incest and enforce them as expressions of our natural emotional dispositions [...] We can see how reason comes into play here. We might, for example, call on our knowledge of the genetics of inbreeding to rationalize our abhorrence of incest. But this is only a rationalization of a moral abhorrence that causes our moral condemnation of incest as an expression of moral emotion."
  "Sexual Ethics: Consensual Incest". A Nadder. October 13th, 2008  - "It's unnatural -- the same old line's been used to prove the immorality of homosexuality, interracial marriage, contraception etc. Sorry. The answer's always "so what?" (being unnatural doesn't make something bad) and "no it isn't" (eg. 10–15% of college students reported some childhood sexual contact with a brother/sister)." 
 Incest is fairly common in the animal kingdom. In human history, incest has been common, found prominently as far back as Ancient Egypt. This all suggests that incest is fairly "natural", undermining the argument that it is unnatural and immoral. 
  "Sexual Ethics: Consensual Incest". A Nadder. October 13th, 2008  - "On another note, incest is only a matter of degree. We're all related, descending from a common evolutionary ancestor, so everyone on earth is some cousin of yours. Sometimes a close one if you live on an island. It's an evolutionary quirk to distinguish between the in-group (largely relatives) and out-group, as if there's something fundamental about these 2 groups." 
 Incest is against the natural order of things. People are not supposed to mate with blood relatives, but with people from a different family. This is meant to ensure the random mixing of genes that enables variation within human offspring and the potential for evolution. Diverging from this natural order is wrong on many levels. It impairs the natural evolutionary process, which weakens human evolutionary progress and improvement. Symbolically, it diminishes the respect we place on the natural sexual order that has enabled humans to become the sacred creatures that we are. Similarly, for people of faith, it diminishes the value placed on the sexual order created by God.
 In his book The Variation of Animals and Plants Under Domestication, Charles Darwin has a chapter "On the Good Effects of Crossing, and On the Evil Effects of Inbreeding." - "Although there seems to be no strong inherited feeling in mankind against incest, it seems possible that men during primeval times may have been more excited by strange females than by those with whom they habitually lived. . . . If any such feeling formerly existed in man, this would have led to a preference for marriages beyond the nearest kin, and might have been strengthened by the offspring of such marriages surviving in greater numbers." [3] 
  David Archard. Sexual consent. Limits of Consensuality" (Book). 1997  - "The problem with regarding such alleged harms [to the family] as supplying a sufficient condemnation of incest are two fold. First, it is possible to conceive of practices or sets of circumstances which do the same sorts and amounts of damage to the family but which do not appear to be subject to the same degree of extreme moral criticism. Consider, for example, intra-familial violence, parental subscription to very rigid or fundamental religious views, extreme poverty, ready toleration of and participation in criminality, excessive parental coldness or emotional indifference, and so on." [4] 
  David Archard. Sexual consent. Limits of Consensuality" (Book). 1997  - "The problem with regarding such alleged harms as supplying a sufficient condemnation of incest are twofold. [...] Second, we are left with the cases of siblings separated at or shortly after birth who, on being reunited, experience overpowering feelings of mutual attraction which may lead them into sexual intimacy. Such cases (and there are very occasional cases of parent-child incest along the same lines) are rare but well documented. It does not seem that any straightforward appeal to the damage that these incestuous relationships will or might do to the institution of the family is open to those who insist that, nevertheless, they remain deeply immoral." [5] 
 It is absurd to suggest that the existence of incestuous couples undermines the wider family model. The vast majority of families would experience none of the issues important to the few people this issue affects.
 Marriage is treated only as a cut-and-dry contract under the law. Under the law, therefore, incest cannot violate the "sanctity" of marriage. And, it certainly does not violate any marriage contracts.
  "Inbred obscurity: improving incest laws in the shadow of the "sexual family". Harvard Law Review. June 2006 : "the anthropological rationale put forward most famously by Professor Claude Lévi-Strauss — that incest prohibitions are a necessary mechanism for building society by forcing people to create alliances outside of narrow family groups — seems entirely inadequate as a reason to prohibit consensual relationships in a modern world whose social integration is not plausibly threatened by the few people who might choose to align themselves with family members."
 In some cases where incestuous couples get married, they are afforded protections due to their "marital status", without which they would be convicted of the "crime" of incest. This is strange and confusing.
 The Ohio Supreme Court ruled in a 2007 incest case: "The state has a legitimate interest in prohibiting incestuous relations and in protecting the family unit and family relationships." [6]  Incest undermines these traditional, nurturing relationships by opening the door to sexual tensions, jealousies, and animosities.  
 Incest bans allow children and family members to interact in ordinary and intimate ways (ie, sitting on laps, hugging, kissing on the cheeck) without raising undue suspicions or concerns. It provides a protective line that allows for ordinary intimacy, but ensures it doesn't go too far. [7] 
 The idea that family life is totally private is wrong: the government intervenes frequently in family life when there is a compelling interest to do so: when parents take drugs or neglect or abuse their children, or when people are violent. The government, therefore, has the right to intervene in families to stop incest, which is demonstrated to be damaging and hazardous.
 Professor Claude Lévi-Strauss argues that an incest prohibition is a necessary mechanism for building society by forcing people to form alliances outside of narrow family groups. [8] 
 "And Adam called his wife’s name Eve, because she was the mother of all living." (Genesis 3:20). "Now Adam knew Eve his wife, and she conceived and bore Cain, and said, 'I have acquired a man from the LORD.'" (Genesis 4:1) "And Cain knew his wife, and she conceived and bore Enoch." (Genesis 4:16) "'Come, let us make our father drink wine, and we will lie with him, that we may preserve the lineage of our father.'” So they made their father drink wine that night. And the firstborn went in and lay with her father, and he did not know when she lay down or when she arose. It happened on the next day that the firstborn said to the younger, 'Indeed I lay with my father last night; let us make him drink wine tonight also, and you go in and lie with him, that we may preserve the lineage of our father.' Then they made their father drink wine that night also. And the younger arose and lay with him, and he did not know when she lay down or when she arose. Thus both the daughters of Lot were with child by their father" (Genesis 19:32-36). 
  "Inbred obscurity: improving incest laws in the shadow of the "sexual family". Harvard Law Review. June 2006  - "Religion also does not provide a viable rationale for incest prohibitions. Based on current Establishment Clause doctrine, a predominant religious purpose would render incest prohibitions constitutionally invalid, 33 especially because those prohibitions trench on constitutionally protected activities such as marriage and sexual intimacy.34"
 "No one is to approach any close relative to have sexual relations. I am the Lord...Everyone who does any of these detestable things -- such persons must be cut off from their people" (Leviticus 18:6, 29). [12] 
 While it is true that there is a separation between church and state and that religion cannot play a direct role in the law on incest, this does not mean that it cannot be weighed for its significance in creating the moral foundations of modern society. Indeed, the moral beliefs of a public are relevant in considering what should be morally tolerable and morally intolerable under the law. Therefore, to the extent that the Bible (and other faiths) plays a role in modern moral thought, the Bible's condemnation of incest should favor a ban.  
 The risks involved in blood relatives having children are vastly overstated, normally by people that oppose incest for spurious “moral” reasons. First cousins, for example, are, according to a 2002 article in the New York Times, 93% likely to give birth to an entirely ordinary child, compared to roughly 96% for the general population. [9] 
  "Inbred obscurity: improving incest laws in the shadow of the "sexual family". Harvard Law Review. June 2006  - "The rationale based on genetics is also suspect under current law: even setting aside nonprocreative intimate relationships, in no other legal realm does the government criminally prohibit two people from having children because their offspring are more likely to inherit genetic defects.30 Even though the risks of birth defects among the most closely related family members are significant,31 eugenics on the basis of physical or mental deformity has long been repudiated."
  Joanna Grossman. "Should the law be kinder to 'kissin' cousins?". Find Law. April 8, 2002  - "More generally, scientific advances that enable doctors to screen for many potentially harmful genes may render general presumptions about genetic risks, like those embodied in marriage bans, inappropriate. When a particular individual can know his or her specific risk of passing on dangerous genes to children, how can a presumption as to the average person's general risk of doing so constitutionally be applied?" 
 Conclusively determining, beyond a reasonable doubt, that incest is the cause of a specific defect in the child of an incestuous couple is very difficult. This makes it difficult to base a ban on incest on the presumption that incest is the cause of defects. 
 This argument is a possible compromise, which allows for the legalization of consensual adult incest generally, but a ban on incestuous reproduction. 
 It is well known that the risks involved in blood relatives procreating are enormous. Deformities are common and genetic disorders are much more likely than in the population at large. The state has a compelling interest in preventing such suffering and the practice of incest that causes it. It is compassionate to the deformed/disordered child, the parents that must suffer through the experience, and the society that must provide for the extra health requirements of such a child.  
 The children of incestuous parents are much more likely to see incest as acceptable and to, therefore, engage in incest themselves. The problem with this is that second-generation incest is even more likely to involve medical and genetic problems. Third-generation incest is even more risky, and so on. Therefore, incest is an unsustainable social model.
 It is true that risks are run by other reproducing couples in society. But the magnitude of the risk is for the most part much smaller than those involved in incestuous reproduction.
 The existence of other couples that run genetic risks is an argument against legalizing incestuous relationships: the medical system already has enough trouble dealing with the offspring created by couples with conditions society doesn’t condemn. Why add more ill offspring on top of this, and for the condemned practice of incest?
 Because the children of incest couples are more likely to suffer from illness and deformity, they are more likely to become a burden on the health system and thus the taxpayers of a society. The state has a compelling interest in protecting other members of society from such a burden. 
 The offspring of incest often suffer from widespread rejection or mistreatment in society. On the playground, children of incest are likely to be bullied. With attitudes on incest unlikely to change, it is better that a ban help prevent such unfair episodes from occurring in the first place.
 The offspring of incestuous couples have a difficult time understanding and identifying with their ancestry. This leads to unanswerable questions such as "who am I?", which often requires therapy to resolve. 
  "The case against love: A recent legislation on incest". University of Oxford. April 8, 2008  - "the slippery slope argument cuts both ways: Forbidding the brother-sister love might yield future amendments in legislation that are more than questionable from a moral point of view – particularly because, as outlined above, a legislation consistent as regards the aspect of protection from hereditary diseases has to forbid a lot of relationships and thus get into conflict with the right to self determination." 
 If the proposition are right, and there is fundamentally nothing wrong with incestuous relationships, and that many involving those over the age of consent contain true consensual love between two people, then why exclude the possibility of father/daughter, mother/son, father/son, bestiality, and polygamous relationships? If all the principles they espouse are right, wouldn't forbidding these other relationships be arbitrary, unequal treatment, and discriminatory? Once you open the gate to incest, many other gates will have to be opened as well. 
 Banning incest because of the potential for the abuse of power in family relationships is wrong-headed. The potential for the abuse of power exists in all relationships: between boss and worker, between clever and not so clever. We do not try to control what should happen in those examples, because they are adults, free to live their own lives and make their own decisions. Should the state intervene to stop the union of the Nobel Prize winner and her secretary, or the physically strong construction worker and the physically week office administrator, because of a potential ‘abuse of power’? No. Neither should it be the case with incestuous relationships. Additionally, there is no defined power relationship--in any other aspect of life--between a father and adult daughter or between a mother and adult son. As they are legally equals in all other aspects of life there is no reason to treat them as anything other than equals in the area of sexuality.
 The case against incestuous couples relies too much on speculation about worst-case scenarios in which poor judgment and corrupt morals lead to abuse in the relationship. Yet, most of these problems have nothing to do with incestuous couples specifically and could apply to any family. In any family, one family member could be abusive. In any relationship, one member could abuse power and possibly force another member into sex without consent. It is wrong, therefore, to cite abuse in incestuous families as an example of the corruption of incest itself, when such abuse is consistent with what occurs in traditional families as well. It is important to, instead of considering bad-apple scenarios, to consider if incest can be just in isolation of unrelated issues. This means that the best-case scenarios (in which all else is equal) should be considered for the purpose of developing incest law. This reveals that there are many successful, happy, and fairly ordinary incestuous couples and families living in society today, and that a ban is unnecessary. 
 It is easy to confuse adult incest with abusive forms of incest; such as intragenerational incest between a father an his 14 year-old daughter. Incest between consenting adults is much different than these abusive forms of incest, which are wrong and will always remain unlawful. The proposal is only to legalize consensual adult incest, keeping all other laws in place to check abusive, non-consensual acts.
 Many sibling relationships involve considerable power. Much older siblings have power over younger siblings. When one or both parents die or are ill or are often away from the family unit, an older sibling often takes on a pseudo-parental role in nurturing and caring for the younger. This is more important than other power relationship parallels, such as boss-worker, since in this one children can be groomed so that when they reach adulthood their impression of sexuality is distorted to the degree that they cannot but approve of incest. The age restriction may prevent penetrative sex between siblings when one or both are underage (but given that it will be seen as less serious in an environment in which incest is approved, even this is less certain). However, kissing and cuddling (in a different context, the natural displays of familial affection) can be used over years on an underage person to ensure that their view of sexuality is firmly based on a sexualised family environment and to ensure that, by the time they do come ‘of age,’ that they are firmly on the path to commit incest. 
  Janis Tyler Johnson. "Mothers of Incest Survivors". October, 1992  - "The mothers [of incest survivors] described a 'world of the father', a world that extended from the private domain of the family to the larger, public, societal domain. In this world men had the right to do what they wanted."   
 Those most likely to take up the ‘opportunities’ offered by this change in the law live in remote, isolated places where abuse is even more likely to be successfully concealed. The recent case of repeated sexual abuse on the island of Pitcairn demonstrates the dangers of small societies determining their own moral agenda. This kind of abuse becomes much more likely when the state sanctions some of the acts concerned, as the argument becomes about lack of consent, which is much more difficult to prove, than about incest itself.
 It is true that very few people are affected by an incest ban, but minorities deserve protection just like everyone else, and often need it more.
 It is foolish to suggest that incest does not occur already. If we acknowledge this reality, we can ensure that those currently involved in it can obtain those things everyone else can get – counselling for their relationship, for example. As it is currently illegal, people are unwilling to seek such aid. If the proposition is to be believed, these individuals particularly need such help.
 The children of incestuous parents are much more likely to see incest as acceptable and to, therefore, engage in incest themselves. The problem with this is that second-generation incest is even more likely to involve medical and genetic problems. Third-generation incest is even more risky, and so on. Therefore, incest is an unsustainable social model. To this extent, a ban on incest is good social, public policy. And, to the extent that incest is bad for society and its collective interests, incest is immoral.
 Multiple studies show that the risk of defects among the offspring of first cousins is roughly 7%. This is only roughly 3% or 4% higher than the general populations risks of reproducing defectively, which is roughly 3% or 4%. While this represents a rough doubling of risks, it is still a relatively low and tolerable percentage.
 It is impossible to effectively ban incest. Couples have been engaging in the practice for centuries. This is partly because family members have always been capable of falling deeply in love. The love felt between many incestuous couples could not possibly be broken by any law banning it. And enforcing such a ban is simply not possible, as it is fairly easy to hide an incestuous relationship. Such a failure to enforce the law undermines the law itself.
 Most incestuous couples are just like other people, abide by all laws, pay their taxes, and perform good deeds. Sending these people to prison for their convictions to love another human being, who happens to be a blood relative, looks bad for the state and the law.
 The law should not consider the expediency of enforcement. The question is only whether a law is just. In the case of incest, a ban is just for the reasons presented here, so is justified. It does not matter that enforcement of the law may be difficult or appear harsh on those that violate the law. If individuals decide that they are above the law and able to violate it, they should be punished in the same way as any other individual.
 Incestuous defendants in a 2007 case in Cincinnati, USA wrote: "Our view of Lawrence is a fairly narrow one, that there is a Constitutional right under the 14th Amendment's due process clause that says private consensual activity between adults cannot be criminal." [2] 
 The individual and family should generally have the ability to choose its own course. In general, if consenting individuals choose to start a family together (incestuously) this private family affair should be allowed to occur free of government intervention.
 Kissing and cuddling (in a different context, the natural displays of familial affection) can be used over years on an underage person to ensure that their view of sexuality is firmly based on a sexualised family environment and to ensure that, by the time they do come ‘of age,’ that they are firmly on the path to commit incest. Therefore, an adult raised in an incestuous environment is not really a consenting incestuous adult, but rather an individual indoctrinated in incestuous behavior without full consent. 
 Consent is not the only criteria for the legality of actions. Consenting adults do not have a right to act in ways that harm others. Much of the case demonstrates the harms involved, such as the risks for the offspring, for the family institution, and for social sustainability in general. 
 Incest has been bashed for centuries by society. But, beyond repeating the mantra that it is "unnatural and contrary to the history and tradition of the family institution", there is not much substantive argument surrounding why incest between consenting adults is supposed to be wrong. Yes, reproduction between blood relatives does contain some risks, but is there a well-founded argument against its morality beyond this? Not really. If two individuals deeply love one another, why is wrong for them to follow their desire?
 There are many things that are immoral that are still legal. Adultery, for instance, is typically legal, although it is widely considered immoral. Similarly, incest cannot be illegal merely because it is considered immoral. It must have some significant harmful effect, for which this side argues it does not.
 The case against incest is based on an application of biblical rules that have little to do with today’s inclusive and tolerant principles. Modern citizens must learn to live with people who perform deeds they consider abhorrent, but which do not directly harm other individuals. Citizens can certainly protest, but to ban outright a certain practice on the simple basis of "immorality" is unacceptable in modern democracies.
 The state and society should not engage itself too deeply in setting moral standards for other citizens. Morality is often in the eye of the beholder, particularly when it comes to love and sex. Incestuous couples should be left alone to follow their own moral code.
  "Sexual Ethics: Consensual Incest". A Nadder. October 13th, 2008 - "It's universally condemned -- this was also used against interracial marriage etc. Again: so what? And again: no it isn't. It's universal to have some kind of incest taboo, but the limits vary a lot. In many cultures it's common for first cousins to marry (with up to 50% of marriages being between first cousins)." 
 The case against incest is certainly not merely biblical, but it exists in almost all religions for the very sound reason that it it undermines so many fundamental values and morals in society: the integrity of the family institution, the integrity of the institution of marriage, the safety of children from abuse and molestation, the health of offspring, among other tangible and moral damages discussed below. There is more than a ‘yuck’ factor to this: but the instinctive ‘yuck’ we feel for some things is often rooted in the fact that it is dangerous or bad for us/those around us. The wisdom of the ages should not be ignored. The overall moral abhorrence of incest justifies society setting a clear moral line against it with a ban.
 The children of incestuous parents are much more likely to see incest as acceptable and to, therefore, engage in incest themselves. The problem with this is that second-generation incest is even more likely to involve medical and genetic problems. Third-generation incest is even more risky, and so on. Therefore, incest is an unsustainable social model. To this extent, a ban on incest is good social, public policy. And, to the extent that incest is bad for society and its collective interests, incest is immoral.
Debate: Gun control  for an extensive array of arguments related generally to whether gun ownership should be limited or not. The hand-gun debate page here will focus on specific arguments related to hand-guns and the notion of a hand-gun ban.
Debate: Gun control  for an extensive array of arguments related generally to whether gun ownership should be limited or not. The hand-gun debate page here will focus on specific arguments related to hand-guns and the notion of a hand-gun ban.
  John F. Knutsen. "Direct Democracy." 1993 : "One objection to widespread use of direct democracy concerns its alleged high direct costs. According to  Kendall and Louw (Kendall, 1989, page 135) , the Swiss Federal  chancellery estimates the costs of a national initiative combined with a federal counterproposal to about 1 Swiss franc per voter. Even when special ballots have to be held to decide single issues, the costs are modest. In California such a special ballot was held in 1973. It cost the state about USD 20 million, or about 80 cents (USD 0.80) per capita.  (Walker, page 93) . In addition to the direct costs incurred by the government, comes the costs associated with launching an initiative. In Switzerland this cost is estimated to at least one franc per petition signature  (Junker, page 122) . In California initiative campaigns cost several million dollars. In per capita terms however, these costs are still marginal, which is why this method of making decisions is so effective. Even if we assume that the Swiss spend a few million francs (everything included) on national issues every year, this has to be compared with a Swiss federal budget of about 23 billion francs (1985)  (Junker, page 40) ." 
 "Direct democracy becomes too costly in other than very small political units when more than a few isolated issues must be considered. The costs of decision-making become too large relative to the possible reductions in expected external costs that collective action might produce." (Buchanan, J.M. and Tullock, G. (1962) The Calculus of Consent:Logical foundations of constitutional democracy )
 Direct democracy works on a small system. For example, the Athenian Democracy governed a city of, at its height, about 30,000 eligible voters (free adult male citizens.) Town meetings, a form of local government once common in New England, has also worked well, often emphasizing consensus over majority rule. The use of direct democracy on a larger scale has historically been more difficult, however. It requires intricate communication and information-campaigns, all which are expensive, complicated, and prone to break-downs of various kinds.
 As  Lupia and Mc Cubbins  argue, voters do not necessarily need perfect information to make reasonable decisions. They can rely on information shortcuts and cues - and even if they are sometimes affected by their emotions their decisions do not have to be worse than the politicians' ones. As an example we can look to Switzerland where direct democracy works perfectly well as the people are able to decide even on complex issues regarding taxes or other "complicated" policies.
 While politicians try to determine what's in the best interests of citizens, citizens themselves are better at making these kinds of determinations.
 Arizona State Rep. Kyrsten Sinema said in 2008 in regards to initiatives intended to ban racial quotas: "People have a right to sign a petition, hear the arguments and then vote." [2] 
 It is certainly true that direct democracy requires that citizens participate actively in the political process and that they inform themselves on the issues surrounding them. This creates a strong incentive for citizens to inform themselves on the important issues of the day. 
 Citizens identify themselves more closely with the government policies when they are allowed to cast votes. Only when they do so is the government a "government by the people, of the people and for the people." This is not a privilege for citizens. It is a responsibility. 
 The people are right when they oppose a policy in their neighbourhood that would worsen their quality of life. The politicians who advocate new nuclear power plants or motorways are usually unwilling to have them at their own back-garden; why should the ordinary people be different? In summary, NIMBYism is beneficial for society because it prevents wrong decisions made by people who wouldn't have to carry the burden of living in a particular area.
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "a small minority of the total number of the voters and human nature being what it is probably a large proportion of the signers have not got the slightest knowledge of what they signed It is notorious that men can be easily persuaded to sign petitions for almost anything."
 Voters tend to look after their self-interests, rather than the bigger picture of what needs doing. NIMBYism ("Not in my back yard" thinking) is an example of this, where voters avoid making personal sacrifices in "their own back yard" even if the sacrifices are essential to the common good.
 The average voter may not be interested in politics and therefore may not participate. In a system with citizen initiatives and direct democracy, high voter apathy may make the subsequent decisions unrepresentative of broader public opinion or possibly just bad policy. 
 When presented with a single yes/no question, usually without any information on the issue at hand, people tend to make spur-of-the-moment decisions based on emotions, driven by anger, fear and hatred. For example, in the first Irish referendum on Lisbon Treaty, 15% (!) of the voters made up their mind on the day of the referendum itself.  [3] 
 The problem with direct democracy is that the general public can hardly ever think about the issues at hand in the long-term. People may be aware of the fact that something needs to be done about some burning issue, however, they are unwilling to propose any plan if it entails some discomfort to them. An example of this is called NIMBYism: "Not In My Backyard" point of view. In practise it occurs when a broadly necessary thing, such as wind-turbines, are rejected "in my back-yard" due to selfish interests. Elected leaders can help push these kinds of necessary decisions through.
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "There seems to be little capacity for discrimination [in Direct Democracy]. Again very radical measures and many indeed of dangerous tendencies are not always rejected by the people or if they are there are not a few cases in which this result seems to have been brought about by accident rather than by serious moral purpose."
 Once elected, representatives are free to act as they please. Promises made before the election are often broken, and they frequently act contrary to the wishes of their electorate. Although theoretically it is possible to have a representative democracy in which the representatives can be recalled at any time; in practice this is usually not the case. 
 Elected individuals frequently appoint people to high positions based on their mutual loyalty, as opposed to their competence. And, these appointed officials are not appointed by citizens and cannot be recalled by them. In a direct democracy, these officials would be elected by, and could be recalled by, citizens. This means that these officials are much more accountable to citizens and the democratic process. [6] 
 One of the key pillars of democracy is accountability for decisions that are made. Such accountability exists in a representative democracy, where an elected representative that passes a bill will face the consequences or rewards of the outcome. The voters can vote against the leader in the subsequent election, and generally take actions that hold the leader to account. In a direct democracy of course, conversely, the broad base of voters cannot be held to account for any bad decisions they collectively make.
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "the advantage of havingureeeived careful scrutiny and the safe guard of having to pass through several Commit tees."
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "A leading candidate for the Presidential non ination G ov Woodrow Wilson one of our most i learned University educators says that it has dulled the sense of responsibility among legislators without in fact quickening the people to the exercise of any real control of affairs." 
 Thomas Jefferson once said: "Men by their makeup are naturally divided into two camps: those who fear and distrust the people and wish to draw all powers from them into the hands of higher classes; and those who identify themselves with the people, have confidence in them, cherish and consider them the safest and most honest, if not always the wisest repository of the public interest. These two camps exist in every country, and wherever men are free to think, speak, and write, they will identify themselves." [7] 
 Direct democracy was mainly opposed by the framers of the United States Constitution and some signers of the Declaration of Independence. They saw a danger in majorities forcing their will on minorities. As a result, they advocated a representative democracy in the form of a constitutional republic over a direct democracy, and gave the Congress sole legislative authority in the first article of the Constitution: "All legislative powers herin granted shall be vested in a Congress of the United States, which should consist of a Senate and House of Representatives." [8] 
 The famous French philosopher and revolutionary wrote: "No act of theirs can be a law unless it is ratified by the people in person; and without that ratification nothing is a law." [9] 
 Initiatives, recalls, and referenda are the ultimate opportunity to the citizens to say "Hang on a minute, this is not in my interest at all", and for citizens to directly shape the policies that affect them. This is the ultimate form of democracy, and is certainly more democratic than a pure representative democracy.
 The formation of political parties is considered by some to be a "necessary evil" of representative democracy, where combined resources are often needed to get candidates elected. However, such parties mean that individual representatives must compromise their own values and those of the electorate, in order to fall in line with the party platform. In direct democracy, political parties have virtually no effect, as people do not need to conform with popular opinions. [5] 
 Given that voters decide on single issues instead of a package of policies that might not fully be in the voters' interests, the people are freer to choose what is the best for them. In a representative democracy, however, these package deals are usually comprehensive programmes that are altered  after  the elections are held. That means that politicians from the parties that form a government are free to choose which part of each package works the best - for them.
 In a representative democracy, laws in the parliamentary bodies undergo a lot of scrutiny, repeated rewritings, curbings, mitigations and other checks that in the end, the law that is passed is usually okay on principle with most of the representatives. These represent all kinds of voters -- and indeed, a democratic decision is one that implements the majority decision while keeping all minority rights, even though the result of that may be a little hard to read. However, direct democracy and its means (mostly referenda) need simplification (commonly to yes/no questions). As a result, most things passed by measures of direct democracy are unbalanced and that very often, measures of direct democracy contribute to majority rule without any respect for the minority. 
 ("Teach Yourself: Politics", Peter Joyce): "In some countries (such as France) they were deliberately introduced to weaken the power of parliament. Although they can be reconciled with the concept of parliamentary sovereignty when they are consultative and do not require the legislature to undertake a particular course of action, it is difficult to ignore the outcome of a popular vote when it does not theoretically tie the hands of public policy makers." 
 "Competing groups in a referendum do not necessarily possess equality in the resources which they have at their disposal and this may give one side an unfair advantage over the other in putting its case across to the electorate. This problem is accentuated if the government contributes to the financing of one side's campaign, as occured in the early stages of the 1995 Irish referendum on divorce." ("Teach Yourself: Politics", Peter Joyce)
 As the post-referendum survey in Ireland shows, one of the reasons people voted against the Lisbon Treaty was that some of them saw it as a good way to protest against the government's policies (instead of a reason one might expect - that they were against the treaty itself).
 Individuals elected to office in a representative democracy tend not to be demographically representative of their constituency. They tend to be wealthier and more educated, and are also more predominantly male as well as members of the majority race, ethnic group, and religion than a random sample would produce. They also tend to be concentrated in certain professions, such as lawyers. Elections by district may reduce, but not eliminate, those tendencies, in a segregated society. Direct democracy would be inherently representative, assuming universal suffrage (where everyone can vote).
 Politicians are the victims of many things: be it their selfish interest (or bias) which may result in rearing to corruption, or just the pressure that rich and well-organized interest groups exert to persuade the politician that it is in his electorate's interest to pass (or vote down) the legislature in a move which is in all actuality detrimental to the majority of his voters (see a book by Fareed Zakaria  Illiberal Democracy Home and Abroad ). That means that often the politicians do not represent the people of the electorate, and thus act in contradiction to democracy. Direct democracy places a check on these shortcomings.
 Another objection to direct democracy is that of practicality and efficiency. Deciding all or most matters of public importance by direct referendum is slow and expensive (especially in a large community), and can result in public apathy and voter fatigue, especially when repeatedly faced with the same questions or with questions which are unimportant to the voter. [4] 
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "The greatest of our American authorities Prof Oberholtzer says in the new edition 1911 of The Referendum in America that it will make officials timid shambling ineffective men."
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "the modern Initiative is far inferior in principle to the ancient Pure Democracy for the latter theoretically anyhow possessed the principle of majority rule.[...] The authority to formulate a law is equal to the power to pass it if the latter power does not include the right to change it or amend it before it is passed. Therefore under the Initiative and Referendum the majority 92 or 95 per cent find themselves in this predicament they must either accept the bill which the 8 per cent has drafted for them on its own motion and without consulting any other authority or proportion of citizens. The majority must either do this or they must succumb to Philosophic Anarchism, the absence of any Law except that of the individual will." 
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "An overwhelming objection to the system is that wherever it has been tried it has resulted in minority rule Even in Switzerland the most favorable State possible for the system Direct Legislation is always by minorities."
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "citizens take far greater interest the election of men than they do in the passage Laws All observers native and foreign are impressed with the apathy of voters to the propositions submitted to them." 
 The concentration of power intrinsic to representative government is seen by some as tending to create corruption. In direct democracy, the possibility for corruption is reduced. 
 The interests of elected representatives do not necessarily correspond with those of their constituents. An example is that representatives often get to vote to determine their own salaries. It is in their interest that the salaries be high, while it is in the interest of the electorate that they be as low as possible, since they are funded with tax revenue. The typical results of representative democracy are that their salaries relatively high.
 There are examples of recall elections being launched against elected officials that are corruptly conceived by smear campaigns that have a particular interest at heart, and are willing to spend massive amounts of money to convince the public of false rumors. This is just as problematic as other instances of corruption that can come from the actions of elected officials themselves.
  James Boyle. "The initiative and referendum: its folly, fallacies, and failure." (1912) : "Not only is the Initiative and Referendum a game of dice against the unorganized majority but it is a cruel handicap and an eternal danger to unorganized minorities who are dumb and helpless against others of their fellow citizens who are organized and are possibly not as considerate of the rights of others as they ought to be. One of the glorious advantages of the Representative system is that it tends to protect the rights of the otherwise helpless minorities No system of government is truly democratic which does not do that." 
 Under non-voucher education systems, citizens that currently pay for private schooling are still charged taxes that are used to fund public schools. Their cost for education is, therefore, two-fold as they are funding both public and private schools simultaneously. Vouchers are designed to provide citizens freedom to spend their tax money as they choose for the type of school they want for their children, avoiding such double taxation.
 Education vouchers localize accountability as opposed to relying on central government standards. This means that the education of children is controlled more by the desires of a community - as it should be - and less by the whims of a central government.
 Incentives to improve schools can be introduced without drammatically changing the whole system of publicly run education. Generally, it keeps everything the same while adding choice, and a sort of free-market competitive mentality. In this mentality, very little regulations are introduced that would weigh down the educational system. Independence and flexibility is maintained. [14]  Furthermore, the public nature of public schools is maintained, with appropriate national standards, but simply with the beneficial introduction of competition into the system through vouchers.
 Another argument against the implementation of a school voucher system is its lack of accountability to the taxpayer. In many states, members of a community's board of education are elected by voters. Similarly, a school budget faces a referendum. Meetings of the Board of Education must be announced in advance, and members of the public are permitted to voice their concerns directly to board members. Although vouchers may be used in private and religious schools, taxpayers are not able to vote on budgetary issues, elect members of the board or even attend board meetings. Opponents of vouchers assert that this disenfranchisement amounts to taxation without representation.  
 Education vouchers erode educational standards by allowing public funding to go to private programs that may not reflect strong national educational standards. School vouchers also decentralize control over schools, creating a scattering of programs, instead of a core educational standard based on our highest educational ideals. It is generally important that schools be held accountable to a single national standard, but education vouchers have the potential to undermine such a standard and the ability to hold schools to account on a national scale. 
 Under a student voucher system, where demand exists for education from the parents that would rather attend a different school, entrepreneurs are free to open and invest in new schools to accommodate demand. Supply demand, in this sense, is generally a good thing in its own right. People that want something are happier if someone is allowed to fulfill their desires. But this is only possible under a student voucher system, where students can move freely between schools and schools are free to accommodate this fluid demand.
 State-run schools are more expensive per head than private equivalents. Large government-run bureaucracies are notoriously inefficient. Even without voucher schemes many private schools currently charge less per head than the funding state schools receive - evidence that education can be provided more efficiently by the private sector. [3] 
 Education does not fit well into a fungible supply/demand system. The main reason is that the supply of schools cannot adjust quickly to year-to-year changes in demand. Schools cannot be built overnight or within even a single year. And, schools cannot rapidly adjust their budgets because demand rises and falls dramatically from one year to the next, via school vouchers. Schools are, rather, long-term investments for long-term demographic trends, with the objective of supplying the public with a stable public good - education. This stable supply of education should not be subjected to the whims of shifts in year-to-year demand. 
 Private sector schools require extra funds as the profit motive has to be met. They are, therefore, not necessarily cheaper for the taxpayer. Vouchers that go toward private schools may, therefore, simply go toward lining the pockets of the investors of private schools. This is neither a fair nor an efficient use of taxpayer money.
 The main argument here is that vouchers are only individual aid, giving individuals the choice to go to a religious school, but of course not mandating that they do so. Vouchers, therefore, can only indirectly support religious schools, and so should not be as a violation of the Establishment clause and the separation of church and state. 
 The inclusion in 1998 of religious private schools in the Milwaukee voucher program led to more than a three-fold increase in the number of private schools and almost a four-fold increase in the number of choice students, and to a further improvement of the public schools.
 Education is used to inculcate values that the society believes in and to promote social and civic awareness. Religious schools promoting anti-female policies, for example, should not be receiving taxpayer funding in the form of vouchers. This violates the constitutional separation of church and state. State funds cannot be separated from state control. It matters not whether the state is not directly making the choice to fund religious schools. Taxpayer funds should not be allowed to be directed toward religious schools. [15] 
 The Liberty and Democracy Party of Australia supports vouchers as a stepping-stone to abolishing public schools. LDP spokesman Shem Bennett said, "Initially some public schools would remain. But under the LDP’s plan, schools would slowly privatise and diversify as there’d be no need for government ownership." [12]  This is a good thing because privatized schools are more efficient and cost-effective, delivering a higher quality education product at lower costs. An additional reason is that privatized schools are more agile in meeting the demands of local community members. Public schools, driven by national standards, are not as reflective of the educational preferences of local communities.
 The argument that education is a private good is based on the failure to differentiate education from public education. Education refers merely to the teaching of individual students for their own benefit. Public education refers to the goal of educating the entire public for their own benefit and the benefit of society as a whole. Looked at from this point of view, public education is a public good. This interpretation is arrived at by looking at society as a whole as benefiting from the education (or suffering from the lack of education) of its citizens.
 Under a 'market' system there is no guarantee that school places will be provided in isolated areas where there are not enough pupils to justify private investment or that schools will accept disabled pupils, whose education may require more funds than the voucher provides. [13] 
 Competition through free market capitalism would increase the quality of education for both private and public education sectors as it has for higher education with publicly funded state universities directly competing against private universities. Also, similar competition has helped in manufacturing, energy, transportation, and parcel postal (UPS, FedEx vs. USPS) sectors of government that have been socialized and later opened up to free market competition.
 Under a voucher system, successful schools would attract students, while bad schools would be forced to reform or close. 
 Many state schools are failing and a voucher system provides an escape valve for students that would otherwise be locked into unfortunate circumstances. Children are locked into bad schools, particularly in inner-city and under-privileged areas. Parents must be given the opportunity to escape from bad state education systems if educational standards are to improve. [9] 
 The key difference between a k-12 and a University system is that the U.S. University system receives a substantial portion of its funding from students and subsidies to students in the form of scholarships, government grants, and subsidized loans. This is argued to be conceptually equivalent to school vouchers because the money is provided ultimately to the student and in such a way that the student's ability to choose between schools is maintained. Because choice is maintained, universities must compete harder to attract students, which many proponents argue is the key ingredient in the relative success of the Universities system over the K-12 system. Thus, some argue that a similar competition-inducing approach should be taken with the K-12 system through school vouchers. [10] 
 Vouchers allow individual school cultures to develop, enabling teachers to choose schools that promote teaching approaches that match their teaching styles, and enable students/parents to choose schools that match the students learning styles and abilities. 
 As schools work to attract particular kinds of pupils, variety and choice within the education system is increased. [11] 
 Some pupils will always end up stuck in dying, under-funded schools because over-subscribed schools cannot expand fast enough. Vouchers worsen this problem by subjecting these schools to competition, which they will fail against. Such schools and the students that have no choice to attend these schools - because there is no space in other schools or for other reasons - will simply lose out more.
 Some economist critics point to the problem of "cream skimming," a variety of adverse selection in the educational market. With a greater pool of applicants, the private schools could be more selective over which students to admit, excluding those who do not belong to a preferred group (for instance, religion or ethnicity), those with disabilities such as autism or multiple sclerosis, and those with disciplinary problems. By law, the public schools must accept any student. So that they would presumably end up with all students whom the private schools turn away for such reasons. This would likely further undermine the reputation and competitiveness of the public schools, leading to a vicious circle that tends toward the total abolition of the public schools and perhaps the end of universal education.
 Education vouchers erode educational standards by allowing public funding to go to private programs that may not reflect strong national educational standards. School vouchers also decentralize control over schools, creating a scattering of programs, instead of a core educational standard based on our highest educational ideals. 
 One reason given for being allowed to choose private schools is the belief that private schools offer better education – a belief disputed by the United States Department of Education in their 2006 study of the public education they oversee. There is no conclusive evidence that private schools necessarily produce better test results or more successful human beings.
  "The Case Against Vouchers". National Education Association : "NEA and its affiliates support direct efforts to improve public schools. There is no need to set up new threats to schools for not performing. What is needed is help for the students, teachers, and schools who are struggling."
 Any loss of supply and demand for public institutions would be offset and equalized by the increased demand for private institutions. For example, if the demand for private schools increased, they would need to hire more teachers and staff to compensate for their increased growth, so any jobs lost from the public sector would be offset by jobs gained in the private sector.
 Student vouchers cost public teachers their jobs as students leave public schools for private schools with their vouchers. 
 Parents and students have a right to choose what school they will attend. Forcing a child to attend a public school, even if it is not a healthy and productive environment for them, is wrong. Vouchers afford children and their parents are right to choose which school best fits their needs and desires. It affords greater decision-making power and freedom to citizens, instead of the state, on a matter of tremendous importance to their lives and futures. This is righteous in principle.
 It is true that private schools can deny students they believe to be unqualified. Nevertheless, vouchers generally improve student and parent choice and access to private schools by making it more affordable. Vouchers need not make student access 100% perfect. It is enough that it simply improves choice and access.
 Parents who have greater choice are more likely to be involved in their children's schooling. Vouchers demand that a parent choose and control paying for the education of their children, thus initiating their involvement in their child's education. 
 The voucher program in New Zealand benefited students in both the private and public schools by putting funding in the hands of students and parents instead of bureaucrats. Parents will almost always make a better decision in choosing a school. The success of education vouchers in New Zealand is a good example of what it can achieve elsewhere in the world.
 New Zealand's education vouchers worked.
 Vouchers do not provide all public school students with a choice to attend private schools. Private schools can, inherently, deny applicants entry. The main problem with this is that many of the most needy disadvantaged groups are already being turned away by private schools, so education vouchers may not provide them with any greater choice or access to private schools. Public schools are open to all students, and this is why the disadvantaged should be helped through the public school system.
 Voucher competition between public school districts spurs public schools to improve student outcomes. In Chile, attending a private school subsidized by vouchers is associated with increased standardized test scores. 
 Children that op-out of schools that are not serving them well are more likely to graduate than those who remain at schools that are failing them. [7]  In Columbia, for example, school voucher programs were reported to have increased secondary school completion rates by 15-20%.  [8] 
 In Chicago, there is little evidence that attending school choice programs provides any benefit on a wide variety of traditional academic measures, including standardized test scores, attendance rates, course-taking, and credit accumulation. In the Netherlands, where parents are free to choose the school for their children, higher competition is associated with lower student achievement in upper secondary education. 
 Nobel Prize winning economist Milton Friedman argued for the modern concept of vouchers in the 1950s, stating that competition would improve schools and cost efficiency. They introduce competition by giving parents and students the choice to leave bad schools in favor of better schools. This compares to the far less competitive status quo situation in which students are locked into schools in their district. The argument goes that competition forces schools to act more resourcefully, creatively, and efficiently as a means of enhancing their competitiveness relative to other schools. If they do not do this, they will be less competitive, lose attendance and tuition, lose quality students and teachers, and possibly be forced to close. In short, vouchers introduce competition, which provides an incentive to increase efficiency and effectiveness.
 Schools that face choice-based incentives must increase the quality of the education they provide, which causes them to seek and keep better teachers and hold bad teachers to account. If they do not do this, they will lose students and tuition, and may be forced to close. Vouchers, therefore, provide an incentive for schools to increase the quality of the education they offer, which improves student achievement and success, and generally improves the long-term economic vibrancy of a nation.
 Cooperation between schools, city and local officials, communities, and educational groups is the best way to improve schools. It ensures that information and resources are shared and that everyone works together to improve the educational system collectively. Competition is much the opposite. It ensures that school administrators do not share information that may undermine their "competitiveness" and distracts attention away from the most important thing - how to best educate children - and focuses more on how to out-compete other schools. When combined with testing regimes (such as exists in No Child Left Behind), it often creates a perverse obsession with "teaching to the test" as a means of producing a higher average test score compared to other schools. This may have no relation to the quality of an education.
 Public schools are unlikely to be able to respond to increased competitive pressure generated by vouchers. [2]  This is not the fault of public schools - they are not designed to "compete". Public schools are designed to provide an education that reflects the educational priorities of a society; this is not something that competition can necessarily foster. Private schools often have a very different mission and are designed to compete, in some case purely for profit. It is wrong to attempt to mix non-competitive public schools and competitive private schools in a competitive voucher system. Obviously, public schools will lose, undermining the common values driving the public education system. 
 School vouchers allow for greater economic diversity by offering lower income students opportunities to attend previously unaffordable private schools. School voucher proponent and Nobel Prize winning economist Milton Friedman observed that the poor have an incentive to support school choice, as their children attend substandard schools, and would thus benefit most from alternative schools and access to private schools. In turn, increasing the poor's access to better schools helps increase their chances of success and decreases inequality.
 There may be small achievement gains in mathematics for the African-American and Hispanic children who use vouchers. The main reason is that it increases access to better schools and better educations, which are a key factor in improving academic achievement.
 Some proponents of school vouchers, including the Sutherland Institute and many supporters of the Utah voucher effort, see it as a remedy for historic cultural genocide committed against demographic minorities by compulsory public schools. This is because public school standards and tests are established, usually, by non-minorities that are insensitive to the different cultures of minorities. They insensitivities ultimately undermine these minority cultures, sometimes intentionally, in a form of "cultural genocide". Vouchers offer choices and alternatives that counter the monopoly of public school standard-bearers and those committing "cultural genocide".
 The division between private and public schools is very prominent in society, based largely on the socio-economic ability of parents. Vouchers help combat this by providing disadvantaged groups with the opportunity to attend private schools. [4] 
 Because private schools can exclude students, even ones with vouchers, there is a tendency for them to exclude certain socio-economic, ethnic, or disabled groups. Vouchers do not help prevent such exclusion and discrimination.  
  "The Case Against Vouchers". National Education Association : "A pure voucher system would only encourage economic, racial, ethnic, and religious stratification in our society. America's success has been built on our ability to unify our diverse populations." The general logic for this is that vouchers would often be used by parents and students to attend schools with like-minded students, whether black, hispanic, catholic, or disabled. They, therefore, allow for the separation of groups, and the problems of misunderstanding and division that follow as a result.
  "The Case Against Vouchers". National Education Association  - "Americans want consistent standards for students. Where vouchers are in place -- Milwaukee, Cleveland, and Florida -- a two-tiered system has been set up that holds students in public and private schools to different standards." 
 A voucher system that offers choice to parents is used most by affluent parents that are already engaged in the education of their students and whom would prefer that their child leave a failing school. Poor and disadvantaged parents are less likely to take advantage of vouchers. The result is that affluent students go to better schools, while poor and disadvantaged students generally stay in underperforming schools. Instead of helping the disadvantaged, vouchers actually end up leaving them behind. [5] 
 Voucher are like a discount coupon for those who can already afford the full cost of a private school education. According to the National Conference of State Legislatures, 76% of the money handed out for Arizona’s voucher program has gone to children already in private schools. [6] 
 The UN General Assembly Resolution 1514 (The Declaration Granting Independence to Colonial Countries and Peoples), the Helsinki Act and the African Charter of Human Rights all assert that self-determination is an important right. Without the ability to actively partake in citizenship activities – primarily voting for their own government - indigenous peoples are oppressed.
 In Africa, European colonists exploited the mineral resources such as copper and diamonds. Land was effectively stolen from Native peoples; Self-determination and independence would offer recognition of the fact that they were unfairly treated and their proprietary rights abused. 
 In the post-Cold War Era we are moving away from nationalist ideology. The international community has frowned upon the rise of ethnic nationalism in Europe. The breakdown of Yugoslavia is indicative of how dangerous and destructive ethno-nationalism can be. Nationalism is about difference, which flies in the face of the idea of the global citizen. Nationalist causes are often pursued by violent terrorist organisations that ought not to be rewarded for their disregard of human life. By trying to recognise minority rights governments run the risk of treating people differently and giving minorities preferential treatment at the expense of the majority. National borders are becoming less significant definers of identity; Irish Americans, British Muslims, Catholic Africans and French-Speaking Arabs are all cogent identities. Boundaries are not the solution to the fear of the threat of cultural dilution or oppression.
 Ethnic groups were split and divided. In the post-colonial environment, these borders are inappropriate and are not "true" nations. Self-determination would enable a shift back to genuine associations. Nations of the world can only have self-determination if they have statehood.
 In Gibraltar the people are campaigning for the autonomy and authority to elect to remain British and not to rejoin with Spain. Self-determination is about representation and identity and choice.
 The 1964 Organisation of African Unity (OAU) stated in the Cairo Resolution that it would accept the boundaries drawn by colonial powers. Governments ought to concentrate on bolstering states with civic identities. Federalism is one government structure that can accommodate self-determination within national boundaries. For example, in Canada, Quebec has relative autonomy including some native courts.
  Roger Cohen. "A Court for a New America". New York Times. 3 Dec. 2008  - "I can think of no better place for President-elect Barack Obama to start in signaling a changed American approach to the world, and particularly its European allies, than the International Criminal Court."
  Rebecca Roe. "The U.S. should embrace the international justice system". Seattle Times. 20 Sept 2007 : "The absence of U.S. participation in the ICC is an embarrassment. [...] To stand idly by is to suggest the slaughter of thousands of innocent people is not a moral transgression worthy of our time and effort."
 Without ratifying the Rome Treaty, the US cannot participate in reforming and improving the ICC how the US sees fit, voting on such things as its definition of "aggression". 
  Ian Williams. "Immune from prosecution". Salon. 16 June 2000  - "Other nations' delegations are aghast at what many frankly call the hypocrisy of the American position. After all, Congress vociferously wants international trials for prosecutions of Slobodan Milosevic and Saddam Hussein, not to mention Foday Sankoh from Sierra Leone, the leaders of Khmer Rouge from Cambodia and the Hutu genocide instigators from Rwanda -- and if they could get their hands on him, Moammar Gadhafi of Libya would certainly be dragged before the court [...] So committed is the United States to the principle of trials for all that it sent an army to Panama to bring back President Manuel Noriega to put him in the dock in Miami. But there is one major exception to this principle. We can try who we like, but don't anyone try to try one of ours. For the sake of that, the U.S. delegation is prepared to let a whole rogues' gallery run loose." 
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "The current U.S. policy about the use of military tribunals in the war against terrorism could lead to suggestions of a double standard on the part of the United States with respect to procedural safeguards in war crimes trials."
  Emma Bonino. "International Criminal Court Phobia". World Press Review. Apr. 2002  - "The resistance of the U.S. government to support the creation of an International Criminal Court has placed Washington at odds with 139 signatory nations and added a sharp bone of contention to its attempts at building a cohesive anti-terror coalition."
  Dennis Kucinich. "The US Administration and the ICC". Common Dreams. 9 Dec. 2004  - "The Administration has told the American people that it refuses to participate in the ICC in order to protect our troops from being brought to the Hague. [...] It is more likely that those whose protection the administrators seek wear not the uniform of our nation, but the business suits of top civilian government officials who wrap themselves in the flag and hide behind the troops while insisting upon impunity for the deadly consequences of their own political decisions."
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "A recent determination by the ICC’s Chief Prosecutor seems to demonstrate a reluctance to launch an investigation against the United States based on allegations regarding its conduct in Iraq." 
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "The ICC’s flaws may allow it to be used by some countries to bring trumped-up charges against American citizens, who, due to the prominent role played by the United States in world affairs, may have greater exposure to such charges than citizens of other nations."
  "Frequently Asked Questions About the U.S. Government's Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court (ICC)". State Department. 30 July 2003  - "Why does the U.S. think its people should be above the law?
  "Frequently Asked Questions About the U.S. Government's Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court (ICC)". State Department. 30 July 2003  - "How can the United States oppose prosecuting war criminals? [...] We do not oppose prosecuting war criminals. We have consistently led the effort to strengthen international justice and accountability."
  Roger Cohen. "A Court for a New America". New York Times. 3 Dec. 2008  - "After the terrible decade of the 1990s, with its genocides in Bosnia and Rwanda and the loss there of a million lives while the United States and its allies dithered, it is unconscionable that America not stand with the institution that constitutes the most effective legal deterrent to such crimes [...] The International Criminal Court has filed charges against alleged war criminals in Congo, Central African Republic, Uganda and Sudan since it started work in 2002. The first trial, involving a Congolese warlord, Thomas Lubanga, is set to begin in January."
  Amnesty International. The International Criminal Court, Fact Sheet  - "[The ICC] will serve as a permanent deterrent to people considering these crimes. In most cases in the last 50 years, international mechanisms to prosecute people accused of these crimes have been set up only after the crimes were committed"
  "Let the child live; International Criminal Court". The Economist. 27 Jan. 2007  - "Aged four-and-a-half, the tribunal is proving a lustier infant than many predicted. Its prosecutors have delved deeply into horrible wars in Congo, Sudan and Uganda. The court's first trial—of Thomas Lubanga, a Congolese warlord, accused of using children as soldiers—is due to start later this year. The first indictments for the mass killings in Sudan's Darfur region are expected next month. Five leaders of Uganda's rebel Lord's Resistance Army have already been indicted. One has since been killed, but the other four face trial when caught. An investigation into atrocities in a fourth, as yet unnamed, country is due to be announced soon."
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "The perceived U.S. willingness to hold U.N. peacekeeping missions hostage to U.S. demands for immunity from the ICC may deepen the rift between the United States and allies that support the ICC. The withholding of military assistance and other economic aid to members of the ICC may also be seen as an effort to coerce countries to refuse to ratify the Rome Statute or to sign an Article 98 agreement, which could appear to some as undermining the ICC and negating the Administration’s stated intent to respect the decisions of other countries to join the ICC." 
  John R. Bolton, Under Secretary for Arms Control and International Security. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "ICC will not help deter the danger of the ICC may lie in its potential weakness rather than its potential strength. The most basic error is the belief that the ICC will have a substantial deterrent effect against the perpetration of crimes against humanity. Behind their optimistic rhetoric, ICC proponents have not a shred of evidence supporting their deterrence theories. In fact, they fundamentally confuse the appropriate roles of political and economic power, diplomatic efforts, military force, and legal procedures. Recent history is filled with cases where even strong military force or the threat of force failed to deter aggression or gross abuses of human rights. ICC proponents concede as much when they cite cases where the "world community" has failed to pay adequate attention, or failed to intervene in time to prevent genocide or other crimes against humanity. The new Court and Prosecutor, it is said, will now guarantee against similar failures."
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "deterrence ultimately depends on perceived effectiveness, and the ICC fails badly on that point. The ICC’s authority is far too attenuated to make the slightest bit of difference either to the war criminals or to the outside world. In cases where the West in particular has been unwilling to intervene militarily to prevent crimes against humanity as they were happening, why will a potential perpetrator feel deterred by the mere possibility of future legal action? A weak and distant Court will have no deterrent effect on the hard men like Pol Pot most likely to commit crimes against humanity. Why should anyone imagine that bewigged judges in The Hague will succeed where cold steel has failed? Holding out the prospect of ICC deterrence to the weak and vulnerable amounts to a cruel joke."
 The ICC like the UN security council will become only a tool for protecting the rights and deeds of a few countries. Genocide in many regions is a problem indeed but the war crimes in Iraq and Afghanistan were never discussed in an international forum. Can this ICC actually check war crime in those countries? Obviously no! How can the US, for instance, join a court that will point out its own crimes? Even before attacking Iraq, the UN was made a tool to attack and not a place to have discussions and to avert war. Since its useless to create such a court in which propaganda, lobbying and influence of power will have the major role, the plan should be abandoned.
  David Scheffer. former US Ambassador at Large for War Crimes Issues (1997-2001). "The US and the International Criminal Court Then and Now". Jurist. 16 July 2008  - "In Washington many lost sight of the court’s aim to bring to justice political and military leaders who orchestrate massive atrocity crimes against thousands in lawless regions where national justice fails."
 Countries such as the United States have avoided joining the ICC out of concern for protecting its leaders from prosecution. Yet, the ICC is established only to prosecute the worst war criminals in fairly clear-cut cases. Therefore, unless the US or other countries plan on protecting war criminals in their midst, they have nothing to fear from the ICC.
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "We are considering, in the Prosecutor, a powerful and necessary element of executive power, the power of law-enforcement. Never before has the United States been asked to place any of that power outside the complete control of our national government without our consent. Our concern goes beyond the possibility that the Prosecutor will target for indictment the isolated U.S. soldier who violates our own laws and values by allegedly committing a war crime. Our principal concern is for our country’s top civilian and military leaders, those responsible for our defense and foreign policy. They are the ones potentially at risk at the hands of the ICC’s politically unaccountable Prosecutor, as part of an agenda to restrain American discretion, even when our actions are legitimated by the operation of our own constitutional system."
 National governments that oppose the ICC, such as the United States, are not attempting to protect guilty nationals, but preserve their national sovereignty to try these individuals. 
  Rebecca Roe. "The U.S. should embrace the international justice system". Seattle Times. 20 Sept 2007  - "The ICC, established in 2002, has a distinguished history. The permanent court arose from several temporary or ad hoc courts including Nuremberg (1945-1949), International Criminal Tribunal Yugoslavia (ICTY, 1995 to present), ICT-Rwanda (ongoing in Arusha, Tanzania) and Special Court Sierra Leone (SCSL, 1994-ongoing). The international courts prosecute genocide, ethnic cleansing, crimes against humanity, systematic rape, child soldiering and similar atrocities."
  Gary T. Dempsey. "Reasonable Doubt: The Case Against the Proposed International Criminal Court". CATO Institute. 16 July 1998  - "It is common for proponents of the ICC to argue that it will function like a permanent Nuremberg tribunal.2 In fact, the city of Nuremberg, where 21 Nazis stood trial for their role in the deaths of more than 20 million people, is mounting a serious campaign to be the permanent home of the proposed court.3 Yet according to John R. Bolton, former assistant secretary of state for international organization affairs, the Nuremberg comparison does not withstand close inspection: "Whenever the idea of a war crimes tribunal is raised, Nuremberg is the model invariably cited. But an international criminal court [will be] nothing like Nuremberg."4 Consider how the Nuremberg trials actually worked. They followed the unconditional military and political surrender of the Axis powers. Prospective defendants were already in custody, and extensive documentary and physical evidence was readily available. Moreover, the Allies shared a common vision of what the postoccupation government should look like, and the defeated peoples endorsed the legitimacy of the war crimes process. Simply reciting that history shows how different Germany and the Nuremberg tribunal were from contemporary cases, like Bosnia and the Yugoslavia tribunal." 
  Amnesty International. "The Globalization of Justice"  - "Universal jurisdiction is the principle that every country has an interest in bringing to justice the perpetrators of the most grave crimes, no matter where the crime was committed, and regardless of the nationality of the perpetrators or their victims. The Pinochet case is the most well-known universal jurisdiction case."
  Henry Kissinger. "The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction: Risking Judicial Tryanny". Foreign Affairs. Aug. 2001  - "The doctrine of universal jurisdiction asserts that some crimes are so heinous that their perpetrators should not escape justice by invoking doctrines of sovereign immunity or the sacrosanct nature of national frontiers [...] The very concept of universal jurisdiction is of recent vintage. [...] It is unlikely that any of the signatories of either the U.N. conventions or the Helsinki Final Act thought it possible that national judges would use them as a basis for extradition requests regarding alleged crimes committed outside their jurisdictions. The drafters almost certainly believed that they were stating general principles, not laws that would be enforced by national courts."
  Dennis Kucinich. "The US Administration and the ICC". Common Dreams. 9 Dec. 2004  - "There are many in our United States government who do understand that Peace can only be obtained through international cooperation and adherence by all nations to high principles. We know that, as a matter of the survival of the human race, unilateralism must yield to multilateralism. [...] Each of us has the responsibility and the gift to work within our sphere to construct a world where all may survive and thrive in peace and justice. [...] We must work tirelessly for ratification or accession to the Rome Statute."
  "Justice or expediency in Sudan?; The International Criminal Court". The Economist. 19 July 2008  - "Only this week Indonesia and Timor-Leste published a report blaming the Indonesian army for the atrocities committed in the former East Timor. But, to keep the peace, there is no hint of bringing anyone to trial. None of the big shots who oversaw apartheid ever faced serious punishment. Till recently, dictators who ordered thousands of "disappearances" in Latin America's dirty wars were allowed to slip into easeful retirement. Terrorists in Northern Ireland and Palestine have been forgiven their crimes in return for desisting. Such decisions are never easy: just ask the victims. But the hunger for peace will occasionally trump the appetite for justice if forgiveness and amnesty are the only way to end wars or move societies from dictatorship to democracy [...] Where does that leave the high hopes that accompanied the creation of the ICC ten years ago? Still strong, we believe. Examples of justice denied do not mean that this noble enterprise is doomed to fail [...] A court on its own cannot bring either peace or justice."
  Benjamin B. Ferencz, J.D. Harvard 1943 and a Former Nuremberg War Crimes Prosecutor. "Response to Henry Kissinger's essay 'The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction'." 2 July 2001  - "The Security Council can block prosecutions indefinitely if needed for reconciliation or peace." 
  Amnesty International. The International Criminal Court, Fact Sheet  - "The ICC ensures that those who commit serious human rights violations are held accountable. Justice helps promote lasting peace, enables victims to rebuild their lives and sends a strong message that perpetrators of serious international crimes will not go unpunished."
  Benjamin B. Ferencz, J.D. Harvard 1943 and a Former Nuremberg War Crimes Prosecutor. "Response to Henry Kissinger's essay 'The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction'." 2 July 2001  - "Opponents of the ICC refuse to recognize that in today's interdependent world all major problems are global and require global solutions. Binding international rules have become necessary and are accepted universally to protect the common interest. The prevention of massive crimes against humanity deserves equal protection of universal law."  
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "it is by no means clear that "justice" as defined by the Court and Prosecutor is always consistent with the attainable political resolution of serious political and military disputes. It may be, or it may not be. Human conflict teaches that, much to the dismay of moralists and legal theoreticians, mortal policy makers often must make tradeoffs among inconsistent objectives. This can be a painful and unpleasant realization, confronting us as it does with the irritating facts of human complexity, contradiction, and imperfection [...] Accumulated experience strongly favors a case-by-case approach, politically and legally, rather than the inevitable resort to adjudication. Circumstances differ, and circumstances matter. Atrocities, whether in international wars or in domestic contexts, are by definition uniquely horrible in their own times and places."
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "Under the UN Charter, the Security Council has primary responsibility for the maintenance of international peace and security. The ICC’s efforts could easily conflict with the Council’s work. Indeed, the Statute of Rome substantially minimized the Security Council’s role in ICC affairs. While the Security Council may refer matters to the ICC, or order it to refrain from commencing or proceeding with an investigation or prosecution , the Council is precluded from a meaningful role in the ICC’s work. In requiring an affirmative Council vote to stop a case, the Statute shifts the balance of authority from the Council to the ICC."
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "[Some] argue that the perception of U.S. commitment to the rule of law has little effect on countries where human rights abuses are most rampant. Despots like Cambodia’s Pol Pot or Iraq’s Saddam Hussein have not weighed possible future legal ramifications before committing massive crimes.98 Under this view, the establishment of the ICC might have the unintended effect of hardening the resolve of ruthless tyrants who may feel they have nothing to gain by giving up their power."
  Gary T. Dempsey. "Reasonable Doubt: The Case Against the Proposed International Criminal Court". CATO Institute. 16 July 1998  - "there is no evidence that holding war crimes trials reduces the number of threats to international peace and security. If anything, the opposite is true: making war less atrocious makes it more likely. The creation of war crimes courts, he concludes, seems really 'to have been aimed at making lawyers the 'guardians' of a violent society, in which war is all right as long as it is played by rules to which the concerned lawyers can agree."
  Roger Cohen. "A Court for a New America". New York Times. 3 Dec. 2008  - "it is in Sudan that the incoherence of American policy toward the court has been most evident. The United States is against impunity for the genocidal crimes in Darfur, yet it is not a member of the court seeking to prosecute those responsible [...] The court has issued arrest warrants for a former Sudanese government minister, Ahmad Harun, and for Ali Kushayb, a leader of the government-backed janjaweed militia. In July, it requested an arrest warrant for Omar Hassan al-Bashir, the Sudanese president, on charges of genocide, but judges are still reviewing whether to push ahead with the prosecution [...] When I asked Brooke Anderson, Obama’s chief national security spokeswoman, about policy toward the court, I received this e-mail response: 'President-elect Obama strongly supports the I.C.C.’s efforts to investigate and prosecute those responsible for atrocities in Sudan.'"
David B Jr Rivkin and Lee Casey. "The ICC's Blow to Peace Hopes in Darfur". Wall Street Journal. 23 July 2008  - "Luis Moreno-Ocampo, the prosecutor for the International Criminal Court (ICC), has just made a mistake that will make it harder to help people suffering in Darfur. Last week, he filed charges against Sudanese President Omar al-Bashir. [...] There is no doubt that terrible crimes have been committed in Darfur. But the international community has been unwilling to use military force to stop the atrocities, and this indictment takes Darfur's second-best hope for peace -- a diplomatic settlement -- off of the table."
  Amnesty International. The International Criminal Court, Fact Sheet  - "it will have a much wider jurisdiction than existing ad hoc tribunals. For example, the work of the International Criminal Tribunals for the former Yugoslavia and Rwanda have been limited to crimes committed in a particular territory, while crimes committed in other territories have not been addressed"
  Amnesty International. The International Criminal Court, Fact Sheet  - "the Statute [of the ICC] contains advanced provisions for the protection of victims from retraumatization, and the Court may order a convicted person to provide reparation, in the form of compensation, restitution, rehabilitation, satisfaction, guarantees of non-repetition and any other type of reparation the Court deems appropriate."
  Ian Williams. "Immune from prosecution". Salon. 16 June 2000  - "The ICC won't have retroactive effect, so it will only be able to try future criminals, and only after 60 countries have ratified it." 
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "As to the former, the ICC’s authority is vague and excessively elastic, and the Court’s discretion ranges far beyond normal or acceptable judicial responsibilities, giving it broad and unacceptable powers of interpretation that are essentially political and legislative in nature. This is most emphatically not a Court of limited jurisdiction. Crimes can be added subsequently that go beyond those included in the Rome Statute. Parties to the Statute are subject to these subsequently-added crimes only if they affirmatively accept them, but the Statute purports automatically to bind non-parties, such as the United States, to any such new crimes. It is neither reasonable nor fair that these crimes would apply to a greater extent to states that have not agreed to the terms of the Rome Statute than to those that have."
  Gary T. Dempsey. "Reasonable Doubt: The Case Against the Proposed International Criminal Court". CATO Institute. 16 July 1998  - "the court threatens to diminish America's sovereignty, produce arbitrary and highly politicized "justice," and grow into a jurisdictional leviathan. Already some supporters of the proposed court want to give it the authority to prosecute drug trafficking as well as such vague offenses as "serious threats to the environment" and "committing outrages on personal dignity." Even if such expansive authority is not given to the ICC initially, the potential for jurisdictional creep is considerable and worrisome." 
  Benjamin B. Ferencz, J.D. Harvard 1943 and a Former Nuremberg War Crimes Prosecutor. "Response to Henry Kissinger's essay 'The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction'." 2 July 2001  - "[Henry Kissinger] accuses the ICTY of allowing 'prosecutorial discretion without accountability' - ignoring all the controls that exist to prevent abuse." 
  Henry Kissinger. "The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction: Risking Judicial Tryanny". Foreign Affairs. Aug. 2001  - "Another grave issue is the use in such cases of extradition procedures designed for ordinary criminals. If the Pinochet case becomes a precedent, magistrates anywhere will be in a position to put forward an extradition request without warning to the accused and regardless of the policies the accused's country might already have in place for dealing with the charges. The country from which extradition is requested then faces a seemingly technical legal decision that, in fact, amounts to the exercise of political discretion -- whether to entertain the claim or not." 
  Benjamin B. Ferencz, J.D. Harvard 1943 and a Former Nuremberg War Crimes Prosecutor. "Response to Henry Kissinger's essay 'The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction'." 2 July 2001  - "Kissinger's misperceptions about current international law lead him to the erroneous conclusion that if the U.S. dos not ratify the ICC treaty Americans will be outside its reach and hence protected from malicious accusations. He fails to notice that without the protective shield of binding international law and institutions to enforce it, the military captive is completely at the mercy of his captors [...] Outstanding American international legal experts, including ten former Presidents of the American Society of International Law and the American Bar Association have, after careful study, concluded that it would be in the best interests of the United States and its military personnel for the United States to accept the proposed ICC as quickly as possible. The same conclusion was reached in 2000 by outstanding professors of the Harvard law School after a careful study by leading military and legal experts assembled by the venerated American Academy of Arts and Sciences."
  Wes Rist. "The Conservative Case for the International Criminal Court Six Years In". Jurist. 10 Dec. 2008  - "The possibility that American servicemen and women and political and military leaders could be held up to scrutiny for their actions is not a new one. It has been enshrined in American law from the foundation of the country under the Articles of War and later the Uniform Code of Military Justice. The ICC merely adds the opportunity for the prosecution of individuals who might have escaped the domestic system of justice. If there is enough evidence that the prosecutor for the ICC could even consider an investigation of a US political or military official for the crimes set out in the Rome Statute, then American conservatives should already have been at the forefront of the call for a domestic investigation. Since the principle of complementarity in Article 17 of the Rome Statute prohibits the ICC from initiating an investigation when a domestic judicial system has already addressed the issue, an American investigation into our own “dirty laundry” would prevent any ICC jurisdiction."
 President George W. Bush said in the first term of his administration: "The United States cooperates with many other nations to keep the peace, but we will not submit American troops to prosecutors and judges whose jurisdiction we do not accept.… Every person who serves under the American flag will answer to his or her own superiors and to military law, not to the rulings of an unaccountable International Criminal Court."
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "As the ICC comes into being, we will address our concerns about the ICC’s jurisdictional claims using the remedy laid out for us by the Rome Statute itself and the UN Security Council in the case of the peacekeeping force in the former Yugoslavia. Using Article 98 of the Rome Statute as a basis, we are negotiating bilateral, legally-binding agreements with individual States Parties to protect our citizens from being handed over to the Court. Since the European Union’s decision in September to permit its member states to conclude Article 98 agreements with the United States, our negotiators have been engaged in bilateral discussions with several EU countries. In the near future we will also be holding discussions on the issue with several countries in the Middle East and South Asia. Our ultimate goal is to conclude Article 98 agreements with every country in the world, regardless of whether they have signed or ratified the ICC, regardless of whether they intend to in the future. These agreements will allow us the necessary protections in a manner that is legally permissible and consistent with the letter and spirit of the Rome Statute."
  "Frequently Asked Questions About the U.S. Government's Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court (ICC)". State Department. 30 July 2003  - "The U.S. Government (USG) proposed agreement undercuts/attacks the ICC.
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "ICC supporters may argue that all States Parties will have the opportunity to vote on a definition of aggression after the treaty has been in effect for seven years, which definition must comport with the U.N. Charter, thereby preserving the role of the U.N. Security Council.37 The ICC, under this view, is merely providing a forum for trying persons accused of committing “aggression” under international law."
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "Numerous prospective "crimes" were suggested at Rome and commanded wide support from participating nations, such as the crime of "aggression," which was included in the Statute, but not defined. Although frequently easy to identify, "aggression" can at times be something in the eye of the beholder. For example, Israel justifiably feared in Rome that certain actions, such as its initial use of force in the Six Day War, would be perceived as illegitimate preemptive strikes that almost certainly would have provoked proceedings against top Israeli officials."
 Kofi Annan, Former U.N. Secretary-General at the signing of the Rome Statute of the International Criminal Court - "The establishment of the Court is still a gift of hope to future generations, and a giant step forward in the march towards universal human rights and the rule of law." [1] 
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "Some ICC supporters have asserted that the crimes covered by the Rome Statute are already prohibited under international law either by treaty or under the concept of “universal jurisdiction” or both; therefore, all nations may assert jurisdiction to try persons for these crimes. The ICC, they argue, would merely be exercising the collective jurisdiction of its members, any of which could independently assert jurisdiction over the accused persons under a theory of 'universal jurisdiction'"
  Wes Rist. "The Conservative Case for the International Criminal Court Six Years In". Jurist. 10 Dec. 2008  - "Finally, there are some valid due process concerns relating to the operation of the Rome Statute. While the process provisions of the Rome Statute (Article 67, among others) are not exact copies of US constitutional protections, they hardly create the possibility of an unfair or impartial trial. In fact, the rights spelled out for defendants throughout the entirety of the Rome Statute are some of the strongest criminal defendant protections put in place for any international tribunal and they certainly rise to the level of meeting the judicial guarantees provided for by the Geneva Conventions and international human rights laws such as the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights."
  Wes Rist. "The Conservative Case for the International Criminal Court Six Years In". Jurist. 10 Dec. 2008  - "Ultimately, should the US government or conservatives in general have any specific concerns about the due process or Constitutional protections (or lack thereof) afforded by the Rome Statute, the solution is simple: conduct an investigation or trial domestically so that there is no reason for the ICC to become involved. In fact, as mentioned previously, a proactive investigation by the US creates a statutory bar to involvement by the ICC Office of the Prosecutor." 
 National courts have priority over ICC courts on all matters, including war crimes. Only if they fail can the ICC step in. This means that the ICC hardly impedes on national sovereignty at all, serving, rather, and role of "complementarity". 
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "The ICC does not, and cannot, fit into a coherent, international structural "constitutional" design that delineates clearly how laws are made, adjudicated or enforced, subject to popular accountability and structured to protect liberty. There is no such design, nor should there be. Instead, the Court and the Prosecutor are simply "out there" in the international system. Requiring the United States to be bound by this treaty, with its unaccountable Prosecutor and its unchecked judicial power, is clearly inconsistent with American standards of constitutionalism. This is a macro-constitutional issue for us, not simply a narrow, technical point of law."
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "Many U.S. opponents of the ICC express concern that the ICC will be able to second-guess a valid determination by U.S. prosecutors to terminate an investigation or decline to prosecute a person. It is not uncommon for unfriendly countries to characterize U.S. foreign policy decisions as 'criminal.' The ICC could provide a forum for such charges."
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "Never before has the United States been asked to place any of that power outside the complete control of our national government without our consent [...] In the ICC’s central structures, the Court and Prosecutor, these sorts of political checks are either greatly attenuated or entirely absent. They are effectively accountable to no one. The Prosecutor will answer to no superior executive power, elected or unelected. Nor is there any legislature anywhere in sight, elected or unelected, in the Statute of Rome. The Prosecutor is answerable only to the Court, and then only partially, although the Prosecutor may be removed by the Assembly of States Parties."
  "U.S. Policy Regarding the International Criminal Court". Congressional Research Service. 29 Aug. 2006  - "ICC opponents, however, may point out that if individuals are charged for conduct related to carrying out official policy, the difference between asserting jurisdiction over individuals and over the nation itself becomes less clear. After all, it is arguably the policy decision and not the individual conduct that is actually at issue. The threat of prosecution, however, could inhibit the conduct of U.S. officials in implementing U.S. foreign policy. In this way, it is argued, the ICC may be seen to infringe U.S. sovereignty."
  Benjamin B. Ferencz, J.D. Harvard 1943 and a Former Nuremberg War Crimes Prosecutor. "Response to Henry Kissinger's essay 'The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction'." 2 July 2001  - "Administrative and budgetary controls are clearly defined. Without its own police force, the court must depend upon the Security Council to enforce its decisions. Enforcement can be vetoed by any of the five privileged Permanent Members, including the U.S. Kissinger's reference to the 'unlimited discretion' of the prosecutor is unfounded. Many safeguards are written into the statute. A court that acts arbitrarily or seeks to abuse its limited powers will soon cease to exist."
  Benjamin B. Ferencz, J.D. Harvard 1943 and a Former Nuremberg War Crimes Prosecutor. "Response to Henry Kissinger's essay 'The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction'." 2 July 2001  - "In every democratic society it is unavoidable that some unjustified complaints may be lodged for political or other nefarious purposes. It is also inevitable that some judgments may go awry and some judges may be incompetent or worse. That is no reason to abolish courts or to refuse to accept new courts where needed."  
  John R. Bolton. "The United States and the International Criminal Court". Remarks to the Federalist Society. 14 Nov. 2002  - "The American concept of separation of powers, imperfect though it is, reflects our settled belief that liberty is best protected when the various authorities legitimately exercised by government are, to the maximum extent possible, placed in separate branches. So structuring the national government, the Framers believed, would prevent the excessive accumulation of power in a limited number of hands, thus providing the greatest protection for individual liberty. Continental European constitutional structures do not, by and large, reflect a similar set of beliefs. They do not so thoroughly separate judicial from executive powers, just as their parliamentary systems do not so thoroughly separate executive from legislative powers. That, of course, is entirely Europe’s prerogative, and may help to explain why Europeans appear to be more comfortable with the ICC’s structure, which closely melds prosecutorial and judicial functions in the European fashion."
  Henry Kissinger. "The Pitfalls of Universal Jurisdiction: Risking Judicial Tryanny". Foreign Affairs. Aug. 2001  - "The independent prosecutor of the ICC has the power to issue indictments, subject to review only by a panel of three judges. According to the Rome statute, the Security Council has the right to quash any indictment. But since revoking an indictment is subject to the veto of any permanent Security Council member, and since the prosecutor is unlikely to issue an indictment without the backing of at least one permanent member of the Security Council, he or she has virtually unlimited discretion in practice."
  Martin Feldstein. "Defense Spending Would Be Great Stimulus". Wall Street Journal. December 24, 2008  - "As President-elect Barack Obama and his economic advisers recognize, countering a deep economic recession requires an increase in government spending to offset the sharp decline in consumer outlays and business investment that is now under way. Without that rise in government spending, the economic downturn would be deeper and longer. Although tax cuts for individuals and businesses can help, government spending will have to do the heavy lifting."
  Eugene Robinson. "Roll over the Republicans". Real Clear Politics. February 10, 2009  - "Begin with the most fundamental question: Does the U.S. economy desperately need a massive stimulus, or not? There are economists who doubt it's possible for the government to effectively stimulate an economy of such size and complexity. Those economists, however, are in the minority. [...] The most respected economic wise men and women of both parties believe a huge stimulus is needed quickly to keep a dire economic situation from sinking into catastrophe." 
  Barack Obama. "We Can't Afford to Wait". February 9, 2009  - "At [the] core [of the Recovery and Reinvestment Plan] is a very simple idea: to put Americans back to work doing the work America needs done. [...] The plan will save or create three to four million jobs over the next two years. But not just any jobs - jobs that meet the needs we've neglected for far too long and lay the groundwork for long-term economic growth: jobs fixing our schools; computerizing medical records to save costs and save lives; repairing our infrastructure; and investing in renewable energy to help us move toward energy independence. The plan also calls for immediate tax relief for 95 percent of American workers."
 The right set of spending, management, and supplemental action can ensure that the stimulus is effective. The stimulus package itself is only one part of the equation. Ensuring against no-bid contracts, enforcing transparency, and efficiently administrating the rapid expenditure of funds is very important. In addition, it is important to simultaneously shore up the financial system with a plan to fix the housing market and thaw the credit market. All these things must be done in concert in order for the stimulus to be effective.  
  Robert Higgs. "Instead of stimulus, do nothing - seriously". Christian Science Monitor. February 9, 2009  - "Hardly anyone [...] is asking the most important question: Should the federal government be doing any of this? [...] Federal intervention rests on the presumption that officials know how to manage the economy and will use this knowledge effectively. This presumption always had a shaky foundation, and we have recently witnessed even more compelling evidence that the government simply does not know what it's doing. The big bailout bill enacted last October; the Federal Reserve's massive, frantic lending for many different purposes; and now the huge stimulus package all look like wild flailing - doing something mainly for the sake of being seen to be doing something - and, of course, enriching politically connected interests in the process."
  Yaron Brook. "To Stimulate The Economy, Liberate It". Forbes. February 14th, 2008  - "we must first recognize that the key economic activity that causes growth is not consumer spending but production. [...] Economic growth means an increase in the amount of wealth that exists in a country--and all wealth must be produced. [...] The focus of today's stimulus packages on consumer spending is therefore completely backward. Consumption is a consequence of production. This fact is ignored by the Bush plan [and Obama plan], which attempts to achieve prosperity through $100 billion in deficit-spending. Though this might bring the appearance of prosperity, in the same way that an unemployed man appears prosperous if he goes on a shopping spree with his credit cards, the reality will be the opposite."
 Stimulus package spends money by first taxing it out of the economy or borrowing it through bonds. Either way, the money injected is not "new" money, but taken from the economy, so adds no new wealth to the economy.
 While many liberals claim that the New Deal helped stop the Great Depression, many other economists and historians argue that the New Deal only worsened the Great Depression by adding to the national debt.
  Scot Lehigh. "A large stimulus bill for large problems". The Boston Globe. February 6, 2009  - "Nor is it true, as some critics would have you believe, that the plan is a farrago of fiscal fat that will be all sizzle and no steak. Yes, there are some questionable items, but they are only a small fraction of the proposals."
  Representative Eric Cantor. "Commentary: Big risk in Obama's economic stimulus plan". CNN.com. January 18, 2008  - "with such a free hand over current stimulus efforts comes great danger. Costing at the very least a hefty $825 billion, the plan's potential for taxpayer waste and special-interest-driven giveaways is enormous. [...] Like bears sniffing out food at a campfire pit, those looking for a piece of the multi-billion dollar pie have flooded Washington with a cascade of requests, some capable of spurring immediate and lasting growth, others falling hopelessly short."
 Jim Horney, director of federal fiscal policy for the Center on Budget and Policy Priorities - "The vast majority of what is in these two bills is pretty good stimulus." [5]  This includes "automatic stimulators", such as unemployment benefits and food stamps, money that is typically quickly and fully spent. In addition, the majority of money will be spent within the first year of the stimulus package, providing more short-term, "good" stimulus to get the economy rolling quickly. 
  Steven Pearlstein. "Wanted: Personal Economic Trainers. Apply at Capitol." Washington Post. February 6, 2009  - "Let’s review some of the more silly arguments about the stimulus bill, starting with the notion that 'only' 75 percent of the money can be spent in the next two years, and the rest is therefore 'wasted.' As any economist will tell you, the economy tends to be forward-looking and emotional. So if businesses and households can see immediate benefits from a program while knowing that a bit more stimulus is on the way, they are likely to feel more confident that the recovery will be sustained. That confidence, in turn, will make them more likely to take the risk of buying big-ticket items now and investing in stocks or future ventures."
  Steven Pearlstein. "Wanted: Personal Economic Trainers. Apply at Capitol." Washington Post. February 6, 2009  - "what's striking is that supposedly intelligent people are horrified at the thought that, during a deep recession, government might try to help the economy by buying up-to-date equipment for the people who protect us from epidemics and infectious diseases, by hiring people to repair environmental damage on federal lands and by contracting with private companies to make federal buildings more energy-efficient." 
  John Norquiest. "Stimulus to Nowhere". Planetizen. January 22, 2009  - "Spending projects will take years to get under-way. Is "Shovel-Ready" Enough? State bureaucracies claim to have thousands of "shovel-ready" projects. But examining the list of 'shovel ready' state projects at aashto.org you find a list of decades-old freeway expansion proposals, large-scale projects that according to FHWA estimates, only 27% will be under construction within a year . Intimately familiar with the realities of transportation funding deployment, the nonpartisan Congressional Budget Office offered cautionary advice to the Appropriations Committee on just this point."
  Barack Obama. "We Can't Afford to Wait". February 9, 2009  - "you may have heard some of the critics of our plan saying that it would create mostly government jobs. That's simply not true. More than 90 percent of these jobs will be in the private sector. More than 90 percent."
 While it may be true that some supporters of the stimulus have a hidden agenda to grow government, this is mere speculation, and to oppose the legislation merely on this basis would be to overlook the broader, legitimate arguments involved in the debate.
  Robert Kuttner. "Time to Think Big". American Prospect. February 10, 2009  - "Looking forward [beyond the stimulus], we need a very different sort of economy, one that restores a balanced form of capitalism. At the core of this change is a long-term increase in public outlay, investing in areas vital to economic growth and social decency. [...] An enhanced federal role, in turn, provides the moment to reclaim the public philosophy of activist government that effectively services people’s needs where market forces fail."
 The idea that government is "bad" and that any growth in government engendered by the stimulus is subsequently "bad" is false. Government governs for the people and by the people. Unless one argues that the people are bad, government must be good. See  Government is Good.com  for an expansion on this argument.
  Steven Pearlstein. "Wanted: Personal Economic Trainers. Apply at Capitol." Washington Post. February 6, 2009  - "And then there is Sen. Tom Coburn (R-Okla.), complaining in Wednesday's Wall Street Journal that of the 3 million jobs that the stimulus package might create or save, one in five will be government jobs, as if there is something inherently inferior or unsatisfactory about that. (Note to Coburn's political director: One in five workers in Oklahoma is employed by government.)" 
 The spending in the stimulus will go toward many government programs, growing them so that they become a constant burden on tax payers and constraint for free markets. None of this is desirable, and this is why tax cuts are a better alternative; it provides stimulus without growing government, and in fact, shrinking government.
  Scot Lehigh. "A large stimulus bill for large problems". The Boston Globe. February 6, 2009  - "Although one can debate the necessity or importance of various projects, almost any new spending will have a stimulative effect - including resodding the National Mall."
  Barack Obama. "We Can't Afford to Wait". February 9, 2009 : "this plan will provide for extended unemployment insurance, health care and other assistance for workers and families who have lost their jobs in this recession. [...] That will mean an additional $100 per month in unemployment benefits to more than 450,000 Indiana workers, extended unemployment benefits for another 89,000 folks who've been laid off and can't find work, and job training assistance to help more than 51,000 people here get back on their feet. [...] That is not only our moral responsibility - to lend a helping hand to our fellow Americans in times of emergency - but it also makes good economic sense. If you don't have money, you can't spend it. And if people don't spend, our economy will continue to decline."
  "The Stimulus Tragedy". Wall Street Journal (editorial). February 6, 2009  - "Some Democrats claim these transfer payments are stimulating because they go mainly to poor people, who immediately spend the money. Tax cuts for business or for incomes across the board won't work, they add, because those tax cuts go disproportionately to "the rich," who will save the money. But a saved $1 doesn't vanish from the economy, unless it is stuffed into a mattress. It enters the financial system, where it is lent to others; or it is invested in the stock market as capital for businesses; or it is invested in entirely new businesses, which are the real drivers of job creation and prosperity. [...] At the current moment, amid a capital strike, the latter is the kind of fiscal stimulus we really need. Yet there is virtually none of it in the bills now moving through Congress. Senate moderates may succeed in cutting $100 billion or so in spending from the bill, which is political window dressing. Even they aren't talking about adding the kind of tax cuts that would really help the economy now."
  Scot Lehigh. "A large stimulus bill for large problems". The Boston Globe. February 6, 2009  - "Is the stimulus plan large? Yes, and with good reason. Our economic problems are as well. With consumers poorer from $6 trillion in vanished housing wealth and $7 trillion in vaporized stock, we're set to suffer annual losses in overall economic activity of a trillion dollars this year and a trillion or more next year. It's not just consumer spending that has collapsed. Other traditional generators of economic growth - business investment, housing construction, and exports - are all anemic. [...] That leaves government spending as the nation's best hope for softening a major downturn." [1] 
 Robert Kuttner, co-editor of The American Prospect. - Stimulus "needs to be adequate to do the job. Eight hundred and twenty billion is about 2.5% of GDP. But the economy is sinking at the rate of five to six percent. So they may find out they have to come back and ask for more." Prominent economist Paul Krugman has also stated he believes that roughly $800b in economic stimulus is "too small". [2] 
 A $800 billion stimulus package is the largest stimulus spending bill ever devised (although there have been some tax cuts that could be considered larger). For this reason, it should be viewed with great suspicion, and, at a minimum, the debate over the bill and areas of wasteful spending should done patiently. Rush such a large bill through Congress makes little sense.  
  Eliot Spitzer. "Robots, Not Roads". Slate. Jan. 5, 2009 : "the capacity of even the U.S. government to affect the overall global economy is limited. Suppose the package is $800 billion over two years: $400 billion is less than 1 percent of the global economy and a mere 3 percent of the U.S. economy. In relative terms, $400 billion isn't all that much more than the $152 billion spent on the 2008 stimulus, which had nary an impact on the economy."
  Barack Obama. "We Can't Afford to Wait". February 9, 2009  - "it's not just the jobs that will benefit Indiana and the rest of America. It's the work people will be doing: Rebuilding our roads, bridges, dams and levees. Roads like US 31 here in Indiana that Hoosiers count on, and that connect small towns and rural communities to opportunities for economic growth. And I know that a new overpass downtown would make a big difference for businesses and families right here in Elkhart."
  Eliot Spitzer. "Robots, Not Roads". Slate. Jan. 5, 2009  - "The 'off the shelf' infrastructure projects that can be funded immediately and provide immediate demand-side stimulus are almost by definition not the transformative investments we really need. Paving roads, repairing bridges that need refurbishing, and accelerating existing projects are all good and necessary, but not transformative. These projects by and large are building or patching the same economy with the same flaws that got us where we are. Our concern should be that as we look for the next great infrastructure project to transform our economy, we might rebuild the Erie Canal and find ourselves a century behind technologically."
 A stimulus package adds to consumer confidence by giving, at a minimum, the impression that things are going to be OK. As a result, it encourages businesses and consumers to spend more than they otherwise would, which has a positive effect on the economy.
  Chuck Jaffe. "Government's Stimulus Plan Won't Arouse Consumer Spending". Fox Business. February 3, 2009 : "put on your consumer hat, look at the proposed stimulus bills, ideas and notions, and ask yourself if any piece of the legislation would make you positive enough about the economy and your personal financial situation to relax and feel good."
  Eugene Robinson. "Roll over the Republicans". Real Clear Politics. February 10, 2009  - "Obama's plan was criticized by some Democrats for including a heavy component of tax cuts; that's the Republican prescription that helped get us into these desperate straits, and voters made clear in November that it's time to try something else. But Obama and his economic team found that there were only so many "shovel-ready" infrastructure projects to fund, and while straightforward government spending packs a bigger stimulative punch, tax cuts would help to some degree. So, from the beginning, the plan accommodated Republican ideology."
  Eugene Robinson. "Roll over the Republicans". Real Clear Politics. February 10, 2009  - "This is not, repeat not, a time for compromise. Meeting in the middle, which the Senate sees as its role in our democracy, renders the whole exercise potentially useless. If we don't get enough money into the economy, and if we don't do it soon, we risk wasting a king's ransom on a stimulus that's too puny to stimulate. [...] This is not an issue where the answer is to be found in the 'middle.' This isn't a matter of left, right and center, it's a matter of yes or no: Does the federal government try to get the economy moving again, or not?"
  "How to cause a depression". The Washington Times. February 8, 2009  - "Tucked within the economic stimulus bill the House passed last week was a clause requiring state and local public works agencies to buy American iron and steel for their reconstruction projects, and the Senate expanded it to all manufactured goods. [...] a brief history lesson will show them the folly of their ways. [...] In 1929, in an effort to stimulate the American economy after the stock market crashed, Sen. Reed Smoot and Rep. Willis Hawley, both Republicans, used similar logic to create the Smoot-Hawley Tariff Act, raising tariffs on foreign goods to record levels. President Herbert Hoover signed the bill against the opposition of more than 1,000 economists and numerous business executives. The result was a trade war with Europe, which increased its tariffs on U.S. products. Ultimately, U.S. exports and imports decreased by more than 50 percent in a single year, transforming the recession into the Great Depression [...] But at least Smoot-Hawley left open the freedom to import, whereas what the leadership of the 111th Congress originally wanted to eliminate imports outright."
  Martin Feldstein. "The case for fiscal stimulus in U.S." The Korea Herald. February 3, 2009  - "Under normal circumstances, I would oppose this rise in the budget deficit and the higher level of government spending. [...] Now, however, increased government spending and the resulting rise in the fiscal deficit are being justified as necessary to deal with the economic downturn [...] When the recession is over, the United States and virtually every other country will have substantially higher debt-to-GDP ratios. At that point, it will be important to develop policies to reduce gradually the relative level of government spending in order to shift to fiscal surpluses and reduce the debt burden."
  Robert Kuttner. "Time to Think Big". American Prospect. February 10, 2009  - "Looking forward, we need a very different sort of economy, one that restores a balanced form of capitalism. At the core of this change is a long-term increase in public outlay, investing in areas vital to economic growth and social decency. Once the recession is over, this increase in public investment needs to be paid for with a more progressive tax system."
  David Freddoso. "The Case for No Stimulus". National Review. February 3, 2009  - "Every penny of such a package must be borrowed, because the government is already running a $1.2 trillion deficit this year and faces a $703 billion deficit for next year, according to the non-partisan Congressional Budget Office. The question, then, is whether the government can help the economy by spending money if it can only do so by first sucking that money out of the economy."
 Andrew Schiff, an investment consultant at Euro Pacific Capital said to Politico: "All this stimulus money is geared toward getting consumers spending and borrowing again. But spending and borrowing were the problem in the first place." [7] 
  Barack Obama. "We Can't Afford to Wait". February 9, 2009  - "The situation we face could not be more serious. We have inherited an economic crisis as deep and as dire as any since the Great Depression. Economists from across the spectrum have warned that if we don't act immediately, millions more jobs will be lost, and national unemployment rates will approach double digits. More people will lose their homes and their health care. And our nation will sink into a crisis that, at some point, we may be unable to reverse."
  Barack Obama. "We Can't Afford to Wait". February 9, 2009  - "I can tell you with complete confidence that endless delay or paralysis in Washington in the face of this crisis will bring only deepening disaster. [...] We've had a good debate. Now it's time to act. That's why I am calling on Congress to pass this bill immediately. Folks here in Elkhart and across America need help right now, and they can't afford to keep on waiting for folks in Washington to get this done."
  Amity Shlaes. "Obama's gift to GOP is challenge to supply siders". Bloomberg. February 9, 2009  - "Cut the tax rate on capital gains to 5 percent. Halve the corporate tax rate. Fund a new, super-strong Securities and Exchange Commission to monitor anything that's traded, including the haziest derivative. [...] Buy homeowners out of mortgages they can't afford, and protect the rights of lenders. Make Social Security solvent by curtailing the annual growth in benefits. Forget one "S" word, stimulus, and learn to use two "R" words -- rent and recession. [...] Too costly, you might say, or too extreme. But the ideas above are neither costlier nor more extreme than the almost- trillion-dollar stimulus package moving through Congress. And they are more likely to bring long-term growth than the legislation advanced by President Barack Obama."
 Martin Feldstein, chairman of the Council of Economic Advisors under Ronald Reagan, wrote in January 2009, "It is of course possible that the planned surge in government spending will fail. Two or three years from now we could be facing a level of unemployment that is higher than today and that shows no sign of coming down." [6] 
  David Keene. "From hope to doomsday". The Hill. February 9, 2009  - "There is no denying the seriousness of the current recession, but the specter of a still-popular president on television night after night to predict that things are going to get much, much worse is not something one would call confidence-inspiring. One can lead by inspiring or by trying to scare the heck out of people. In our country, at least, successful presidents have used the inspirational approach — the approach that Mr. Obama took during his campaign, but which he seems to have abandoned."
  "Poll: Obama Stimulus Effort Backed By Huge Majority". Huffington Post. February 9, 2009  - "Sixty-seven percent of the American people approve of how President Obama's handling his efforts to pass an economic stimulus bill, as opposed to 48% for Democrats in Congress and 31% for congressional Republicans."
 President Barack Obama - "The notion that tax cuts alone will solve all our problems; that we can ignore fundamental challenges like energy independence and the high cost of health care, that we can somehow deal with this in piecemeal fashion and still expect our economy and our country to thrive. I reject those theories, and so did the American people when they went to the polls in November and voted resoundingly for change." [8] 
  Brian Wesbury. "Unemployment and Stimulus". The American Spectator. February 6th, 2009  - "the American people are on board [with the stimulus plan] – sort of. 'They're all over the map,' said Andrew Smith, director of the University of New Hampshire Survey Center. 'The way I would characterize what the public view is they know something has to be done, they're not quite sure what should be done,' Smith said. [...] A national Diageo/Hotline Poll shows 54 percent of registered voters favor the more than $800 billion stimulus package backed by President Barack Obama even if it means increasing the federal deficit. [...] Yet when the same poll asked voters if they thought the package of spending and tax cuts would be spent and managed wisely, 14 percent said they were 'very confident' it would. Twelve percent said they were 'very confident' the stimulus package would be effective in turning around the economy. [...] For voters to hold such disparate views is not uncommon, said Elizabeth Theiss-Morse, a political scientist who studies public opinion and voter behavior at the University of Nebraska. [...] 'It's like people often have the desire for lower taxes and more government services,' she said." 
  "Filling the hole". Economist. Dec 11th 2008  - "Tax rebates or tax cuts will get more money into consumers’ hands quickly, but in today’s environment much of that boost will simply be saved, as people plug the holes in their finances left by the collapsing values of their houses and retirement portfolios, or just pay off debts. If consumers are unwilling to spend, the best way for a government to boost demand is to spend more itself. One approach is to send large dollops of federal cash directly to America’s struggling states"
 President Barack Obama - "The notion that tax cuts alone will solve all our problems; that we can ignore fundamental challenges like energy independence and the high cost of health care, that we can somehow deal with this in piecemeal fashion and still expect our economy and our country to thrive. I reject those theories, and so did the American people when they went to the polls in November and voted resoundingly for change." [3] 
 Jason Furman and Douglas Elmendorf of the Brookings Institution wrote, "Fiscal policy implemented promptly can provide a larger near-term impetus to economic policy than monetary policy can." [4] 
 Government arts funding often subsidises the favourite leisure pursuits of the elite who staff the government, such as opera and ballet. Why are these more worthy of subsidy than pop concerts or football matches? It is a peculiarly regressive form of government to take money from the poor in taxes to spend on the playthings of the rich.
 So-called "elite culture" should be available for all to enjoy, and not just confined to the rich. Opera and ballet might survive without government subsidy because enough rich people enjoy them, but they will do so by putting their ticket prices up beyond the pocket of any ordinary person. Subsidy can ensure that cheaper tickets are available and that the arts remain democratically open to all, regardless of income or social class.
 Even if government subsidy of the arts occasionally produced popular and acclaimed artistic successes, these will always be too infrequent to justify wasting public money on a great many more flops. Just as governments have proved to be very poor at centrally-directed economic planning, they are unlikely to be any better at centrally-directed artistic planning. Instead, they are more likely to channel resources inefficiently, stifling more creative and potentially popular endeavours elsewhere. And remember, money wasted on the arts is money that could be spent on schools, pensions and hospitals.
 Government-backed companies such as the National Theatre or Royal Shakespeare Company in Britain act as centres of excellence, training and nurturing young talent and thus helping to support a thriving commercial artistic sector as well. The arts can be an important attraction for tourists, bringing considerable revenue into the country.
 If artists and companies become dependent upon funding, they will react to the implicit threat of its removal should they be too critical of the government. Government may seek to co-opt art into serving its wider policy aims, making it promote nationalism, moral behaviour or a cult of personality; this compromises artistic integrity and forces art to become nothing more than propaganda.
 Government subsidy of the arts is unnecessary as if art is good enough, then people will pay for it. If art is not good enough to be popular, then government should not reward it for its failure. The success of the unsubsidised popular music industry in Britain contrasts with the failure of the subsidised British film industry. Why should London have five symphony orchestras if there is not enough demand to justify them? The arts in the US are largely unsubsidised and they are thriving and popular.
 There are alternatives to government subsidy or relying solely on ticket sales to fund the arts. The patronage of rich enthusiasts is still a very important force in the art world, as it was in Shakespeare’s or Mozart’s day. Companies are often keen to sponsor the arts as it gives them an opportunity to associate their brand with creativity, generosity and excellence. The USA offers generous tax breaks to individuals and companies to support the arts and has developed a culture of personal philanthropy which is very different to that of subsidy-dependent Europe.
 Local theatres would be forced to shut, film industries would shrink, national theatre, opera and ballet companies would disband or merge, museums would close their doors. Although some people will value the arts highly enough to pay a market rate for them, they are too few to maintain a diverse and extensive artistic sector which can improve the quality of life for all. In addition, exposing the arts to the full winds of the economic cycle means that skills and institutions lost during recessions can never be reestablished successfully when business improves - art is not a commodity.
 Commercially-funded arts have to play to the lowest common denominator, avoiding risk by providing what has proved popular and successful in the past (for example, musicals and endless productions of Shakespeare’s As You Like It or Tchaikovsky’s Nutcracker Suite). Subsidised companies can afford to take more risks and to experiment, enabling new styles and forms of art to emerge and to become popular in their own right.
 Without subsidy schools and young people would not be able to take affordable music lessons, visit museums or galleries, or to attend plays or concerts, and would thereby be prevented from understanding and enjoying their culture fully. As well as being important for personal enrichment, access to the arts also makes the young aware of their national heritage and helps to promote feelings of nationhood.
 Teachers will probably not cheat the system, simply out of respect for themselves, their profession, and their students. The system should not, therefore, cave to a minority of teachers that decide to violate the rules. Instead, measures should be taken to ensure that teachers do not cheat and that cheating teachers are caught. 
 When teacher accountability is based on test scores, teachers are often motivated to cheat, by modifying student standardized tests so that more pass. This does not help the students and teachers should not be put in this position. 
  "Critics are many, but law has solid public support". School Reform News. March 2004  - "Solid Public Support. Bush and NCLB supporters on Capitol Hill also pointed to evidence of public support for NCLB standards and accountability. A national survey conducted in early January for Americans for Better Education by The Winston Group found a solid majority of Americans view NCLB favorably, with support highest among African-Americans and parents of children in public schools. [...] More than 100 black and Latino school officials signed a letter to Congress condemning calls to repeal NCLB’s accountability requirements, asserting the naysayers would “turn back the clock to a time when schools--particularly in suburban communities--could coast comfortably on the performance of a handful of high-performing students and hide serious problems behind misleading averages."
  No Child Left Behind and Faith-Based Leaders. United States Department of Education. Retrieved February 18, 2009  - "Faith-based organizations can receive funds to provide tutoring and other academic enrichment services for eligible low-income students. Religious organizations can become supplemental educational services providers by applying to states and then working with districts to provide services directly to students in reading, language arts and mathematics. Many faith-based organizations are already providing these services in innercity and rural communities across the country, where assistance is needed most. Faith-based organizations often find it useful to establish their program as a not-for-profit (501c3) to receive funds."
 No Child Left Behind creates such impossible standards that it frequently causes modestly performing schools to be labelled "failing" and to be put at risk of privatization or being turned into charter schools. 
 NCLB violates the separation of church and state by allowing "faith-based" groups to serve as private tutors with public money. The US Department of Education's website says: "No Child Left Behind provides opportunities for faith-based organizations to assist in educating children."
 Military recruiting in schools is entirely appropriate. National service is an important thing for young members of society to consider being a part of.  
 NCLB (In section 9528) requires public secondary schools to provide  military recruiters  the same access to facilities as a school provides to higher education institution recruiters. Schools are also required to provide contact information for every student to the military if requested, and schools are not required to tell the students or parents. Students or parents can opt out of having their information shared.<ref>(nd)  SEC. 9528. ARMED FORCES RECRUITER ACCESS TO STUDENTS AND STUDENT RECRUITING INFORMATION.  Department of Education. Retrieved 6/7/07.</ref> <ref>(nd)  Military Free Zone . website. Retrieved 6/7/07.</ref>  Currently, many school districts have a generic opt out form which, if filled out and turned in, withholds students' information from college and job recruiters as well as the military.
 NCLB seeks to narrow class and racial gaps in school performance by creating common expectations for all. It also requires schools and districts to focus their attention on the academic achievement of traditionally under-served groups of children, such as low-income students, students with disabilities, and African Americans and Latinos. Many previous state-created systems of accountability only measured average school performance, allowing schools to be highly rated even if they had large achievement gaps between affluent and disadvantaged students. 
 Standardized tests are written largely by white men and women, with a certain unintentional bias toward these ethnic groups, putting minorities at a slight disadvantage.  
 Students who are learning English have an automatic three-year-long window to take assessments in their native language, after which they must generally demonstrate proficiency on an English language assessment. The local education authority may grant any student another two years' testing in his native language on a case-by-case basis.  In practice, however, only 10 states choose to test any students in their native language (almost entirely Spanish speakers).
 Because diverse schools more frequently have statistically underperforming minority groups, non-native English speakers, or disabled groups, they are much more likely to "fail" and be penalized. No Child Left Behind, therefore, effectively penalizes diversity in schools.
 (NAEP) The Department of Education points to National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP) results, released in July 2005, showing improved student achievement in reading and math resulting from No Child Left Behind. [2] 
 There is some information in the world that is essential to know as a means of communicating effectively and analytically with other individuals in society, whether as a citizen or in the marketplace. Standardized tests help ensure that all students learn this important information. It is true that this information can be cut-and-dry and perhaps even boring, including history, literacy (reading comprehension), and math. Yet, it is, nevertheless, essential, so testing for it and ensuring students know the information is socially and educationally valuable. Yet, it is also true, that this  essential  information does not constitute  all  the information that a community may believe their children should know. 
 While music and arts are important, in a globally competitive marketplace they are less important than more essential historical information, reading-comprehension, and math-skills. 
 While music, art, culture, and physical education are important, they are not testable. You can only create a standardized test around information that is common and fairly objective. No Child Left Behind does this, focusing on history, math, and reading comprehension. It cannot be blamed for not testing arts and music. These subjects are not testable. Schools should, however, teach them, and not merely focus on teaching to the NCLB test. 
  "Defending 'No Child Left Behind'". Christian Science Monitor. August 29, 2005  - "Teaching to the test. Critics often object that NCLB invites teaching only to the test. But parents can counter this, by pressuring schools to broaden out."
 The establishment of statewide standards, instead of city or neighborhood curricula, also benefits students who move between neighboring communities by increasing the odds that lessons learned in one school will generally line up sensibly with lessons taught at a new school for a student. Such educational continuity is valuable.
 No Child Left Behind had some significant problems when it was first implemented under the Bush administration. But this had much more to do with insufficient funding than with any inadequacies of the program itself. Barack Obama recognized as much in the following remark: "I'll tell you what's wrong with No Child Left Behind. Forcing our teachers, our principals and our schools to accomplish all of this without the resources they need is wrong. Promising high-quality teachers in every classroom and then leaving the support and the pay for those teachers behind is wrong. Labeling a school and its students as failures one day and then throwing your hands up and walking away from them the next is wrong. [...] We must fix the failures of No Child Left Behind. We must provide the funding we were promised, give our states the resources they need and finally meet our commitment to special education." [3] 
 The focus on standardized testing (all students in a state take the same test under the same conditions) as the means of assessment encourages teachers to teach a narrow subset of skills that will increase test performance rather than focus on deeper understanding and life lessons that can be applied in the marketplace, real life, and to citizenship and democracy generally. Because teachers and schools may be punished if they fail to live up to standardized test score goals, they often have a perverse incentive to focus almost entirely on teaching to the test, especially where a school is at risk of being designated as "failing".
  Robert Lynch. "No Child Left Behind Act wrongly left the arts behind". The Hill. March 12, 2007  - "[Congress] should correct the legislation’s unintended consequences, which include reducing the amount of arts education in our nation’s schools. [...] it also requires schools to report student achievement test results for only two subjects: reading and math. With the emphasis on just those two, the arts have suffered. [...] A recent national study of the Act’s impact by the Council on Education Policy reveals that a majority of school leaders saw gains in achievement, but 71 percent reported having reduced instructional time in at least one other subject to make more time for reading and math. Since the passage of NCLB, 22 percent of elementary school leaders surveyed reported a decline in their art and music instruction."
 The most important element in education is that students develop a love of learning, so that they seek to learn on their own, outside of school. No Child Left Behind, however, makes learning such a rigid process that it does not inspire such a love of learning, failing the most important test of a good educational system.
  Sandra Nichols. "When NCLB Standards Meet Reality". April 26, 2003  - "...having high standards is currently thought to be some kind of magic bullet. Certainly nobody wants low standards. However, merely raising the bar does not make a pole-vaulter able to jump higher." 
 When the focus of the educational system and teachers is on the standardized average, this detracts from the education of those at the low and high end of educational achievement. The gifted will not be taught to their full potential as a result. This has consequences not simply for these students, but for society as a whole, which depends disproportionately on the cultivation of the best and brightest into tomorrow's leaders.
 Because No Child Left Behind makes passing tests such a central priority, teachers don't have much of an incentive to spend time helping those that are already likely to pass nor those that are highly unlikely to pass (it would be wasted energy). The greatest bang-for-the-buck for teachers under threat from NCLB penalties is to focus on students that are just below the passing grade. This is unfortunate because every child should be given equal attention to grow regardless of their abilities.
 NCLB creates a perverse incentive for schools to encourage poor-performing students to dropout and leave (because it may be necessary for a school to avoid being labeled "failing"). It also creates an environment in which some students may become discouraged by their continually poor performance on tests, and in which "teaching to the test" provides too little stimulation to other important interests that a student may have, such as music. 
 No Child Left Behind allows teachers to judge the effectiveness or ineffectiveness of their methods in their classes and with individual students. English Teacher Stephanie Butler said, for instance, "Assessment drives instruction. If I don't know the weaknesses of my students, how can I know how to best help them? [...] I think the statistics need to drive remedies." [1] 
 It is important that a nation has a general frame of reference on where students should, on average, be at various stages in their educational development. Standardized testing helps do this by setting a baseline level of achievement at each grade. While some students may perform above or below this standard, the important thing is judging the general educational trends across American society, so that we can help guide our national educational system onto a globally competitive path. 
 Standardized testing often tests only a very limited range of skills rather than the broad range of skills we would hope our educational system is teaching. Standardized testing focuses largely on memorization, speed of recall, and critical thinking. Yet, a full education entails much more, including creativity, emotional insight, composure and dignity, physical health and an understanding of nutrition, and many other basic human values. NCLB, therefore, does not measure the most important factors in a student's education and future success and happiness. It is, therefore, useless as a measure of a student and school's performance. 
 Any system of standardized testing (in order to pass a class) assumes that all students progress at the same rate. But this is not the case. Talented students and un-talented students should not be measured by the same standardized test.
  "Commentary: No Child Left Behind needs revision". McClatchy. December 11, 2008  - "schools should be judged on whether each child progresses from one year to the next, which is called a 'growth model.' It asks, did the child's knowledge and skills grow at least one year's worth? Are children who are behind getting enough attention to help them catch up? Those are the important questions, not whether this third grade scores better than the previous year's third-grade class [under no child left behind]."
 The focus of testing is to provide a clear indication teaching methods that are working and ones that are not. No Child Left Behind allows this, making it possible for teachers to adjust their methods accordingly. 
  Claudia Wallis, Sonja Steptoe. "How to Fix No Child Left Behind". Time. May 24, 2007  - "NCLB proponents and critics alike agree that the law's greatest accomplishment has been shinning an unforgiving light on such languishing schools and demanding that they do better."
 Gives school districts the opportunity to demonstrate proficiency, even for subgroups that do not meet State Minimum Achievement standards, through a process called "safe harbor," a precursor to growth-based or value-added assessments.
  "Fact Sheet on the Major Provisions of the Conference Report to H.R. 1, the No Child Left Behind Act". United States Department of Education  - "Strengthening Teacher Quality [...] H.R. 1 asks states to put a highly-qualified teacher in every public school classroom by 2005. The bill also makes it easier for local schools to recruit and retain excellent teachers. [...] H.R. 1 will consolidate smaller programs within the US Department of Education. The bill also creates a new Teacher Quality Program that allows greater flexibility for local school districts. [...] In addition to specific funds for teacher quality, H.R. 1 will also give local schools new freedom to make spending decisions with up to 50 percent of the non-Title I federal funds they receive. With this new freedom, a local school district can use additional funds for hiring new teachers, increasing teacher pay, improving teacher training and development or other uses."
  Walter Haney. "Evidence on Education under NCLB (and How Florida Boosted NAEP Scores and Reduced the Race Gap". September 8, 2006  - "results on NAEP are dubious bases for reaching summary judgments regarding school quality."
  Alfie Kohn. "NCLB: 'Too Destructive To Salvage'". Common Dreams. May 31, 2007  - "This law is not about discovering which schools need help; we already know." 
 Critics of the NCLB requirement for "one high, challenging standard" claim that some students are simply unable to perform at the level for their age, no matter how good the teacher is. EdAccountability.org  While statewide standards reduce the educational inequality between privileged and underprivileged districts in a state, they still impose a "one size fits all" standard on individual students. Particularly in states with high standards, schools can be punished for not being able to dramatically raise the achievement of a student who has below-average capabilities.
  Alfie Kohn. "NCLB: 'Too Destructive To Salvage'". Common Dreams. May 31, 2007  - "according to a recent 50-state survey by Teachers Network, a non-profit education organization, exactly 3% of teachers think NCLB helps them to teach more effectively. No wonder 129 education and civil rights organizations have endorsed a letter to Congress deploring the law's overemphasis on standardized testing and punitive sanctions. No wonder 30,000 people (so far) have signed a petition at educatorroundtable.org calling the law 'too destructive to salvage.'"
  Charles Murray. "Acid Tests". Wall Street Journal. July 25, 2006  - "It pushes classrooms toward relentless drilling, not something that inspires able people to become teachers or makes children eager to learn." 
 No Child Left Behind sets highly restrictive qualifications for teaching in schools. This often means that some schools cannot get enough teachers or that good teachers that do not meet NCLB qualifications cannot continue to teach.
 Punishing teachers for the poor performance of students fails to address the main issue; how to better or differently instruct students. Teachers already have the best interests of their students at heart. Punishing them wrongly assumes that this is not the case, or that teachers cannot simply recognize the need to improve their methods if things are not going well. 
 Many schools are doing a great job and progressing, but are not progressing at the unreasonable pace set by NCLB. They are subsequently punished, despite the fact that they are doing good work.
 While accountability is often considered important among teachers, it is important to consider what teachers are being held accountable for. Many teachers feel they should be held accountable for a more holistic teaching approach, opposed to the kind of test-centric teaching NCLB requires. Teachers want to be accountable for actually educating their students, not merely teaching them how to take a test.
 Because schools and teachers are hyper-sensitive about passing students under NCLB testing, a perverse incentive is created to hold back underperforming students that should pass on to a higher grade simply to avoid the risk that they will take and fail a test. 
 No Child Left Behind creates a perverse incentive for schools to deny entry to underperforming students as a means of decreasing the chances that the school will be labeled "failing" and sanctioned as a consequence. This can leave underperforming students with no place to go to school and with no future.
 Instead of helping lift-up underperforming schools, No Child Left Behind cuts resources to these schools as a means of punishment, counter-productively ensuring the continued failure of these schools.
 No Child Left Behind demands the most improvement from the schools with the least funding and the worst students. This is simply unreasonable.
  Bill Byrne. "No Child Left Behind — Really? Why I like this law."  - "The fact is that in many, many public schools, kids with disabilities are not learning to read and do math — while the vast majority of them can master these skills with proper instruction. [...] No Child Left Behind will short-circuit all of the excuses and explanations. School systems that do a good job with children with disabilities will show their progress, and those that fail to do a good job will have their ineffectiveness exposed. Then parents and voters can make informed decisions about how to get the underachievers on track." 
 Because No Child Left Behind requires that 100% of students in a school are able to pass, disabled and special-ed students are often expected to pass the same exams as other students. Because many of these students simply cannot pass the same tests, disabled students are set up to fail, and schools with disabled students are set up to fail as well.  
 If a school fails to meet AYP targets two or more years running, the school must offer eligible children the chance to transfer to higher-performing local schools, receive free tutoring, or attend after-school programs. 
 No Child Left Behind establishes the foundation for schools and school districts to significantly enhance parental involvement and improve administration through the use of the assessment data to drive decisions on instruction, curriculum and business practices. It provides information for parents by requiring states and school districts to give parents detailed report cards on schools and districts explaining the school's AYP performance. It notifies parents of schools that do not meet standards, giving them a way to weigh alternative school options. Schools must also inform parents when their child is being taught by a teacher or para-professional who does not meet "highly qualified" requirements.
 When students and parents have the choice to leave bad schools, they will often choose to do so. This will lower the talent pool in bad schools, making them into simply the backwaters for under-performing and mischievous students, which will further undermine these schools and student performance in a vicious cycle. 
 No Child Left Behind is intended to provide resources to students that are "failing" to leave and be transported to other schools, where they may be more successful. Yet, the "succeeding" children in these "failing" schools are actually the ones utilizing the funding to go to other schools, making this a mis-allocation and use of funding. [4] 
 Underperforming children often have no choice to transfer from one school to another, when all schools are "underperforming" or "failing", in which case schools frequently deny underperforming students access - as a means of keeping up their school's test scores so as to avoid being labelled "failing" and punished.
 Local failures have necessitated federal intervention to remedy issues like teachers teaching outside their areas of expertise, and complacency in the face of continually failing schools. [5]  Some local governments, notably New York State, have voiced support for NCLB provisions, arguing that local standards had failed to provide adequate oversight over special education, and that NCLB would allow longitudinal data to be more effectively used to monitor Adequate Yearly Progress, also known as AYP. [6] 
  "Fact Sheet on the Major Provisions of the Conference Report to H.R. 1, the No Child Left Behind Act". United States Department of Education  - "H.R. 1 will give local school officials serving rural schools and districts more flexibility and a greater say in how federal funds are used in their schools."
  Chester Finn Jr. "5 Myths About No Child Left Behind". Washington Post. March 30, 2008  - "1. No Child Left Behind is an unprecedented extension of federal control over schools. [...] But NCLB isn't compulsory. States that don't want to jump through its hoops are free to forgo their federal dollars. (Several, such as Utah, Nebraska and Virginia, came close to doing just that, but the lure of those funds helped them overcome their reservations.)"
  "The Impact of the No Child Left Behind Act on Student Achievement and Growth". Northwest Evaluation Association. April 2005  - "State-level tests tend to improve observed achievement on an independent measure, and therefore, increasing the number of grades in which state tests are given may improve achievement more."
 No Child Left Behind imposes many forms of federal regulation and standards over states and their education programs. This violates the right of states, in the US federal system, to control their own independent education programs. 
  Ryan, J. "The Perverse Incentives of No Child Left Behind Act." July 2, 2004  - "the Act unintentionally encourages states to lower their academic standards. [...] The requirement that an increasing percentage of students in every school achieve a certain test score each year is arbitrary and unrealistic, in that it establishes achievement goals without any reference to past achievement levels or rates of achievement growth. Many schools, including some that are considered effective, will be unable to meet these achievement targets. This will create pressure to make the targets easier to meet by dumbing down the tests or making scoring systems more generous. By this process, a law intended to raise academic standards may lower them."
 Because different states can administer their own standards, standards vary across states, which makes it difficult to compare how states are performing relative to one-another. 
 No Child Left Behind, by creating national and state authority over local and community schools, damages the relationship between these schools and their local communities. This undermines community relationships, trust, and accountability.
 This is the same case as with African-Americans during the WWII. They weren't allowed to fight in the war (only until several laws were passed). The African-American situation was similar to our situation. Just because of some fictious, bigoted beliefs, the African-Americans weren't allowed to serve in combat, making both the nation outraged and the African-Americans frustrated. The same applies to gays. It's also just because of some fictious, bigoted beliefs that gays can't fight as well.
  Anna Quindlen. "The End Of An Error". Newsweek. April 4, 2009  - "When it became law in 1993, the policy was sold as an attempt to allow gays to serve if they did not discuss their orientation or participate in homosexual acts—that is, if they lived a life of pretense and self-denial not required of straight counterparts. Shame and second-class status were therefore built into the deal, and unsurprisingly led to a reality in which exemplary soldiers were harassed, investigated and expelled based on "evidence" as negligible as friendly banter or thoughtless gossip."
  "‘Dont Ask, Don’t Tell’ Hurts ROTC, Too". The Cornell Daily Sun. February 14th, 2008  - "[Army Col. Stewart] Bornhoft says "don't ask, don't tell" harms the armed forces because "A simple question of what [you did] this weekend, you can't answer truthfully if you spent it with gay friends. It legally mandates that [LGBT service members] be less than honest and prevents them from having the same rights that other service members have when it comes to spousal benefits or housing allowances or notices to next of kin or simply kissing loved ones when you deploy to defend the country."
 Tech. Sgt. Leonard Matlovich: "I'm intensely proud to be gay and you should be, too. Unless we state our case, we'll continue to be robbed of our role models, our heritage, our history, and our future." [11] 
  "Editorial: Don't ask, don't tell, just act." Emerald Editorial Board. October 15, 2009 : "On National Coming Out Day this past Monday, more than 80 students signed their names to a list that appeared on the back page of the Emerald. The list declared the students, along with professors, co-workers, alumni and friends, among the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender and queer members of our community. It was an act of courage, even in the mostly welcoming city of Eugene, considering signing one’s name under the LGBTQ section of the list is enough to be disqualified from serving in the nation’s military."
  "Obama needs to dump 'Don't Ask, Don't Tell' now." Examiner. October 12, 2009 : "The true conservative respects the principles of liberty and privacy, the principles of meritocracy, and the armed forces our nation has charged to defend it. But "Don't Ask, Don't Tell" undermines all three. [...] True conservatives respect individual freedom and personal privacy, particularly when it comes to what people do in privacy of the bedroom. It's the last place a government should be poking its nose. Anything else is nothing but an unconscionable intrusion into the private lives of American citizens." 
  Cal Thomas. "Don't Ask, Tell or Legitimize." Townhall.com. October 15, 2009 : "The military should not be a test lab. Pressure is building to put female sailors on submarines, along with gay, lesbian, bisexual and transgender people presumably. That many heterosexuals find homosexual behavior immoral and not conducive to unit cohesion is of no concern to the social wrecking crew. [...] What gay activists apparently don't care about is the effect reshaping the military in their image would have on our ability to fight and defend the country, which, after all, is the purpose of a military." 
  Robert Maginnis. "Gays in the Military Debate". Human Events. October 4, 2007  - "The 1993 ban is premised on the fact that there is no constitutional right to serve. Thus, Congress may decide who should or should not serve. For 231 years, the US military has discriminated among potential recruits based on a variety of characteristics and behaviors, with the intent of forming the best possible force. That’s why, according to the General Accountability Office, the Pentagon discharged 59,098 service personnel for drug offenses, 26,513 for weight standards and 9,501 for homosexuality between 1993 and 2004."
  Cal Thomas. "Don't ask don't tell, and don't legitimize." Salt Lake City Tribune. October 15, 2009 : "The place to start is whether citizens of this country, through their elected representatives and the military leaders named by them, have a right to determine what type of service members best serve the interests, safety and security of the United States. I contend we do. The military should not be a test lab." 
 "Don't ask, don't tell" has been upheld five times in federal court, and in a Supreme Court case, Rumsfeld v. Forum for Academic and Institutional Rights, Inc. (2006). [12] 
  "The Pentagon's New Policy Guidelines on Homosexuals in the Military". The New York Times. July 20, 1993 : "Sexual orientation will not be a bar to service unless manifested by homosexual conduct. The military will discharge members who engage in homosexual conduct, which is defined as a homosexual act, a statement that the member is homosexual or bisexual, or a marriage or attempted marriage to someone of the same gender." [13]  In other words, the policy does not prohibit being gay in the military, but only expressions of that homosexuality. 
  Lawrence J. Korb. "The Costs of Don't Ask Don't Tell". Center for American Progress. March 2, 2009  - "Since 1994, the military’s 'Don't Ask, Don't Tell' policy has resulted in the discharge of more than 13,000 military personnel across the services[1] including approximately 800 with skills deemed 'mission critical,' such as pilots, combat engineers, and linguists. These are the very specialties for which the military has faced personnel shortfalls in recent years."
 Soldiers should be judged on their performance not on their sexual orientation. "Don't ask, don't tell" completely ignores performance, judging and even discarding soldiers based on their entirely irrelevant sexual orientation. A good military should be a meritocracy, rewarding good achievement and ability. "Don't ask don't tell" fails to live up to this notion, and surely suffers in its quality as a result.
 In December 2007, 28 retired generals and admirals urged Congress to repeal the policy, citing evidence that 65,000 gay men and women are currently serving in the armed forces, and that there are over 1,000,000 gay veterans. [10]  Ridding the military of homosexuals would, therefore, seriously reduce the number of armed forces available to the US military and impair the United State's ability to project its foreign policy and national security interests.
  Bob Barr. "Don't Ask, Who Cares." The Wall Street Journal. June 13, 2007 : "The U.S. has fired over 11,000 people under the current policy, and in the process has lost over 1,000 service members with 'mission-critical skills,' including 58 Arabic linguists. Researchers at the UCLA School of Law have found that lifting the ban could increase the number of active-duty personnel by over 40,000. Because the military can't fill its slots [, it has lowered its standards, extended tours of duty and increased rotations, further hurting morale and readiness."
  "Don't Ask, Don't Tell, And Try Not To Be A Woman". Jezebel. June 23, 2008  - "Although this picture shows 1 female and 4 male former members of our Armed Forces — which is more or less the ratio of women to men in the U.S. military today — it is not the ratio of lesbians to gay men discharged from the military because of sexual orientation."
  Letter from the American Center for Military Readiness. March 3, 2009  - "When the 2008 [Military Times] survey asked how people would respond if homosexuals were allowed to serve openly, 10% said they would not re-enlist or extend their service, and an additional 14% said they would consider ending their careers. These responses from active duty members are not exact indicators, but they are significant, especially when major efforts are underway to increase the Army and Marine Corps. We cannot afford to lose almost a quarter of the volunteer force, especially among careerists in grades and skills that are not quickly or easily replaceable." 
  Anne Hull. "How 'Don't Tell' Translates". Washington Post. June 18, 2004  - "The Army says the discharged linguists were casualties of their own failure to meet a known policy. 'We have standards,' said Harvey Perritt, a spokesman for the U.S. Army Training and Doctrine Command at Fort Monroe, Va. 'We have physical standards, academic standards. There's no difference between administering these standards and administering 'don't ask, don't tell.' The rules are the rules.'"
  Letter from the American Center for Military Readiness. March 3, 2009  - "Don't ask don't tell was formulated in response to President Clinton's direction to the secretary of defense to find a way to enable homosexuals who wish to serve to do so. The policy removed the question: 'are you homosexual?' from the uniformed services enlistment application form ('don't ask'); asserted that open admission of homosexuality or homosexual conduct were a basis for discharge ('don't tell'); and charged military leaders not to pursue suspected homosexuals without clear evidence of conduct or open admissions." 
  Barry M. Goldwater. "Ban on Gays is Senseless Attempt to Stall the Inevitable"  - "Years ago, I was a lieutenant in charge of an all-black unit. Military leaders at the time believed that blacks lacked leadership potential - period. That seems ridiculous now, as it should. Now, each and every man and woman who serves this nation takes orders from a black man - our own Gen. Colin Powell. [...] Nobody thought that blacks or women could ever be integrated into the military. Many thought that an all-volunteer force could never protect our national interest. Well, it has, and despite those who feared the worst - I among them - we are still the best and will continue to be. [...] The point is that decisions are always a lot easier to make in hindsight. but we seldom have that luxury. That's why the future of our country depends on leadership, and that's what we need now." 
 Race and gender are more fundamental than sexual orientation. Race and gender are clearly hereditary, while there is much more room for debate as to whether sexual orientation is hereditary or voluntary, or some mix of both nature and nurture. So, to compare gays in the military with the past debates on women and blacks in the military goes too far.
  Om Prakash. "The Efficacy of Don't Ask Don't Tell." Winning essay of the 2009 Secretary of Defense National Security Essay Competition : "If the ban is lifted, basic respect of privacy will be required just as when women were fully integrated into the Services. Previously, the military found a lack of sexual privacy, as well as sex between male and females, undermined order, discipline, and morale.32 Dorm and facilities upgrades will no doubt be required. Sexual harassment regulations and sensitivity training would need to be updated, and guidance from leadership would be necessary. These would not be insurmountable obstacles."
 A white male officers said, as quoted in the book "Gays and Lesbians in the Military": "Gays should be held to exactly the same standards of propriety and public behavior as every one else - public or indiscreet sexual behavior ought to be discouraged, whether participants are gay or straight." [14] 
 A white female officer was reported saying in the book "Gays and Lesbians in the Military": "Most gays and lesbians just want to be left alone to do their jobs. My opinion is that most gays will remain in the closet long after the ban is lifted - they just don't want to continue living under threat." [15] 
  Robert Maginnis. "Gays in the Military Debate". Human Events. October 4, 2007  - "If we respect women’s need for privacy from men, then we ought to respect the same need on the part of heterosexuals with regard to homosexuals. Protecting privacy in a military with open homosexuality would necessitate recognizing essentially four sexes and would severely disrupt units."
  "Gays in the Military." About.com : "What I fail to understand is exactly how the military would be expected to house openly-admitted homosexuals, in an environment where we force people to room together, without seriously violating the sexual privacy rights of the heterosexual majority, or causing major problems with morale."
  John Shalikashvili. "Second Thoughts on Gays in the Military". New York Times. January 2, 2007  - "Last year I held a number of meetings with gay soldiers and marines, including some with combat experience in Iraq, and an openly gay senior sailor who was serving effectively as a member of a nuclear submarine crew. These conversations showed me just how much the military has changed, and that gays and lesbians can be accepted by their peers. [...] This perception is supported by a new Zogby poll of more than 500 service members returning from Afghanistan and Iraq, three quarters of whom said they were comfortable interacting with gay people. And 24 foreign nations, including Israel, Britain and other allies in the fight against terrorism, let gays serve openly, with none reporting morale or recruitment problems."
  Lawrence J. Korb. "The Costs of Don't Ask Don't Tell". Center for American Progress. March 2, 2009  - "[Opposition to "don't ask don't tell is] shared by those in the upper ranks of the military as well. General John M. Shalikashvili, the Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff when the 'Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell' policy was enacted, no longer supports the policy. He now believes that allowing gay men and women to serve openly in the military would no longer create intolerable tension among personnel or undermine cohesion."
 Americans in the military are inclined to oppose gays serving openly in the military and support "don't ask don't tell". A 2006 opinion poll by the independent Military Times newspapers showed that only 30% of those surveyed think openly gay people should serve. 59% are opposed. [23] 
 Former Senator and Secretary of Defense William Cohen spoke against the policy publicly in early January 2007: "I now believe that if gay men and lesbians served openly in the United States military, they would not undermine the efficacy of the armed forces." [1] 
  Barry M. Goldwater. "Ban on Gays is Senseless Attempt to Stall the Inevitable" : "It's no great secret that military studies have proved again and again that there's no valid reason for keeping the ban on gays. Some thought gays were crasy, but then found that wasn't true. then they decided that gays were a security risk, but again the Department of Defense decided that wasn't so."
 US Army Forces Commander Kim Waldron reported in 2005, "The bottom line is some people are using sexual orientation to avoid deployment." [2] 
  Om Prakash. "The Efficacy of Don't Ask Don't Tell." Winning essay of the 2009 Secretary of Defense National Security Essay Competition : "DADT also represents a unique challenge for commanders. Normally charged with knowing everything about their troops, commanders are now trying to avoid certain areas for fear of being accused of conducting witch hunts38 or looking as if they are selectively enforcing a law they have moral reservations against. Vice Admiral Jack Shanahan, USN, stated, 'Everyone was living a big lie—the homosexuals were trying to hide their sexual orientation and the commanders were looking the other way because they didn’t want to disrupt operations by trying to enforce the law.'"
  Robert Maginnis. "Gays in the Military Debate". Human Events. October 4, 2007  - "The other component of combat effectiveness is readiness, medical and personnel. In 1993, the Army’s surgeon general conceded that the homosexual lifestyle is unhealthy. A Navy study has found that HIV infections within the force have declined since passage of the 1993 ban. This has likely saved the taxpayer medical costs. It is significant that HIV positive service members, although retained in the military, may not be deployed overseas or on ships."
 Gays in the military would adversely affect the chain of command in the military, as certain relationships would become less trustworthy and tensions would undermine the authority of leaders and the willingness of troops to follow.
  "EDITORIAL: Please don't ask again." Washington Times. October 13, 2009 : "The most recent Military Times survey showed that 58 percent of military respondents oppose a policy change, and 24 percent said they would either leave the military (10 percent) or consider terminating their careers after serving their tours of duty (14 percent). [...] the White House isn't close to having military support for ending 'don't ask, don't tell.' The Obama team could be justifiably concerned that pushing change would be seen as a dangerous distraction at a time when the president is having difficulty formulating a strategy for the war in Afghanistan."
 Doing so would require construction of separate bunks and lavatory facilities to prevent unnecessary tension from same-sex attraction in close proximity."
  Dr. Aaron Belkin. "Abandoning 'Don't Ask, Don't Tell' will decrease anti-gay violence." Palm Center. May 1, 2005 : "Lessons from foreign armed forces, as well as U.S. police and fire departments that have lifted their bans, reveal that, in the worst case, lifting the gay ban will have no impact on the level of anti-gay abuse. But in the more likely scenario, lifting the ban should decrease violence. [...] After the British lifted the ban, however, there were few reports of gay-bashing. Professor Gwyn Harries-Jenkins, a leading expert on the British military, reported 'a slight decrease in the incidence of harassment.' [...] The reason why anti-gay violence does not increase, and usually decreases after the lifting of a ban is that victims of abuse are able to report harassment without fearing an investigation into their own sexuality. Perpetrators know that victims are more likely to report them, and are therefore less likely to engage in misbehavior in the first place."
 "Don't ask don't tell" helps keep the sexual-orientation of gays a secret, which protects them from the potential of other servicemen acting violently against them because they are gay. If gays openly stated their sexuality, and if they were more free to enact their homosexual behavior and personalities, they would obviously be much more recognizable as gay, and would be targeted more. 
 C. Dixon Osburn, who heads the Servicemembers Legal Defense Network, a gay advocacy group in Washington, said in March of 2007, "General Pace's comments [against the moral soundness of homosexuality] are outrageous, insensitive and disrespectful to the 65,000 lesbian and gay troops now serving in our armed forces. Our men and women in uniform make tremendous sacrifices for our country, and deserve General Pace's praise, not his condemnation."
  Megan Coffey. "Gay troops suffer under "Don't Ask, Don't Tell". Examiner. October 13, 2009 : "As hard as deployment is on the heterosexual relationships of troops deployed on the battlefield, it is exponentially harder on the same-sex relationships of deployed troops, because gay personnel must pretend their partners don't exist. [...] If an LGBT troop is injured or killed, his or her partner may never even find out. Same-sex partners cannot see their loved ones off or welcome them home from deployments in public; they cannot send them openly affectionate letters or emails, or talk to them by phone, or send them care packages or photos, or even say or write 'I love you' to each other--all under the stress of separation and the daily fear of imminent death." 
 "Don't ask don't tell" made US military policy more flexible and accommodating to gays in the military. The key element was that shifted policy from officers overtly seeking, persecuting, court marshaling, and discharging (often dishonorably), toward a policy that restricted the ability of officers and commanders to inquire on the orientation of a soldier and pursue subsequent action. It also set a higher burden of proof in demonstrating that a person was a homosexual. This general shift toward accommodation was an improvement and should be recognized as such. 
 As long as they keep their sexual preferences secret, there are no problems. If they expose them, however, problems arise with other soldiers. They often share very close quarters and may make other soldiers uncomfortable.
 "Don't ask don't tell" is fair in the sense that commanders and officers alike are barred from asking about the sexuality of soldiers. This levels the playing field to a certain extent. It means that commanders and officers cannot alienate and persecute soldiers out of speculation that they may be gay. This was the compromise that was struck when Bill Clinton sought to enable gays in the military, but was met with heavy resistance. Restrictions on officers and commanders inquiring about the orientation of members of the military was an improvement over the previous policy, which forbid gays and allowed overt inquires and persecutions.
  Bruce Maiman. "Obama needs to dump 'Don't Ask, Don't Tell' now." Examiner. October 12, 2009 : "Researchers at the UCLA School of Law have found that the ban has discouraged nearly 45,000 Americans from joining and remaining in the armed forces. That's an increase in active-duty personnel by more than the number of troops General Stanley McChrystal says we need in Afghanistan. Where are those supporters of "Don't Ask, Don't Tell" who want the president to follow General McChrystal's advice?"
  "Bill targets 'don't ask, don't tell'". USA Today. March 12, 2007  - "Marine Maj. Stewart Upton, a Pentagon spokesman, says nearly 11,000 in war zones. 'We are enforcing the policy,' he says. 'We are not experiencing any problems with recruiting and retention.'"
 Polls have shown that a large majority of the American public favors allowing gay and lesbian people to serve openly in the U.S. military. A national poll conducted in May 2005 by the Boston Globe showed 79% of participants having nothing against openly gay people from serving in the military. In a 2008 Washington Post–ABC News poll, 75% of Americans – including 80% of Democrats, 75% of independents, and 66% of conservatives – said that openly gay people should be allowed to serve in the military. [24] 
 Jeff Cleghorn, a former lawyer with the Servicemembers Legal Defense Network, a gay-rights group monitoring military justice, said to the Washington Post in June 18, 2004 article, "In the case of some, they get in the Army and they are traumatized by an awareness that the military is 20 years behind the societal curve." [25] 
 A statement issued by the retired officers in March, 2009: "We see a great many downsides to attempting to enforce on the military something I don't know is widely accepted in American society."
  Cal Thomas. "Don't ask don't tell, and don't legitimize." Salt Lake City Tribune. October 15, 2009 : "Opinion polls have shown the public shifting in favor of gays in the military, including a recent Gallup poll which found that 'Americans are six percentage points more likely than they were four years ago to favor allowing openly gay men and lesbian women to serve in the military, 69 percent to 63 percent.' That is mostly because there are few leaders who wish to give voice to opposing points of view. They fear being shouted down, or being accused of 'homophobia.'"
  "Report: 'Don't Ask, Don't Tell' costs $363M". USA Today. February 14, 2006  - "Discharging troops under the Pentagon's policy on gays cost $363.8 million over 10 years, almost double what the government concluded a year ago, a private report says. [...] The report, to be released Tuesday by a University of California Blue Ribbon Commission, questioned the methodology the Government Accountability Office used when it estimated that the financial impact of the 'Don't Ask, Don't Tell' policy was at least $190.5 million. [...] 'It builds on the previous findings and paints a more complete picture of the costs,' said Rep. Marty Meehan, D-Mass., who has proposed legislation that would repeal the policy."
 Even if it is true that DADT costs the military some money in terms of recruitment and retention, this may be offset and justified by the gains in military efficacy, particularly in regards to upholding unit cohesion. These military and war-fighting benefits clearly justify the relatively small monetary cost of don't ask don't tell.  
 Argued in the section on talent, recruiting, and retention, there is good evidence that there are many members of the military as well as prospective recruits that oppose gays in the military, and who may leave the military or avoid enlisting if gays are allowed to serve openly. This would be very costly in dollar-terms to the military. And, while some homosexuals may be lost via a ban on homosexuals, and while this may be costly, it can easily be argued that this is more than outweighed by the costs of losing opponents to gays in the military. 
 President Barack Obama said in a January 2009 statement to the Stars and Strips military newspaper, "The key test for military service should be patriotism, a sense of duty, and a willingness to serve [,not sexual orientation]." [6] 
 A white female US military officer said, according to "Gays and lesbians in the military": "I feel as long as they can perform the jobs required of them, they should be allowed in the military. What goes on behind closed doors is none of the military's business. As long as gays and lesbians keep their private lives out of the workplace, I foresee no problems." [7] 
 General Colin Powell, at a Senate hearing in 1993: "[H]omosexuals have privately served well in the past and are continuing to serve well today." [8] 
 Homosexuality is simply incompatible with the principles of military services, which include a focus on the mission, service, discipline, bodily integrity, and control over one's impulses. Homosexuality does not appropriately reflect these principles. This sentiment was reflected in an article signed by Gen. Carl E. Mundy, Jr., a former commandant of the Marine Corps; Adm. Leighton W. Smith, a former commander of U.S. Naval Forces Europe; Gen. Charles A. Horner, who commanded U.S. aerial forces during the 1990-91 Gulf War; and Adm. Jerome L. Johnson, a former vice chief of Naval Operations. They wrote, succinctly, "homosexuality is incompatible with military service". [9] 
 Many gay members of the military make the following argument as to why it is illogical that homosexuals would choose: "I wish I could decide who I fell in love with; if someone thinks I would consciously choose such a life where I am forced to live in hiding and fear, knowing the bulk of the population is against you, is just crazy. I can’t help who I am.' 'Why would I choose to suffer like this?' Ultimately" [16] 
 Many argue that homosexuality is a choice, rather than an inherent trait that warrants protection and toleration. It would follow from this that the military is not obligated to accept or tolerate gays, or gays serving openly. One white female US military officer was quoted in the book "Gays and lesbians in the military" as saying: "It is a moral choice - people aren't born homosexual, they choose (though some can have some tendencies - they can be cured). It is a sin." [17] 
  "Don't Ask, Don't Tell? No, Just Don't Be." Jezebel. Feb 11 2009  - "Amy Brian enlisted in the military for 3 years in the 90s, and then came back in 2003 only to be deployed to Iraq. But it was a trip to Wal-Mart that did her in. [...] In that trip, a civilian co-worker at the U.S. Property and Fiscal Office saw Brian kiss her girlfriend. So despite not asking nor telling, she was kicked out of the military. [...] The federal law states the military must have proof of the homosexual conduct, an admission from the soldier or an attempt or successful application for marriage to another gay person by the soldier. [...] Apparently, 'proof' is one person noticing that you're living your personal life on your own terms, and requires no corroboration."
 "Don't ask don't tell" requires that leaders do not pursue gay individuals unless there is clear evidence/proof that they have engaged in homosexual behavior or a self-admission of engaging in such behavior. Military leaders are charged with not pursuing and prosecuting gay individuals. Evidence must present itself by its own accord. This is a high bar of evidence and proof, consistent with principles of justice and due process.
  "Gays in the US military." Religious tolerance : "In the past, gays and lesbians were not permitted in any of the armed forces in the West. Most countries have abandoned their anti-gay policies in recent years, as mental health professionals determined that a homosexual orientation is fixed, and unchosen, a normal and natural orientation for a minority of adults, and not a mental illness. Among the armies in the Western industrialized world, Austria, Australia, Belgium, Canada, Denmark, France, Germany, Ireland, Israel, Japan, The Netherlands, Norway, Spain, Sweden, and the UK allow gays and lesbians to serve freely."
 C. Dixon Osburn, who heads the Servicemembers Legal Defense Network, a gay advocacy group in Washington, said in March 2007, "General Pace1s comments are outrageous, insensitive and disrespectful to the 65,000 lesbian and gay troops now serving in our armed forces. [...] As a Marine and a military leader, General Pace knows that prejudice should not dictate policy. It is inappropriate for the Chairman to condemn those who serve our country because of his own personal bias. He should immediately apologize for his remarks." [18] 
 A white female military officer was quoted in the book "Gays and Lesbians in the Military," as saying: "About moral choices, let's not let people who have had premarital sex or an affair be in the army either!!! Then there would be no one protecting our country. And bible bashers need to reread the section that says he without guilt should cast the first stone." [19] 
  Barry M. Goldwater. "Ban on Gays is Senseless Attempt to Stall the Inevitable"  - "The country and the military know that eventually the ban will be lifted. The only remaining questions are how much muck we will all be dragged through, and how many brave Americans like Tom Paniccia and Margarethe Cammermeyer will have their lives and careers destroyed in a senseless attempt to stall the inevitable." 
 Marine General Peter Pace, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said in a March 2007 interview with the Chicago Tribune, "I believe homosexual acts between two individuals are immoral and that we should not condone immoral acts." [20] 
 Elaine Donnelly, president of the non-profit Center for Military Readiness which supports continuing the ban: "The law respects the power of sexuality and the normal human desire for modesty in sexual matters." [21] 
  Cal Thomas. "Don't ask don't tell, and don't legitimize." Salt Lake City Tribune. October 15, 2009 : "The gays in the military and gay marriage issues are part of a broader attempt by liberals to restructure society. Social activists despise biblical morality (which heterosexuals could use a little more of, too), traditional values that have been proven to work when tried, and numerous other cultural mores. This is not an opinion. It is also not a secret."
 A 2006 Zogby International poll of military members found that 72% of respondents who had experience with gays or lesbians in their unit said that the presence of gay or lesbian unit members had either no impact or a positive impact on their personal morale, while 67% said as much for overall unit morale. 73% of respondents said that they felt comfortable in the presence of gay and lesbian personnel. [3] 
  Kenneth Jost. "Repealing 'Don't Ask, Don't Tell' With the Presidential Pen." October 8, 2009 : "Within the U.S. military, “don’t ask, don’t tell” has hurt rather than helped unit cohesion. For gay service members, the policy fosters suspicions of their colleagues and diminishes military comradeship at a time when more and more straight service members have no problem interacting with gays. But for homophobic service members, the policy contributes to a climate that encourages anti-gay harassment and ignores it when it occurs."
 The argument that the presence of gay troops will undermine morale and unit cohesion is premised on the idea that US troops are unable to handle their emotions and maintain their professional focus in the presence of gay peers. This is an insult to the professionalism of US soldiers. As the Rand Corporation concluded in a 2000 brief on the topic: "it is not necessary to like someone to work with him or her, so long as members share a commitment to the group’s objectives." [4] 
 Gay relations, especially inside a hardened place like the military could be beneficial. In some ways, this could be analogous to the benefits of having women around men as a means of maintaining decorum. It would also strengthen honesty and trust between fellow soldiers, as gays would no longer have to lie about their sexuality.
  Om Prakash. "The Efficacy of Don't Ask Don't Tell." Winning essay of the 2009 Secretary of Defense National Security Essay Competition : "There are potential lessons to learn from other countries that have lifted the ban on homosexuals serving openly. There was no mass exodus of heterosexuals, and there was also no mass “coming-out” of homosexuals. Prior to lifting their bans, in Canada 62 percent of servicemen stated that they would refuse to share showers with a gay soldier, and in the United Kingdom, two-thirds of males stated that they would not willingly serve in the military if gays were allowed. In both cases, after lifting their bans, the result was 'no-effect.'44 In a survey of over 100 experts from Australia, Canada, Israel, and the United Kingdom, it was found that all agreed the decision to lift the ban on homosexuals had no impact on military performance, readiness, cohesion, or ability to recruit or retain, nor did it increase the HIV rate among troops."
 The "Don't ask, don't tell" law (Federal law Pub.L. 103-160 [10 U.S.C. § 654].) prohibits anyone who "demonstrate(s) a propensity or intent to engage in homosexual acts' from serving in the armed forces of the United States, for the following central reason: "One of the most critical elements in combat capability is unit cohesion, that is, the bonds of trust among individual service members that make the combat effectiveness of a military unit greater than the sum of the combat effectiveness of the individual unit members. . . . The presence in the armed forces of persons who demonstrate a propensity or intent to engage in homosexual acts would create an unacceptable risk to the high standards of morale, good order and discipline, and unit cohesion that are the essence of military capability." [5] 
 The 2006 Zogby poll that cites a majority of US troops expressing comfort with gay troops, also shows a sizable minority of nearly 28% expressing that the presence of gay troops damaged their morale. Such an opposition, albeit in the minority, certainly suggests that the open presence of gays in the military will, overall, undermine troop morale and cohesion, by alienating this minority and creating a rift between it and the majority.
  Robert Maginnis. "Gays in the Military Debate". Human Events. October 4, 2007  - "Sexual tensions and sex-based favoritism in intimate settings destroy cohesion, whether they involve opposite- or same-sex attraction."
  John Luddy. "The Military Gay Ban: Why Don't Ask, Don't Tell Don't Work". Heritage Foundation, Executive Memorandum #359. July 1, 1993  - "Political activism elsewhere in society suggests that weakening the ban would be followed by quotas and lawsuits if homosexuals were not promoted in representative numbers. This would destroy the cohesion of a military unit, and erode the military's successful merit-based promotion system."  
  John Shalikashvili. "Second Thoughts on Gays in the Military". New York Times. January 2, 2007  - "In the early 1990s, large numbers of military personnel were opposed to letting openly gay men and lesbians serve. President Bill Clinton, who promised to lift the ban during his campaign, was overwhelmed by the strength of the opposition, which threatened to overturn any executive action he might take. The compromise that came to be known as 'don’t ask, don’t tell' was thus a useful speed bump that allowed temperatures to cool for a period of time while the culture continued to evolve. [...] The question before us now is whether enough time has gone by to give this policy serious reconsideration. Much evidence suggests that it has." 
 "Don't ask don't tell" was crafted in the early 90s, when the country and the military were deeply divided as to whether gays should be allowed to serve openly in the military. The country remains deeply divided on this question. "Don't ask don't tell" strikes an appropriate compromise in this divided environment, avoiding overt approval of homosexuality in the military, while accommodating it.
 According to some sources, over 85 percent of the world’s countries have at least one official language. [9]  Therefore, the United States is at odds with international norms in not having an official language. An official language is not out the ordinary or controversial, and this is evidenced by the international adoption of this norm. The United States, therefore, should take comfort in this fact if/when it decides to make English its official language. 
 Many people today believe that the US is the "#1" country in the world in several important ways; perhaps being *different* from countries with an official national language is one of our advantages. It certainly fits with America's inclusive history and culture. The United States has never been known to follow. Why should it do so by adopting English as its official language?
  "Linguistic Unity Is Critical in an Increasingly Diverse Society." ProEnglish on Opposing Views.com : "America's linguistic unity, that enabled the melting-pot crucible to forge one nation out of millions of immigrants from all over the world, is under pressure as never before in our history. The record numbers of non-English speaking immigrants the United States is receiving is adding to the nation’s diversity and putting enormous pressure on the assimilation process."
  Linguistic Society of America Resolution on English Only. July 1, 1987 : "The English language in America is not threatened. All evidence suggests that recent immigrants are overwhelmingly aware of the social and economic advantages of becoming proficient in English, and require no additional compulsion to learn the language." Indeed, roughly 94% of Americans already speak English. This is a very high number, compared to other countries that have much greater linguistic stratification. It is not necessary, therefore, to change anything and make any greater effort at compelling Americans to learn English.  
 Bilingual initiatives can be very costly. They require hiring bilingual teachers, creating bilingual curriculum, creating tests in the foreign language, and buying different text books for these students. All of this adds expenses to schools who's budgets are already stretched thin.  
  "Why Official English?" ProEnglish.org : "today, in segregated classrooms, so-called 'bilingual education' keeps immigrant children from learning English, by teaching them in foreign languages. And millions of people cannot find good-paying jobs, because they lack the ability to speak English with customers, co-workers or employers." 
 Immersion is a very effective strategy used in university programs, where college students are sent abroad and immersed in a language. Sometime, there is a requirement in these programs that students speak no English at all, and only the new language being learned. This is because immersion forces an individual, under high pressure, to learn the language quickly. English-only policies in schools follow this logic, teak kids English more quickly, and subsequently benefit them in their lives in the long-run.
 Too much responsibility is often placed on schools to accommodate children. It is the parent's responsibility to help their child learn English or to make sure that they are retaining their native language at the same time as they learn English.
  "Congress Should Prioritize English Learning, Not English-only." MALDEF on Opposing Views.com : "English Language Learners want to learn English but are too often hampered in their efforts to achieve full proficiency.  English-only and Official English laws do nothing constructive to advance the important goal of English proficiency. 
 In the 1974 case of Lau v. Nichols, the Supreme Court ruled that: "there is no equality of treatment merely by providing students with the same facilities, textbooks, teachers, and curriculum; for students who do not understand English are effectively foreclosed from any meaningful education" (U.S. Supreme Court, 414 U.S. 563) [5] 
 If young individuals are immersed in English at a young age, there is a significant risk that they will lose, or diminish, their first language. 
  James Vazins. "Boston students struggle with English-only rule. Many nonnatives quit the system." Boston Glob. April 7th, 2009 : "Students not fluent in English have floundered in Boston schools since voters approved a law change six years ago requiring school districts to teach them all subjects in English rather than their native tongue, according to a report being released tomorrow. [...] In one of the most striking findings, the study found that the high school dropout rate nearly doubled for students still learning to speak and write in English, according to the report by the Mauricio Gastón Institute for Latino Community Development and Public Policy at the University of Massachusetts at Boston and the Center for Collaborative Education."
  USEnglish.org. "Why is Official English necessary?" : "Official English is common sense government. The designation of official English will eliminate the needless duplication of government services in multiple languages. It is not the responsibility of the government to provide services in the 322 different languages spoken in the United States. It is the responsibility of each individual to either learn English or to find a friend or family member to translate. The money formerly spent on multi-lingual services can instead provide immigrants with the assistance they really need-classes to teach them English."
  USEnglish.org. "Why is Official English necessary?" : "because official English is only a limitation on government, it does not affect the languages spoken in private businesses, religious services or private conversations."
 Official English only limit requirements on the federal government documents to provide documents in services in languages other than English. It would not limit states, private businesses, communities, nor families. 
 Eric Crafton - Nashville, Tenn., City Council - said in 2009: “English is under attack. The fact that making English our Government’s official language is even controversial should give us all pause." [6] 
 An overwhelming majority of US citizens already speaks English. For a major part of them English is a mother tongue. So, if there is to be one official language, English is clearly the most natural and logical choice. In addition, 30 U.S. states have already enacted laws making English their official language.
 The U.S. was founded by 13 British colonies. Both the US declaration of independence and US constitution are written in English. This itself make English the "de facto" official language of the United States. Why not make it the de jure official language?
 English is the official language of over 30 US states, a vast majority of %60. There have been no problems in adopting the provision in these states. Therefore, there should be no problems adopting it nationally.  
 The US and 20 of its constituent states (Alaska, Connecticut, Delaware, Louisiana, Maine, Maryland, Michigan, Minnesota, Nevada, New Mexico, New York, Ohio, Oklahoma, Oregon, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, Texas, Vermont, Washington, West Virginia) seem to have muddled along so far without any official national language. Linguist Geoffrey Pullum, in an essay entitled "Here come the linguistic fascists," points out that English is far from under threat in the United States, and argues that "making English the official language of the United States of America is about as urgently called for as making hotdogs the official food at baseball games." [7] 
 There should be no official national language. One of the great strengths of the United States is that we can experiment on a state-by-state basis. When one state does things one way, and a neighboring state does things the other way, it is much easier to see the advantages of doing things one way or the other. This allows each state to choose one way or the other based on objective evidence and results. And, indeed, 30 states have already opted to have English as their state's official language. While, some may disagree on this side with the decision of any one state to adopt official English, the state-by-state approach may still be considered superior to a national English policy.
 If English is made into the official language, but you don't actually change anything -- kind of like English is the official langauge of California, but the  California Department of Motor Vehicles  still prints the Driver License Handbook in at least 8 other languages -- then it's a nice symbolic guesture, but why bother?
 Official English is just symbolic. It probably will not change any policies, it's just meant to send a message. But, this message is highly charged and controversial, as it is often interpreted as exclusionary, anti-immigrant, and even racist. Such consequences usually make a symbolic gesture such as Official English a bad idea.
 President Theodore Roosevelt once said: "We have one language here, and that is the English language, and we intend to see that the [assimilation] crucible turns our people out as Americans." [1] 
  US English, a US advocacy organization. "Why is official English necessary?" : "Official English unites Americans, who speak more than 322 languages (2000, U.S. Census), by providing a common means of communication."
 Steve Balich, the Homer, Illinois township's clerk and author of a July 2010 resolution calling for official English: "We want the people who come to this country to become official U.S. citizens and to learn to speak. It's really as simple as that" [2]  This is a common provision in many countries abroad, and a reasonable request by a government and nation that has always conducted its official governing in English.
  "Why official English?" : "Official English doesn't mean 'English only.' None of the 30 states with official English laws prohibit government agencies from using another languages when there is a compelling public interest for doing so. These include: protecting public health and safety, assuring equality before the law, promoting tourism, teaching foreign languages, providing for national defense, and many other legitimate, common sense needs." The government can act to provide these services when necessary. But, it is another thing entirely for a citizen to demand these services as a right.
 This isn't about race. People from every race come to the US and learn to understand the American dialect of English. 
 Suggesting that learning English is easy for some races and difficult for other races is, itself, racist. Anybody can learn English. It is not too high of a burden to ask them to do so in order to live in the United States.
 Real forms of discrimination aim at the inherent characteristics of an individual that they cannot change (such as their skin color or national origin). But, language is different, as an individual can choose to learn English. If they feel disadvantaged because they are not able to read government documents, ballots, or defend themselves in court, it is fully their choice to change this by learning English. 
 There are over three hundred languages spoken in the United States. And, there are roughly 15 million American citizens (about 5% of the total population of 300 million) who do not speak English. Giving all of those individuals, in all of those different languages, the right to demand government services in their own language is preposterous. If we give Spanish speaking people this right, we would naturally have to extend the right to all the other 300 some-odd languages and those that speak them. This would unreasonably burden government services, adding a huge layer of bureaucracy and costs. Even then, inevitably, somebody with some obscure language will find that their "right" to have services provided to them in their own language will not be adequately fulfilled at some government facility. This is a bad combination in public policy; a right that cannot be provided adequately that nevertheless adds billions of dollars in extra costs for US government and taxpayers. 
  Linguistic Society of America Resolution on English Only. July 1, 1987 : "American unity has never rested primarily on unity of language, but rather on common political and social ideals."
  Linguistic Society of America Resolution on English Only. July 1, 1987 : "History shows that a common language cannot be imposed by force of law, and that attempts to do so usually create divisiveness and disunity. This has been the effect, for example, of the efforts of the English to impose the English language in Ireland, of Soviet efforts to impose the Russian language on non-Russian nationalities, and of Franco's efforts to impose Spanish on the Basques and Catalans."
 Switzerland has four official languages: French, German, Italian and Romansh. All four languages have equal status and children are educated in the language spoken in the region where they live. And, Switzerland is a country that has very strong unity and economic functionality. [3] 
 "Language Rights Are Protected Under Civil Rights Law." MALDEF on OpposingViews.com: "Language is not only a barrier to communication, but also an identifying characteristic of an individual’s ethnicity and national origin. [...] Congress passed the Civil Rights Act of 1964, which prohibits discrimination based on race, ancestry, national origin or ethnicity. Section 601 of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 bans discrimination based "on the ground of race, color, or national origin," in "any program or activity receiving Federal financial assistance.” Title VI of the Civil Rights Act provides the foundation for ensuring nondiscrimination in all federal programs and services, including those provided to language minorities."[See extended argument on OpposingViews.com]
 Individuals involved in the official english movement are very often driven by anti-immigrant feelings, or pure racism. For example, John Tanton, the founder of the main political lobbying organization in this movement called US English, had to resign in 1986 after making derogatory remarks about Hispanics. [4] 
 America is a very diverse country that has been culturally enriched by immigrants from around the world. As a sign of respect to all these people it should not limit its citizens by introducing English as the only official language. 
 It gives the impression that English is more important than other languages, thereby devaluing them.
  "What's Wrong With 'English Only' Laws?" American Civil Liberties Union. September 8, 2000 : "English Only" laws, which declare English to be the country's official language and bar government employees from providing non-English language assistance and services, are inconsistent with both the First Amendment right to communicate with or petition the government, and the right to equality."
 If the government is not required to provide a defendant with appropriate language services, this may significantly undermine their ability to defend themselves, thus undermining equal protection in court.
  "Americans Overwhelmingly Support Official English" ProEnglish on OpposingViews.com : "National polls and state referendums show conclusively that Americans, including Hispanic Americans, overwhelmingly support Official English. 87% of American voters support making English the official language of the United States. 77% of Hispanic voters think English should be the official language of government operations. 82% of Americans support legislation that would require the federal government to conduct business solely in English. 72% of American young people ages 18-24, including majorities of Hispanic and Asian-American young people, favor making English the official language. 74% of American voters agree that election ballots should be exclusively in English. Nearly two thirds of all Hispanic adults --65 percent -- favor making English the nation's official language." [See extended argument on  OpposingViews.com ]
 The main argument against Official English is that it is discrimination against non-English speakers, violating their right to certain forms of protection under the law. Such minority rights are important to protect, and equally so against the opinions of the majority of Americans who may believe it is OK to violate these rights. Following majority opinion in advancing Official English would subscribe to a tyranny of the majority philosophy. 
  "Why official language?" English as our official language : "Learning to speak English empowers immigrants. By more than 2-1 immigrants themselves say the U.S. should expect new immigrants to learn English (1) and by a 9-1 margin Hispanic immigrants believe learning English is essential to succeed in the U.S."
 While many say that there is plenty motivation for immigrants to learn English, then why is 5% of the population, 15 million, or 5 in every 100 individuals unable to speak English? Clearly, there is room for improvement, and Official English is a good way to give an extra boost of encouragement to those in the gap. 
 "The Myth of English as a Threatened Language." MALDEF on OpposingViews.com: "Latino immigrants are learning English, and doing so as quickly as or more quickly than previous generations of immigrants.  As is typical of immigrant populations in the United States, by the third generation most Latinos tend to speak only English.  Latino immigrants, then, do not need official English or English-only legislation to coerce them into learning English; that desire and determination already runs deep in the Latino community."
 "The Myth of English as a Threatened Language." MALDEF on OpposingViews.com: "The problem is not that immigrants are unwilling to learn English, but that there are not enough available educational resources for them. Today, many thousands of immigrants throughout the country are on the waiting lists for adult English classes."
 If an immigrant does not know English, and an accident happens, they need to know how to communicate with a 9/11 agent, or police that arrive on the seen. It is unreasonable to rely on Spanish speaking infrastructure in the event of emergency, when rapid communication is needed.
 Official English does not constrain the government to always, in every situation, providing only English in its services. It, rather, makes a general rule that the government is not obligated to provide these services, but allows for the government to provide services in other languages when there is an exceptional, compelling state interest to do so, particularly for health, safety, tourism, economic development, and for libraries' foreign language materials. [8] 
 If a driver's license can be issued through a non-English test, then the driver with that license may be unable to read road-signs, which can be a public safety hazard.
 Official English encourages individuals to learn English, which is essential in being able to participate in American democracy.
  "Tennessee becomes first state to protect businesses with English workplace policies." US English. June 24th, 2010 : "With the signature of Democratic Governor Phil Bredesen, Tennessee became the first state today to protect the rights of businesses to have English-in-the-workplace policies where there is a 'legitimate business necessity.' [...] The bill, which passed overwhelmingly with bipartisan support in the state House and Senate, was designed to comply with rules set by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission and to protect businesses from lawsuits. Federal courts have affirmed that businesses can require their employees to speak English during business operations and for safety reasons."
 "English-Only Negatively Impacts the Government’s Response to Disasters." MALDEF on OpposingViews.com: "Examples of situations in which government officials must communicate efficiently and effectively to ensure the safety of the general populace abound. In the event of a natural disaster or terrorist threat, for example, federal emergency workers must be able to convey important information and instructions to as broad an audience as possible, a need that may require the use of languages other than English.  A national English-only policy would impede the government’s ability to convey warnings or post danger or hazard signs in languages other than English. Such a policy would prevent local law enforcement from effectively investigating crimes, communicating with crime victims or witnesses, or providing critically needed services to victims of domestic violence and abuse?
  Linguistic Society of America Resolution on English Only. July 1, 1987 : "It is to the economic and cultural advantage of the nation as a whole that its citizens should be proficient in more than one language, and to this end we should encourage both foreign language study for native English speakers, and programs that enable speakers with other linguistic backgrounds to maintain proficiency in those languages along with English."
 If official English has the effect of diminishing linguistic diversity in a country, this will be bad for international diplomatic efforts abroad and at home that require this diversity. 
 If we do not undertake geoengineering, the effects will be much worse than anything that could happen if we did work with it and possibly even made mistakes. The tests that have already been carried out have been very successful with limited or no unintended consequences. Examples include solar radiation projects (such as using pale-colored roofs to reflect the sun’s light, and doing the same to pavement). Other test projects such as the iron fertilization of algae blooms have gone well, with little or no consequences.
 Gwynne Dyer, author of Climate Wars: "Holding the temperature down is an intervention. It’s an intervention that’s intended to be temporary. It wins you time to get your emissions down. The goal is still to get the emissions down. And many other goals that you and I would agree upon are attainable, but only with time. And we don’t have the time. We are going to be—the last report out of the Hadley Center suggested, on current track, we are four degrees Celsius hotter, average global temperature, by 2060. It’s only fifty years." [2] 
 Ken Caldeira, of the Carnegie Institution for Science, thinks we should test the technology gradually, comparing it to a knob on a device: "You can turn it gently or violently. The more gently it gets turned, the less disruptive the changes will be. Environmentally, the least risky thing to do is to slowly scale up small field experiments. But politically that’s the riskiest thing to do." [3] 
 Very rarely, one of these projects goes bad, and even when they do, much is learned and the problem is soon fixed. Out of mistakes, a lot of astounding new ideas are born, and with these ideas, genial solutions are thought of. This has been shown throughout human history. Medicine is a good example, where plenty of mistakes and risks are present in the testing and production of new medicines, and yet nobody doubts the overall benefits of medicine. The same applies to the research, testing, and implementation of geoengineering.
 One of the simplest ways to combat Climate Change is by painting houses white. As we all know, the color white reflects the sun, sending more solar radiation back into space instead of allowing it to remain in the Earth's atmosphere where it can heat the climate. There are no negative effects to the climate by painting a roof a different color. If employed in a large enough area, it could reflect enough solar rays to cool the surrounding area a few degrees. This, and many other "geoengineering" approaches like reforestation, are innocuous and yet are often bound up in the irrational fears that often surround the field of geoengineering as a whole.
 Advances in human technology and wealth can make solutions like geoengineering manageable in the long-term and safe. This is not human hubris; it is a natural consequence of human advancement.
  Alan Robock. "Has the time come for geoengineering?" The Bulletin. August 14th, 2008 : "Scientists cannot possibly account for all of the complex climate interactions or predict all of the impacts of geoengineering. Climate models are improving, but scientists are discovering that climate is changing more rapidly than they predicted, for example, the surprising and unprecedented extent to which Arctic sea ice melted during the summer of 2007. Scientists may never have enough confidence that their theories will predict how well geoengineering systems can work. With so much at stake, there is reason to worry about what we don’t know."
  Alan Robock. "Has the time come for geoengineering?" The Bulletin. August 14th, 2008 : "10. Rapid warming if deployment stops. A technological, societal, or political crisis could halt a project of stratospheric aerosol injection in mid- deployment. Such an abrupt shift would result in rapid climate warming, which would produce much more stress on society and ecosystems than gradual global warming."
 Geoengineering proposals often start with the best of intentions and with no negative foreseeable outcomes, but human error could result in the deadliest of consequences. Robert Jackson, director of Duke University’s Center on Global Change warns, 'Playing with the Earth’s climate is a dangerous game with unclear rules, we need more direct ways to tackle global warming, including energy efficiency, reduced consumption, and investment in renewable energy sources.'
  Graeme Wood. "Re-Engineering the Earth." The Atlantic. September 12th, 2010 : "as with nearly every geo-engineering plan, there are substantial drawbacks to the gas-the-planet strategy. Opponents say it might produce acid rain and decimate plant and fish life. Perhaps more disturbing, it’s likely to trigger radical shifts in the climate that would hit the globe unevenly. 'Plausibly, 6 billion people would benefit and 1 billion would be hurt,' says Martin Bunzl, a Rutgers climate-change policy expert. The billion negatively affected would include many in Africa, who would, perversely, live in a climate even hotter and drier than before. In India, rainfall levels might severely decline; the monsoons rely on temperature differences between the Asian landmass and the ocean, and sulfur aerosols could diminish those differences substantially." 
 There are no assurances that the effects of geoengineering can be reversed at all. If something goes wrong, or the effects are greater than intended, it's quite possible that there is no way to reverse them.
 In the New York Times, Ken Caldeira, of the Global Ecology Department at Stanford writes: "If we could pour a five-gallon bucket's worth of sulfate particles per second into the stratosphere, it might be enough to keep the earth from warming for 50 years. Tossing twice as much up there could protect us into the next century." Other experts say that blocking 2% of the sun's rays from hitting the earth could stop global warming.
  Jamais Cascio. "It's Time to Cool the Planet." Wall Street Journal. June 15th, 2009 : "let's be clear about one other thing: We will still have to radically reduce carbon emissions, and do so quickly. We will still have to eliminate the use of fossil fuels, and adopt substantially more sustainable agricultural methods. We will still have to deal with the effects of ecosystems damaged by carbon overload. But what geoengineering can do is slow the increase in temperatures, delay potentially catastrophic 'tipping point' events such as a disastrous melting of the Arctic permafrost and give us time to make the changes to our economies and our societies necessary to end the climate disaster. Geoengineering, in other words, is simply a temporary 'stay of execution.' We will still have to work for a pardon."
  Samuel Thernstrom. "What Role for Geoengineering?" The American. March 2, 2010 : "Seen in the proper light, geoengineering is potentially the key to unlock the mitigation puzzle—a way of controlling climate risks during the many decades that it will take to transform the global energy system. Asking nations to spend trillions to avoid damages (mostly many) decades in the future while doing little to address warming’s more immediate effects is a difficult task. But if geoengineering can stave off short- and medium-term harms while giving time for a long-term solution to take effect, the result is a coherent policy proposal that may enjoy broader public support."
  Samuel Thernstrom. "What Role for Geoengineering?" The American. March 2, 2010 : "intuitively, it seems more likely that most people, when told about geoengineering, would be more inclined to support greater mitigation, not less, thinking: If such extreme measures are really being contemplated, surely we ought to more aggressively pursue other solutions."
 These approaches address the root cause of climate change: greenhouse gases. They include: Fertilizing oceans to raise the amount of carbon-consuming algae, reforestation, biofuels combined with carbon sequestration and burying the resulting carbon mass, as well as large building-size air filters to draw C02 from the atmosphere. This responds to concerns by skeptics that geoengineering does not address the root cause of climate change - rising C02 and greenhouse levels. Certainly, these carbon-absorbing approaches do.
  Graeme Wood. "Re-Engineering the Earth." The Atlantic. September 12th, 2010 : "neither sulfur-aerosol injection nor an armada of cloud whiteners nor an array of space-shades would do much to reduce carbon-dioxide levels. As long as carbon emissions remain constant, the atmosphere will fill with more and more greenhouse gases. Blocking the sun does nothing to stop the buildup. It is not even like fighting obesity with liposuction: it’s like fighting obesity with a corset, and a diet of lard and doughnuts. Should the corset ever come off, the flab would burst out as if the corset had never been there at all. For this reason, nearly every climate scientist who spoke with me unhesitatingly advocated cutting carbon emissions over geo-engineering." 
 Francelino Grando, a senior government official from Brazil, worried that geoengineering might be seen as a solution instead of a stop-gap: "It may give people the impression that we don’t have to worry about climate change because we can solve it through engineering." [1] 
  Richard Lovett. "Geoengineering won't curb sea-level rise." Nature News. August 23rd, 2010 : "Unless they involve extreme measures, geoengineering approaches to offset the effects of human-driven climate changes won't do much to combat rising sea levels, an international team of scientists reports in the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences1. That is because sea levels respond slowly to changes in Earth's temperature, says John Moore, a palaeoclimatologist at Beijing Normal University and lead author of the study."
  Lisa Hymas. "We need birth control, not geoengineering." The Ghink Chronicle. Grist. April 6th, 2010 : "Most green groups don't like to talk about all this -- population has become the third rail of the environmental community (more on that in a future post). Technologists don't like to either -- they'd rather talk about traveling-wave nuclear reactors and CO2-sucking machines and space sunshades. We do need to explore and invest in cleantech options; climate change is serious enough that it requires all of our best efforts in all arenas. But it may be that many of the technologies with the most potential for averting climate change already exist -- the Pill, the condom, the IUD.  We just need to spread them far and wide. Baby stroller crossed-out in greenGINK: green inclinations, no kidsBetter still, providing contraception to women who lack it is one of the most cost-effective ways to curb greenhouse-gas emissions.  Each $7 spent on basic family planning over the next four decades would reduce global CO2 emissions by more than a metric ton, while achieving that same reduction with the leading low-carbon technologies would cost a minimum of $32, according to a recent study by the London School of Economics [PDF], commissioned by the Optimum Population Trust."
 With a Geo-engineering solution having such lasting implications, only top scientists and engineers would be dedicated to the task of changing the world in such a radical way. For-profit companies would not be given permits to carry it out, unless it was done in a heavily confined and regulated manner. 
 Eli Kintisch’s new book, Hack the Planet: "One problem with geoengineering research that scientist Ken Caldeira has pointed out to me is that there are a lot of private companies who are involved in this research, who are out to do research but also to create a business around selling carbon credits. Is this a field that should be dominated by private enterprises?" [8] 
  Graeme Wood. "Re-Engineering the Earth." The Atlantic. September 12th, 2010 : "The scariest thing about geo-engineering, as it happens, is also the thing that makes it such a game-changer in the global-warming debate: it’s incredibly cheap. Many scientists, in fact, prefer not to mention just how cheap it is." 
 Many people will be needed to participate in the field. Jobs could be as diverse as geoengineering itself, testing methods and implicating them. And, with the economy currently in a recession, this new field could really create new jobs in a world where there are fewer every day. New jobs and innovations could lead to more new fields and more jobs.
 Many geoengineering approaches are exorbitantly expensive. Launching mirrors in to space, or Spraying ocean water into low flying clouds, or putting seeds in to clouds to manipulate the weather, and spraying sulfer into the air are all incredibly complicated, resource and technologically intensive, and ultimately expensive. Launching mirrors would be the most costly, spraying ocean water is the least expensive. 
